Index,job_title,company,location,salary,industry,experience,company_size,job_description
0,Data Analyst (Jakarta),MASPION,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Gunung Sahari,Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Responsibilities:

Interpreting data, analyzing results using statistical techniques
Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases
Conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design
Develop analysis and reporting capabilities, monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements as well.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or pattern in complex data sets

Requirements:

Candidates must be possess diploma or bachelor degree majoring in Mathematic, Statistic, Computer Engineering, or related major with minimum GPA 3.00
Proven experienced as data analyst minimum 3 years
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical package for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS, etc)
Analytical skills: work with large amounts of data, facts, figures and number crunching
Excellent communication and negotiation skills
Proficiency in English and operating Ms. Office
Central Jakarta placement

 "
1,Data Analyst [Marketing] Staff,PT Mandom Indonesia Tbk,Bekasi (Jawa Barat) - Cibitung,,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," 
Job Scopes :

To collect, perform, and process statistical analysis of data.
Analyze and interpret results using standard statistical tools and techniques.
Provide concise data reports and clear data visualizations for marketing management.

Job Requirements :

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, or equivalent.
Good in English, both writing and speaking.
At least 1-2 years experience of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Advanced in statistics, SPSS, and data analysis.
Preferably Staff (non management & non supervisor) specialized in Marketing/Business Development or Data Analyst.
Curiosity and Creativity are key attributes to this job.

Only selected candidates will be noticed shortly, thanks.
 
NOTE :
1. All Recruitment process will be held in Mandom Indonesia Head Office in Cibitung, Bekasi.
2. No fees or charges during the recruitment process.
 "
2,DATA ANALYST,PT Arta Boga Cemerlang,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - CENGKARENG,Below expected salary,Consumer Products/FMCG,Less than 1 year experience,More than 5000 Employees," REQUIREMENTS:
 

Age maximum 27 years old
Minimum S1 Degree, majoring in Computer Science, Information Engineering and Statistic / Mathematic, with GPA minimum 3.00
Excellent analytical skill and innovative problem solving
Proactive, detailed, result  oriented and committed to finish the task
Computer Literate (MS Office, advanced in MS Excel)
Familiar with database is an advantage
Fresh graduate are welcome to apply

 
  "
3,Senior Data Analyst,PT Daya Maha Berkarya ( IRIS WORLDWIDE),Jakarta Raya,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 5 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Responsible for working with clients of the company to provide customer level analytical and statistical modeling support. Play an important role in marketing measurement and decision-making processes.

Assist account service teams with effective direct mail, e-mail, advertising, telemarketing and web test/control design and performance measurement
Apply statistical techniques to develop and deploy predictive models in support of customer acquisition, cross-sell, retention and win-back strategies
Provide ongoing tracking, measurements and analytical support of standalone and fully integrated marketing campaign
Provide secondary support for account service on customer mining, analytics and insight
Work with internal technology teams to create or improve prospect database, data warehouse, marketing datamarts data and lead management systems
Provide robust campaign back-end analyses, along with recommendations for future campaign enhancements

Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in Business, Statistics, Engineering, Math, or other similar quantitative field required, Master's degree preferred
Strong communication and organizational skills
5+ years hands-on experience utilizing database systems and applied statistical analysis and programming in a business environment
Experience with a wide range of statistical techniques (i.e cluster analysis, regression analysis, linear programming, neural networks, etc)
Proficient with SPSS Programming and/or other statistical software. Familiarity with SQL/Enterprise Miner and SPSS
Experience working within multi sectors environment is a plus
Experience supporting customer relationship management strategies preferred
 "
4,Data Analyst,Mainspring Technology,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Gandaria,,Entertainment/Media,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Responsibilities:

Doing Data Selection & Preparartion and Data Analysis using different data mining method such as clustering, classification, regression, association rules, etc
Create analytics report based on findings
Keep pace with Analytics, technology, and marketing industry trends
Supported enhancement in Applied Statistics and Mathematics
Expossure to the latest trend and technology
	 

General Requirements :

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics or Computer Science.
At least 1 year of working experience in statistical project will be advantage, Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Having ability in R programming
Good skill and knowledge of using statistical analysis menthods such as clustering, regression, and classification
Possess logical thinking, highly curious and good attention to detail
Adaptable with dynamic work environment
 "
5,Data Analyst,PT Daya Maha Berkarya ( IRIS WORLDWIDE),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Mampang Prapatan,Below expected salary,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Less than 1 year experience),501 - 1000 Employees," Job description
Importing, cleaning, transforming, validating or modeling data with the purpose of understanding or making conclusions from the data for decision making purposes.
 
Presenting data in charts, graphs, tables, designing and developing relational databases for collecting data and also includes building or designing data input or data collection.
 
Writing  Data Definition Language or Data Manipulation Language SQL commands, be responsible for improving data quality and for designing or presenting conclusions gained from analyzing data using statistical tools like Microsoft Excel.
 
Desired Skills and Experience

Experience in database development/application development.
Experience working with large datasets data, analytic thinker and problem solver.
Ms. SQL Server. (Basic query, sub query, views, stored procedure, etc.).
Excel (lookup, pivot, and formula).
Knowledge of Entity Relationship Diagram and Data Flow Diagram.
Knowledge of SSIS and ETL is a plus.
Min D3 / S1 (ManagementInformatics / System Informatics)
Min 3 years work experience.
Love data.
Detail, accuracy, and efficiency.
Strong thinking process.
Working with numbers and data about customers.
Learn database, SQL, data visualization, customer insight.
 "
6,Data Analyst,PT Inti Citra Agung,Jakarta Raya,,Retail/Merchandise,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," Tanggung Jawab Pekerjaan :

Menganalisa data merchandising
Grouping barang/ Status Barang/ Analisa barang
Bersedia melakukan perjalanan ke outlet sesekali untuk analisa barang

Kualifikasi :

Lulusan S1 Teknik Industri/ Teknik Informatika
Memiliki logika berpikir yang baik dan mampu berpikir kritis
Teliti dan memiliki kemampuan analisa yang baik
Menyukai pekerjaan rutin
Mampu menggunakan Microsoft Office, terutama Microsoft Excel
 "
7,Referential & Marketing - Data Analyst Retail,Carrefour (PT Trans Retail Indonesia),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Lebak Bulus,Below expected salary,Retail/Merchandise,Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Job Requirements:

At least 4 Year(s) of working experience in the related field especially in retail industry is required for this position.
Excellent skill in Microsoft Office - Excel, SQL Database.
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Merchandising & Sales data.
 "
8,Data Analyst,PT Indomarco Adi Prima,Jakarta Raya,,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess a Diploma or Bachelor Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology, Statistic/Mathematics
At least 1 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position
Age maximum 30 years old
Good Analytical thinking
Good knowledge in graphic design
Extensive knowledge of statistics and experienced using statistical package for analyzing large data sheet (Ms. Excel : vlookup, hlookup, pivot table)
 "
9,Data Analyst,PT Indodrill Indonesia,Bogor (Jawa Barat),"IDR 4,000,000 - IDR 5,500,000",Mining,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
PRINCIPAL FUNCTION
 
The principle functions of the Data Analyst will be to work closely with the Administrative Supervisor to:

Set up, populate and maintain an Access database to store all contract drilling data generated in the future and over time, input all previously generated data in conjunction with other staff.  Other databases may eventually be set up to store additional data.


Set up and maintain where required, or utilising existing, Excel spreadsheets to monitor and analyses data trends of the Company’s activities. 


Participate in other activities of the Company’s production, invoicing, logistics and financial functions as required.

 
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

Assist in the design, setting up and maintenance, of a Microsoft Access database, which will eventually store all Indodrill contract drill data, both generated in the past and for all work going forward. 


Assist in populating the database with historical drill data and ensure future drill data is correctly entered and stored.


Analyze the data input and generated on a routine (monthly) basis to assist in identifying productivity trends initially, but developing into other aspects of the business, such as cost management, invoicing and safety statistics trends.


Set up and maintain Excel spreadsheets to help analyze data, along with graphical representations of data generated.  A moderate level of complexity will be required in these spreadsheets.


Assist the Administrative Supervisor with other activities, such as the routine monthly invoicing, as required depending on the workload (generally related to the number of projects in operation at one time).


The role will only be limited by the candidates ability to learn and grow and may develop into assisting other departments such as maintenance, logistics, finance and safety with input into setting up of systems and analyzing their data.

 
KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS
 
The key performance indicators for this role are as follows:

Timely setting up of the Access database and efficient input of all initial data.


Quality and efficiency of Excel spreadsheets produced for handling specific requirements.
Quality and trends defined of data analysis; ability to represent these trends graphically for the benefit of the end users.

  
KEY ATTRIBUTES REQUIRED

A relevant tertiary degree in an computing, business or engineering discipline would be an advantage.


Main attributes required are an analytical mind that is suited to working with data, an ability to learn quickly, willingness to work with others to develop systems and a strong work ethic.


Strong computing skills are essential, particularly in Excel.  Familiarity with the Access program would be an advantage, but is not essential. 


Previous experience in purchasing within the drilling or heavy machinery industry is an advantage, but not as important as the right attitude.


The role may also suit a new graduate with the above attributes and a desire to learn our business.


English proficiency must be of a level to communicate with non-Indonesian speakers.


PRINCIPAL FUNCTION
 
The principle functions of the Data Analyst will be to work closely with the Administrative Supervisor to:

Set up, populate and maintain an Access database to store all contract drilling data generated in the future and over time, input all previously generated data in conjunction with other staff.  Other databases may eventually be set up to store additional data.


Set up and maintain where required, or utilising existing, Excel spreadsheets to monitor and analyses data trends of the Company’s activities. 


Participate in other activities of the Company’s production, invoicing, logistics and financial functions as required.

 
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

Assist in the design, setting up and maintenance, of a Microsoft Access database, which will eventually store all Indodrill contract drill data, both generated in the past and for all work going forward. 


Assist in populating the database with historical drill data and ensure future drill data is correctly entered and stored.


Analyze the data input and generated on a routine (monthly) basis to assist in identifying productivity trends initially, but developing into other aspects of the business, such as cost management, invoicing and safety statistics trends.


Set up and maintain Excel spreadsheets to help analyze data, along with graphical representations of data generated.  A moderate level of complexity will be required in these spreadsheets.


Assist the Administrative Supervisor with other activities, such as the routine monthly invoicing, as required depending on the workload (generally related to the number of projects in operation at one time).


The role will only be limited by the candidates ability to learn and grow and may develop into assisting other departments such as maintenance, logistics, finance and safety with input into setting up of systems and analyzing their data.

 
KEY PERFORMANCE INDICATORS
 
The key performance indicators for this role are as follows:
 

Timely setting up of the Access database and efficient input of all initial data.


Quality and efficiency of Excel spreadsheets produced for handling specific requirements.


Quality and trends defined of data analysis; ability to represent these trends graphically for the benefit of the end users.

 
KEY ATTRIBUTES REQUIRED

A relevant tertiary degree in an computing, accounting, business or engineering discipline would be an advantage.


Main attributes required are an analytical mind that is suited to working with data, an ability to learn quickly, willingness to work with others to develop systems and a strong work ethic.


Strong computing skills are essential, particularly in Excel.  Familiarity with the Access program would be an advantage, but is not essential. 


Previous experience in purchasing within the drilling or heavy machinery industry is an advantage, but not as important as the right attitude.


The role may also suit a new graduate with the above attributes and a desire to learn our business.


English proficiency must be of a level to communicate with non-Indonesian speakers.
Preferable domicily in Bogor or surrounding area

 
 

 "
10,Data Analyst,PT Smart Tbk (downstream),Tangerang (Banten) - BSD,Below expected salary,Agricultural/Plantation/Poultry/Fisheries,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Clerical/Administrative Support or equivalent.
Excellent in Microsoft Office (Excel, Power Point and Word) and Pivot
Willing to be located in BSD (Tangerang)
Preferably candidate with experience in mineral water company
 "
11,Data Analyst (BSD Placement),PT Smart Tbk (downstream),Tangerang (Banten) - BSD,Below expected salary,Agricultural/Plantation/Poultry/Fisheries,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Clerical/Administrative Support or equivalent.
Excellent in Microsoft Office (Excel, Power Point and Word) and Pivot
Willing to be located in BSD (Tangerang)
Preferably candidate with experience in mineral water company
 "
12,Data Analyst,People Solutions,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 9,000,000 - IDR 14,000,000",Consulting (Business & Management),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Responsibilities:
Reporting:

Design the report based on business needs (structure, charts)
Search, prepare, transform, calculate and extract the data from data warehouse and dialer source tables (SQL)
Prepare the report from these data (Excel or OBI)
Automatize the process (SQL jobs, procedures, ODBC to excel)
Maintain and generate the regular reports (daily, weekly, monthly)
Check regularly the data, understand the trends, highlight the issues, propose next steps, explain the reported figures to management
Calculate incentives for desk and field collectors

Analysis:

Prepare ad hoc analysis to understand the collection issues and to be able to fix them
Develop collections scorecards
Ability to work on shifts

Requirements:

University degree – (preferably statistics, economy, IT)
At least have experience min 1 year in doing data analysis and/or reporting
Has experience in data mining, data warehouse and/or performing reporting into the dashboard
Excellent query SQL servcer knowledge
Advanced excel skills – Lookup functions, Pivot tables, Validations and Macros
Experience with Collections, OBI, MIS Analysis and Analytical thinking
English – written and spoken

 
 "
13,Data Analyst,JD .ID (PT Ritel Bersama Nasional),Jakarta Raya - Mega Kuningan,,Retail/Merchandise,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Job Description

Doing Cost analysis of the interception data from fraud cnotrol system
Develop the rules and strategy for fraud control system
Build data models to help optimize our operations performance
Dig through our extensive datasets to find actionable insights for business side
Develop ongoing and ad-hoc reports to track key performance metrics
Assist data users, both internal and external, with accessing data sets, understanding and interpreting information and analysis

 
Requirements

Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Mathematics, Information Systems or related field
candidates has to be able to communicate in English & Mandarin
The ability to cope with pressure Excellent written and verbal communications skills in English
Extensive experience with common analysis tools - Excel PivotTable, R, SPSS, AWK, Google Analytics or similar.
Skilled in using SQL, Excel, Markdown/HTML/Powerpoint tools to analyze data and produce reports.
Demonstrable familiarity with programming concepts
More than 3 years data analysis experience in the Internet industry, computer, statistics, or other related fields.
Experiences in Data Analyst for costing & Finance is preferable
Strong analytical and research skills with the ability to create actionable insights by aggregating and distilling large-scale data sets
Good logical analysis and good cross team communication skill
 "
14,Data Analyst,PT Linktone Indonesia - OKEZONE,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Data Analyst

Passion in data analysis, mathematics, statistics, or pattern recognition
Work closely with management to prioritize business and information needs
Interpret data, analyse results using statistical techniques and provide on-going reports
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources (Filter and clean data)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (Excel)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Experience using Google Analytics is a plus
1+ years of experience as a data analyst
 "
15,DATA ANALYST Fresh Graduate,PT Raksasa Indonesia,Medan (Sumatera Utara),,Others,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees, Walk in interview. Ready to work hard.Candidate must possess at least SMU in any field.At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Clerical/Administrative Support or equivalent. 
16,Data Analyst Leader,PT Alvindo Catur Sentosa,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - APL Tower,,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," We are looking for enthusiastic team player, hardworker and analytical thinker as part of our IT team.
Your role is to provide and analyze information for every unit based on data trend and market price.
also you'll give advice as our lead for SAP deployment program which is something that you should already familiar with.
 
To succeed, it means you need a great brain and good communication. 
And most of all, you need to have a mindset of someone who always willing to give a helping hand.
 
If that’s something that you think you already have and suits your passion, click apply immediately !
 
Qualification :                                                                  

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree or Master's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or Mathematics.
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in SAP programming or implementation.
Strong experience in data modeling and analyzing.
Required Skill(s): Excel Function (data validation), SAP business object, Warehouse Management System, Data warehouse, Data Modeling
 "
17,Data Analyst,red communication Indonesia,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Taman Daan Mogot VI no.6,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," 
Brief description
We are looking for a Data Analyst to strengthen our Marketing Performance team and handle tasks such as collecting and analyzing digital data produced from marketing mediums including social media and website to provide valuable insights
 

Responsibilities

Provide data and conduct digital analysis to determine and measure the effectiveness of digital-based marketing campaigns of various objectives, including awareness campaigns, buzz campaigns, and engagement activities.
Doing social listening and gain insightful data to detect any potential crisis and digital insight for campaign.
Summarize analysis and communicate findings effectively to cross-functional teams.  
Work with cross-functional teams to create and maintain KPI campaign.
Identify and communicate potential optimization opportunities.  
Ensure the quality of data through regular data reviews.  
Making recommendations based on findings.

 
Requirements

Minimum 1 year of experience in digital analytics, social media measurement or related fields in digital marketing
Minimum 1 year of experience with analytics platforms such as Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, Twitter Analytics, Socialbakers, Adobe Analytics, etc.
Minimum 1 year of experience with social listening tools, such as Crimson Hexagon, Brandwatch, Brand24, Sprinklr, etc.  
Exposure to other online marketing disciplines, such as search engine marketing, search engine optimization, etc.
Ability to think analytically to identify and solve problems through data analysis.  
Experience with summarizing and presenting findings clearly and concisely.  
Have an understanding of effective report/dashboard design and standards.
Having skill for web analytics, Google analytics, social media analytics.
Proficient in Ms. Office, especially Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint.
Team player, able to work with a cross-functional team.  
Proficient time management and prioritization skills.  
Highly motivated and detail oriented.  


 "
18,Data Analyst,PT Bangga Teknologi Indonesia,"Jakarta Raya - Sunter,  Jakarta Utara",,Electrical & Electronics,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 

Kriteria:
 

Bertanggung jawab untuk meninjau data, Interpretasi, analisis dari data yang dikumpulkan menggunakan alat yang berbeda, teknik statistik seperti Word, MS Excel,Power Point, Grapik analisis dan data sistem manajemen untuk memberikan akurat & handal laporan kepada perusahaan
Data analyst juga bertanggung jawab untuk mempersiapkan presentasi, melakukan penelitian, dan mempertahankan kualitas sistem database. Data analyst membantu dalam administrasi database, Desain, keamanan juga tepat waktu pemeliharaan basis data.
Data analyst bertanggung jawab untuk mempersiapkan berbagai statistik laporan operasional harian, bulanan, triwulanan dan tahunan.
Data analyst harus berinteraksi secara individual dengan klien perusahaan untuk mengidentifikasi kebutuhan informasi dan penelitian.
Data analyst harus tepat waktu dan memiliki keterampilan manajemen waktu.
Data analyst harus memiliki keterampilan manajemen proyek mempertimbangkan semua aspek perencanaan, pengorganisasian dan koordinasi proyek dengan para pemangku kepentingan.
Harus menjadi peserta aktif, motivasi diri, cepat, dan orang yang inovatif.


 
Kualifikasi :

Candidate must possess at least a Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Economics, Finance/Accountancy/Banking, Business Studies/Administration/Management, Marketing or equivalent.
At least 2 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Applicants must be willing to work in Sunter,Jakarta Utara.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
Full-Time position(s) available.

 
  "
19,CFEx Analyst (Pharmaceutical Sales Data Analyst),PT Bayer Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,BioTechnology/Pharmaceutical/Clinical research,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," JOB DESCRIPTION Sales ExcellenceMonitoring the improvement projects of eSalesWeb:Data cleaning prior to PFI integrationRegular data cleaning process for PFI integration in 2018 onwardsSystem test on the PFI integration (phase 1 & 2)System test on the channel team inclusion for activity monitoring (on wholesaler visits)Periodical updates on eSalesWeb guidelineAnalytics of eSalesWeb interaction dataRegular reporting to sales management on activity interaction data (local SFEx measures)Collection of insight from activity interaction dataProduct message tracking on activity levelAPKS dashboardFeedback collection from key stakeholdersSystem test, collaborating with IT deptMarketing ExcellenceSemester customer data updates:Data cleaning for new customerData processing on new HCPs data as an input for  HCP segmentationMaintenance on HCP segmentation data moving forwardBrand planning processExecute cross-functional communication on brand planning processLogistical preparation for brand planning processIMCMContribute on key IMCM projects, particularly on:Administering contractual documents with vendorsLiaison with third party on project management follow upLogistics preparation for pilot and full implementation on the IMCM channelCollaboration with marketing on KPI tracking for IMCM activitiesCollaboration on new channel development of contact online, particularly on feedback collection from the Marketing teamQUALIFICATIONRecently graduated/ maximum of 1,5 years’ experience in relevant function.Came from reputable university, with GPA at least 3.25 out of 4.00.Majoring in Management, Business Administration, Mathematics or Statistics will be beneficial.Familiar with customer data system and able to vastly adapt to utilize changing data tools.Preferably with previous experience to assist marketing/ sales project involving collaboration with diverse stakeholders.Fluent in English and able to work in culturally-diverse environment.Performance driven particularly in delivering best services to internal clients. "
20,Data Analyst E Commerce Supervisor Operation,PT Wook Mobile Commerce,Jakarta Raya - Jakarta Utara,,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," JOB DESC :

Membuat report data progress
Monitoring dan melaporan data penjualan E Commerce.

Mengatur pekerjaan harian tim, melakukan analisis, memimpin serta membagikan pekerjaan tersebut kepada rekan satu tim untuk menyelesaikannya.

Membuat laporan statistic penjualan perusahaan, melakukan analisa customer, produk, stock, pesanan, payment dll, serta mendorong cabang untuk melakukan perbaikan.
Verifikasi customer baru, mengaktifkan kembali customer lama, melakukan verifikasi produk baru, melakukan offline produk lama, mengatur letak produk Aplikasi, meningkatkan aktivitas customer, meningkatkan persentase pemesanan ulang pada customer.
Menulis artikel mengenai cara menjalankan toko offline dan melakukan promosi.
Mengunjungi customer untuk mengetahui kebutuhan customer, mengumpulkan saran dan mendorong divisi yang berkaitan untuk melakukan perbaikan.
Bekerja sama dengan digital designer untuk meningkatkan promosi dan penjualan produk
Bekerja sama  dengan tim digital marketing dan digital designer untuk memastikan semua halaman ter-update secara optimal

 
JOB REQ :

Maks 30 Tahun
Mahir berbahasa Inggris 
Pendidikan Min S1 dari segala bidang
Minimal pengalaman 5 tahun dibidang penjualan E-Commerce (Wholesale)
Bisa bekerja dibawah tekanan
Bertanggung jawab serta memiliki kepemimpinan yang baik
Memiliki komunikasi yang baik
Bisa mengoperasikan komputer dengan baik (Ms. Office & Internet)
Bersedia bekerja di hari sabtu (08.30 - 12.00)
Bisa bergabung cepat
Bersedia ditempatkan di kantor pusat (Jakarta Utara)
Full-Time position
 "
21,Data Analyst,PT Combiphar,"Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Office 8 Building,  SCBD",Below expected salary,BioTechnology/Pharmaceutical/Clinical research,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Data entry on system 
Data analysis
Data Filling
Database Administrator
Reporting
Temporary for 3 Months project

 
Job Requirements
 

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field. last semester students are encouraged to apply
No work experience required.
Required Skill(s): MS Excel, MS Powerpoint
Preferably Less than 1 year experience specialized in Clerical/Administrative Support or equivalent.
 "
22,Data Analyst,PT Agro Boga Utama,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Bintaro,Below expected salary,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Data Analyst, Ms. Excel, Analysis, MySQL
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Technical & Helpdesk Support or equivalent.
 "
23,Risk Management Data Analyst Staff,Indofood Group,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job description:

Perform data preparation activities (e.g. extraction, research, transformation, storing, etc.) from various internal and external sources
Conduct data analytics using various statistical methodologies (e.g. exploratory data analysis, predictive modelling, etc.) to identify and assess risk factors
Develop appropriate data modelling, visualization and analytic reports

 
Requirements:

Bachelor Degree in Economic / Statistics / Finance
Fresh graduate and/ or 1-2 years experience
Fluent in English
Have good knowledge in statistics for business
Have passion and curiosity in data with strong analytical skills and attention to detail and accuracy
Excellent skills in Microsoft Excel (having scripting knowledge R or other statistical packages will be an advantage)
Understand basic concepts and terms in economic and financial analysis/ reporting
Have knowledge of various external data sources

 "
24,IT Data Analyst,PT. Mitra Insan Sejahtera,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Consulting (Business & Management),Less than 1 year experience,51 - 200 Employees, Memproses permintaan data dari user setelah mendapat persetujuan dari DireksiMengecek apakah cashflow report rutin harian / mingguan / bulanan sudah jalan sesuai schedulenya atau belumMembantu user memperbaiki cashflow report bila ada data yang salah /  tidak sesuai Requirements : Usia maksimal 26 tahunPendidikan minimal S1 Sistem Informasi / TeknikPenempatan Jakarta 
25,Data Solutions Analyst,AIMIA,Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
What is the focus of this role?
 

To provide data management, insight and reports creation to Aimia’s clients and marketing teams. To develop new tools and processes for effective campaign management and customer analytics.

 
Responsibilities include:
 

Running a customer campaign process in SQL environment
Writes data retrieval programs to import, extract, transfer, and load (ETL) data from heterogeneous data sources to support ad hoc reporting
Reports and Dashboard creation
Track KPI performance (dashboard reporting, activity evaluation matrix, loyalty program measurement and refinement)
Extract and prepare data for analysis (transforming raw transactional data into customer level data for analysis)

 
Essential skills and experience:
 

Fluently in English both written and conversation
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor Degree majoring Science/Information Technology, Computer or equivalent
Experience in database development/application development
Experience working with large datasets data, analytic thinker and problem solver
Write & troubleshoot SQL code and design (stored procedures, functions, triggers, tables, views, indexes, constraints etc.)
Working experience with reporting tools (SSRS / Business Object / Tableau)
Good knowledge on business domain
Knowledge of SSIS and ETL is a plus
Knowledge of any other programming language is a plus

 
Useful characteristics include:
 

A self starter with analytical astuteness, able to work with tight deadlines
Team player who can work in a cross functional environment
Attention to details and able to work in a structured way

 
What is success in the role?
 

Increasing the efficiency and quality of customer data management processes
Deliver insight and able to meet tight deadlines
Technical innovation to solve data analytics problems


  "
26,Data Analyst,PT Smart Tbk,Tangerang (Banten) - BSD Green Office Park,,Agricultural/Plantation/Poultry/Fisheries,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," We are looking for the best candidate to fill the position as Data Analyst Officer for Modern Market
 
Responsibility:

Analyze trade marketing data from modern market

 
Qualifications:

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor Degree from Statistic, Mathematic, Industrial Engineering, Economic
At least 2 years of working experience as Data Entry or Data Analyst, fresh grad are welcome
Ms Excel savvy, high attention to detail, fast learner, agile
Willing to be located in BSD

  "
27,Data Analyst,PT Fonterra Brands Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Tebet,,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Descriptions :

Conduct data science business practice and insight generation from structured and unstructured data.
Standardize business process flow in the system use and management through SOP
Help on system implementation and management through business process creation and identification

Requirements :

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Industrial), Computer Science/Information Technology, Mathematics or equivalent.
At least 1 year(s) of working experience in the related field; fresh graduate are welcome to apply
Required Skill(s): Ms.Excel, VBA Macro, SQL
Good at English
Strong analytical skill, initiative, self-motivated and detail.
 "
28,DATA ANALYST,Brambang.com,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," 
We are looking for a smart, passionate Data Analyst to turn data into information, information into insight and insight into business decisions. At this job, you will have the opportunity to apply data analysis to a variety of applications such as marketing, pricing, and supply chain optimization. 
 
Responsibilities:


Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.


Apply data analysis to a variety of applications, primarily marketing, pricing, and supply chain. 


Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.


Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.


Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.


Support management and business decision-making by providing insight from data analysis. 



Qualifications

Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accurac.
Excellent communication abilities; must be able to explain difficult concepts in simple terms.

Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets.

Adept at report writing and presenting findings

At least a BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Engineering, or Statistics. 


Minimum GPA: 3.5 

At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
 "
29,DATA ANALYST STAFF FOR MARKETING / SALES,PT Mahaghora,Surabaya (Jawa Timur),,Manufacturing/Production,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Bertanggung jawab untuk menganalisa data Marketing & Sales. 
 
Persyaratan : 

Pendidikan min. D3 Administrasi. IPK min. 2,75.
Pengalaman min. 1 tahun sebagai Data Analyst, terutama di perusahaan FMCG atau Distribusi. 
Menguasai MS. Office, terutama Pivot, dst. 
Jujur, teliti. 
 "
30,Internship for Data Analyst,PT Suntory Garuda Beverage,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Cilandak,,Manufacturing/Production,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," Job Descriptions:

To develop intranet and report dashboard.
To provide support in setting and implementing manufacturing KPI / Flash.

Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Industrial), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent. Last semester students are encouraged to apply.
Reqired language(s): English
No work experience required.
Required Skill(s): SQL, MySQL, Java Program.
Familiar with website-based construction and configuration.
 "
31,Junior Data Analyst,PT Intelligence HR Solutions Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," Requirement:Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Mathematics, Science & Technology or equivalent.Excellent English skills.Advanced knowledge with Microsoft Office and data processing applications, i.e.: Microsoft Excel, Microsoft Access, Alteryx.Excellent communication skills.At least 1 year(s) of working experience of relevant data management/expertise in pharmaceutical, medical devices, consumer products or other health care regulatory environment.Able to work collaboratively in a highly matrix environment.Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Actuarial Science/Statistics or equivalent.6 month contract position(s) available and open to extension. Job Description:Rapidly gain an understanding of RIM vision for J&J Medical Devices.Take a complete inventory of all Regulatory information artifacts from specified J&J Medical Devices Regulatory Affairs business units (and relevant non Regulatory information sources).Support development of accelerated plan for data gathering and analysis.Identify critical gaps and/or impediments to effectively achieving goals.Identify/escalate critical issues in a timely manner. Remuneration:Health insurance.Life insurance. "
32,Data Analyst,OnlinePajak,"Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Generali Tower,  Gran Rubina Business Park,  Lt. 18",Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 4 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," Data Analyst in OnlinePajak will be part our Product & Development team who will responsible to : 


Conduct data interpretaion, analyzing results using statistical techniques
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases


 
As Data Analyst, you need to : 

Possess at least Diploma in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Industrial), Computer Science/Information Technology, Mathematics, Quantity Survey or equivalent.
Strong knowledge and experiences in using Dataiku or other ETL tools
Excellent skill in SQL database management
Familiar with Data statistiques, data analysis, data automation, and big data
Fluent communication in English
Strong analytical thinking & detail person
 "
33,Data Analyst Staff,PT Bussan Auto Finance (BAF),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Tanggung Jawab Kerja:
Melakukan analisa data MIS khusus untuk area Call Center Development
 
Kualifikasi:

Pendidikan min. S1 Sistem Informasi/Teknik Informatika/Matematika 
Pengalaman kerja min. 1 tahun sebagai data analyst
Menguasai Microsoft Excel (Macro Excel) dan Visual Basic(sertifikat),SQL, Database, Oracle
Memiliki kemampuan analisa data yang baik


  "
34,Data Analyst Manager,PT Ingenico International Indonesia,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 1 year (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," 
Job Scope

Provide Sales Incentive Performance Calculation
Monitoring and prepare reporting for each account
Prepare periodical dashboard report for Management and internal Department/Division
Review day-to-day administrative and operational activities and propose improvement initiatives
Be responsible of all aspects of client billing
Be responsible of headcount report and movement analysis


 

Qualification

Maximum 35 years old
S1 majoring Economic, Business Administration
Strong Analytical
Good Communication and Relationship with Customer
Education background can be subtituted with related extensive experience


  "
35,SAP Master Data Analyst,Coca-Cola Amatil Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 2 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),More than 5000 Employees," SAP MASTER DATA ANALYST
 
SAP Master Data Analyst is primarily responsible for the design, validation and deployment of the master data processes and standards contained within the global template across Coca-Coca Amatil Indonesia (CCAI), across all Sales Distribution areas.
In addition to providing functional / business expertise the Master Data Analyst is tasked with:

Assisting Project Stream Lead in securing overall Business buy in / approval of processes through the Design Phase, including trade-offs between local and global.
Ensuring the end to end master data process is detailed and quality checked
Developing the Blueprint for the establishment of a Master Data shared services across CCAI

Job Description
 
DESIGN PHASE

Establish  a high level baseline fact-book of “As Is”  processes for the master data prior to the validation workshops
Drive understanding, knowledge and acceptance of the proposed global master data processes through Validation workshops, highlighting and documenting
Process Improvement Goals
Trade-offs
Impacts on Roles & Responsibilities
Training & Support considerations
Audit & Control Features
Reporting
Gaps / Issues
Cost / Benefits
Risks & Mitigation Strategies
Proposing/Recommending the priorities of CCAI for enhancements or changes to the CCA/Global template to the bottler councils for decision
Complete the integrated planning and detailed design work needed to deploy master data process & standards and templates
Identification of quick wins & potential process improvement opportunities

DEPLOY PHASE

Drive Data Conversion activities including legacy data mapping, data creation, conversion and reconciliations
Specify and develop local Interfaces & Archiving needs
Oversee Conference Room Pilots, unit testing, system testing & User Acceptance Testing related to Master Data

BUSINESS RELATIONSHIP MANAGEMENT

Determine Stakeholders by Data Area and schedule stakeholders meetings during the Design Phase
Ensure the expectations of the key business stakeholders are successfully managed throughout the program
Be the Focal point for all Business Communication (Stakeholders, Key Users and Users)
Develop and enhance business relationships
Support the CCAI Blueprint and Business Case process by providing the necessary master data process related information and ensuring relevant risks & opportunities are proactively highlighted to the Commercial Team
Assess the organisational impacts of the new processes and work with the Change Management Team to minimise impact.

PROJECT MANAGEMENT

Conform with Project management disciplines as per the Program Management Office

TEAM SUPPORT

Actively participate and contribute to the achievement of team goals and a collaborative environment

COMPANY VALUES

Demonstrate support and application of the Guiding Principles, including CCAI values

Qualification and Experience

S1 Degree from well known university in master data management, information management, industrial engineering or other related areas.
2 year’s similar experience
Hands-on experience in 2 full cycle SAP Data Conversion project
Functional / Business expertise of CCAI within a Sales Distribution area 
Systems and process integration expertise
Integration & systems testing
Well versed in ETL & Data Conversion process
Advance LSMW development skill
Ability to transform customer requirements into a workable design at a functional level
Deep functional knowledge of SAP
Building Partnerships & Working Relationships
Communication / Facilitation Skills
Results Driven
Change Driver
Customer Focused
Planning & Organizing
Problem Solving & Decision Making
Coaching & Developing Others
Business Acumen
Leading Through Mission & Values
 "
36,Data Analyst,Yayasan Bina Nusantara,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Education,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," Requirement:

Min. Bachelor Degree from any major
Min. 1 year experience in related area
Strong analytical skill
Detail oriented
Good communication skill
Excellent computer skill

 
Responsibility:


Produce and track key performance indicators
Develop and support reporting processes
Monitor and audit data quality
Identify, evaluate and implement internal services and tools to support data validation
Set up and maintain automated data processes
Prepare reports for internal and external audiences using business analytics reporting tools

 "
37,"Data Analyst Job (Payment Gateway Solutions), Jakarta, Indonesia",PT Monroe Consulting Group,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," Executive recruitment company Monroe Consulting Indonesia is recruiting on behalf of an established global payment solutions company with significant business operations around the world, including in Indonesia. Our respected client is seeking a driven information technology professional for the job of Data Analyst. The job is based in Jakarta, Indonesia. Job Summary The Data Analyst will deliver all data extraction, analysis, reconciliation and reporting to ensure all business operations are carried out effectively and efficiently. The winning candidate will be exposed to a dynamic, fun and challenging work environment Key job responsibilities include: Provide sales incentive performance calculationMonitor and prepare reporting for each accountPrepare periodical dashboard report for management and internal departmentsReview day-to-day administrative and operational activities and propose improvementsResponsible for all aspects to client billingHeadcount reports and movement analysis Job Requirements  DegreeTwo years in data analysisFluent EnglishStrong analytical skillsGood communication skillsGood customer-relationship skills "
38,Data Analyst,PT Indosiar Visual Mandiri,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Entertainment/Media,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Melakukan analisa data untuk digunakan sebagai evaluasi program
Melakukan analisa untuk meningkatkan rating share
Melakukan preview konten program
Memberikan masukan terhadap konten program
Memberikan data akurat untuk justifikasi evaluasi program

 
Kualifikasi :
 


S1 berbagai jurusan, diutamakan matematika/ statistic
Memiliki pengalaman minimal 3 tahun di bidang serupa
Memiliki kemampuan analisa
Suka menonton dan mendengar music


  "
39,Data Analyst,PT Rusli Vinilon Sakti,"Jakarta Raya - Jln Raden Saleh Kav 13-17,  Cikini,  Jakarta Pusat",Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," TUGAS & TANGGUNG JAWAB:

Berperan dalam pelaksanaan riset pasar yang dilakukan oleh perusahaan
Melakukan penyusunan metode dan strategi riset yang dilakukan
Berperan aktif dalam proses pengambilan data-data riset
Menyusun kesimpulan hasil riset pasar yang bermanfaat bagi pengambilan keputusan yang dilakukan oleh perusahaan terkait dengan pengembangan produk, strategi penjualan, dsb

 
KUALIFIKASI:

Usia maksimal 30 tahun
Pendidikan minimal D3 / S1 - Manajemen Pemasaran, Ilmu Statistik atau Matematika, Teknik Industri
Lebih disukai jika memiliki pengalaman di bidang Market Research, Market Analyst, khususnya untuk sektor bahan bangunan
Memahami tools statistikal, SPSS, dsb
Memiliki kemampuan interpersonal yang baik, diimbangi dengan kemampuan pengolahan data yang detail dan cermat
 "
40,Data Analyst,PT Ramayana Lestari Sentosa Tbk,Jakarta Raya,,Retail/Merchandise,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Job Description

Maintain Database with Data Software like SQL, Oracle, Etc
Software Maintenance
Data Analysis

 
Qualification

Maximum 27 Years Old
At Least Completed Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Information Technology
Fresh Graduated are Welcomed to Apply
Understand and Know how to use Database Software like SQL
Have an Active English Language (Fluent) 
 "
41,Data Analyst,PT AA International Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 4,000,000 - IDR 6,500,000",Healthcare/Medical,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Job Description:

Responsible for conducting data research and analyst
Making regular statistical data report
Responsible for presenting and providing data as needed
Develop the rules and strategy

 
Job Requirement:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor’s Degree in Statistic, Mathematics, Computer Science/Information Technology, Economic or equivalent
Skilled in using SQL, Excel, Markdown/HTML/Power Point tools to analyze data and produce reports
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Experienced working in Assistance/Insurance Company will be advantage
Good personality and communication skill
Good command of English (Oral, Written and Listening)
Good organizer skill
Experienced working in Assistance Company will be advantage
Resume in Video Format will be advantage

 "
42,Data Analyst - JAKARTA,PT Home Credit Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Responsibilities:Reporting:1.    Design the report based on business needs (structure, charts)2.    Search, prepare, transform, calculate and extract the data from data warehouse and dialer source tables (SQL)3.    Prepare the report from these data (Excel or OBI)4.    Automatize the process (SQL jobs, procedures, ODBC to excel)5.    Maintain and generate the regular reports (daily, weekly, monthly)6.    Check regularly the data, understand the trends, highlight the issues, propose next steps, explain the reported figures to management7.    Calculate incentives for desk and field collectorsAnalysis:1.    Prepare ad hoc analysis to understand the collection issues and to be able to fix them2.    Develop collections scorecards3.    Ability to work on shifts  Requirements:University degree – (preferably statistics, economy, IT)Excellent SQL knowledgeAdvanced excel skills – Lookup functions, Pivot tables, Validations and MacrosExperience with Collections, OBI, MIS Analysis and Analytical thinkingEnglish – written and spoken  "
43,Senior Data Analyst,PT Daya Maha Berkarya ( IRIS WORLDWIDE),Jakarta Raya,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 5 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Responsible for working with clients of the company to provide customer level analytical and statistical modeling support. Play an important role in marketing measurement and decision-making processes.

Assist account service teams with effective direct mail, e-mail, advertising, telemarketing and web test/control design and performance measurement
Apply statistical techniques to develop and deploy predictive models in support of customer acquisition, cross-sell, retention and win-back strategies
Provide ongoing tracking, measurements and analytical support of standalone and fully integrated marketing campaign
Provide secondary support for account service on customer mining, analytics and insight
Work with internal technology teams to create or improve prospect database, data warehouse, marketing datamarts data and lead management systems
Provide robust campaign back-end analyses, along with recommendations for future campaign enhancements

Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in Business, Statistics, Engineering, Math, or other similar quantitative field required, Master's degree preferred
Strong communication and organizational skills
5+ years hands-on experience utilizing database systems and applied statistical analysis and programming in a business environment
Experience with a wide range of statistical techniques (i.e cluster analysis, regression analysis, linear programming, neural networks, etc)
Proficient with SPSS Programming and/or other statistical software. Familiarity with SQL/Enterprise Miner and SPSS
Experience working within multi sectors environment is a plus
Experience supporting customer relationship management strategies preferred
 "
44,Data Analyst,A&W Restaurants Indonesia,"Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Teluk Gong,  Jakarta Utara",,Food & Beverage/Catering/Restaurant,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Responsibilities :
 

Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain database/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work closely with management to prioritize business and information need
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

 

Requirements :
 

Bachelor in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyse, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Knowledgeable about statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS, etc)
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Proven working experience as a data analyst (preferable)
A good English skill (oral and written) is a must



  "
45,Data Analyst,PT Mowilex Indonesia,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Manufacturing/Production,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Bila anda menyukai kegiatan pengolahan, analisis, dan pengambilan keputusan berdasarkan data, kami membuka kesempatan bagi anda untuk menyalurkan minat tersebut. Data Analyst bekerja di dalam departemen Sales Support Nasional di bawah divisi Sales & Marketing. Bersama tim Sales Support, anda akan melaksanakan konsolidasi dan analisis data penjualan yang akan menjadi dasar bagi strategi penjualan perusahaan. Analisis yang tajam, kemampuan melihat pola-pola dari data mentah, dan resiliensi menjadi salah satu tuntutan, namun juga menjadi kekuatan yang akan tumbuh dari bekerja di posisi ini.
 
Anda akan diminta untuk memiliki kualifikasi:

    Minimal Pendidikan S1 diutamakan jurusan Ekonomi
    Usia 22 - 29 tahun
    Fresh Graduate dipersilahkan melamar
    Pengalaman di data analysis baik di pekerjaan maupun di organisasi menjadi nilai plus
    Fleksibilitas dalam berpikir maupun bergaul

Penempatan di kantor pusat Jakarta, terbuka satu posisi full-time.

  "
46,Data Analyst Officer,PT Garudafood Putra Putri Jaya,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Bintaro Raya,Below expected salary,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," We're looking for the best candidate to fill the position as Data Ananlyst Officer for Modern Market Responsibility :Analyze trade marketing data from Modern Market Qualifications :Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, from Statisctic, Mathematic, Industrial Engineering, Economic.At least 1 year(s) of working experience as Data Entry or Data Analyst. Fresh graduates are encourage to apply.Required skill(s): Intermediate skill in MS Office (Excel), High Attention to detail, Fast learner.Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Sales - Retail/General or equivalent.Full-Time position(s) available. "
47,Data Analyst Assistant Manager,PT Bussan Auto Finance (BAF),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),More than 5000 Employees," Tanggung Jawab Kerja:

Menyusun dan melakukan pengolahanlaporan harian, mingguan dan bulanan terkait aktivitas marketing untuk manajemen, department terkait, dan cabang
Menyediakan, menganalisa, mendukung operasional bisnis perusahaan

Kualifikasi:

Pendidikan min. S1 jurusan Matematika/Statistik/Ilmu Komputer/Teknik Komputer.
Pengalaman kerja min. 3 tahun sebagai data analyst
Mengusai Ms Excel (Macro dan Micro Excel), database (SQL, dan sebagainya)
Memiliki kemampuan analisa yang baik dengan akurasi tinggi dan berorientasi pada hal-hal detail
 "
48,Data Analyst (Kode: DA_OKT1),PT Exa Mitra Solusi,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Data AnalystKode : DA_OKT1Lokasi : JAKARTA BARATKualifikasi :Pria/Wanita, Max 30 tahun.Pendidkan minimal S1 Matematika/Statistika.Mampu mengoperasikan program microsoft Excel (Vlookup, Hlookup, Pivot Tabel, Chart) is a mustMampu mengoperasikan SPSS menjadi nilai TambahTerbiasa dengan pengolahan dan analisa dataBerpengalaman di bagian analisa data selama 1 tahun lebih diutamakanSehat jasmani dan rohani.Menyukai pekerjaan yang repetitif/berulang (pekerjaan yang monoton)Bukan pribadi yang pembosanBersedia lembur Bila dibutuhkanTugas dan Tanggung Jawab :Mengolah dan menganalisa data penjualan untuk mengetahui faktor yang mempengaruhi penjualanMembuat laporan dan presentasi hasil analisa data Kirimkan Surat lamaran, CV terbaru lengkap, Fotokopi : KTP, Ijazah & Transkrip Nilai, Kartu Keluarga (KK) Terbaru, Pas Foto 4x6 cm, Surat Referensi/Keterangan kerja sebelumnya (bila memiliki pengalaman kerja wajib menyertakan surat keterangan/referensi kerja), serta Surat Keterangan Catatan Kepolisian (SKCK) ke alamat berikut :PT.  EXA  MITRA  SOLUSIGraha Arteri Mas Kav. 62-63,Jl. Panjang No. 68  Kedoya, Kebon Jeruk, Jakarta (Barat) 11520www.examitrasolusi.co.id "
49,Data Analyst,PT So Good Food (Divisi Distribusi),Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - daan mogot,,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," PriasingleUsia 20 - 29 TahunPendidikan min. s1 Statistik / Matematika / IT .Pengalaman sebagai Data Analyst min. 1 tahun diperusahaan FMCG.Detail Oriented , berfikir analitis , Bertanggung jawab.Menguasai Ms. Office terutama Excel (Formula).Mampu mengoperasikan SAP lebih disukai.Mampu membuat Daily Report, Monthly Report, dan Forecasting lebih disukai.Domisili di Cengkareng, Jakarta Barat.    "
50,Digital Data Analyst / Social Media Specialist,Dipstrategy (Jakarta),Jakarta Timur (Jakarta Raya) - Matraman,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Digital Data Analyst (DDA) main responsibility is to analyze the digital data coming from the websites, social media account, and other sources. Capture the key finding and transform it into competitive evaluation report to support client's and internal management strategic decision. 
 
Job Description:

Evaluating the performance of the digital assets using a variety of analytic tools including Google Analytics
Analyzing website strategies and translating qualitative data into recommendations and tactics for revising the strategies
Managing SEM campaigns
Building and tracking backlinks through creative contents, promotions, social media and online public relations

QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor degree or equivalent from reputable university or college, preferably majoring Statistics, max. 32 y.o
2 years experience in digital marketing
In-depth understanding of Google Analytics, AdWords, and Webmaster Tool
Have an excellent analytical skills
Able to write and speak english fluently will be an advantage

 "
51,Data Analyst / Sports Trader,"OLE Group Philippines, Inc.","Makati City  (National Capital Reg, Philippines) - Chino Roces Avenue",,Call Center/IT-Enabled Services/BPO,Min 1 year (1-4 Yrs Experienced Employee),201 - 500 Employees," Job Description:Monitoring of analysis/odds schedules.Compilation and trading of sports products for a variety of markets and sports.Delivering a competitive report regarding odds and range of bets analysis.Be able to monitor prices and control liabilities for a set of sports.Communicate effectively with superiors in order to make informed trading decision in a time critical environment.To carry out all other reasonable requests or objectives to an acceptable standard and agreed timelines.Creating and settling betting markets for various sports depend on team.To assist the division supervisor/HOD to weed out Smart Punters and Bonus Hunters.Requirements:- Chinese speaking (Mandarin & Hokkien) and reading- Fresh Graduate of College, High School or its Equivalent- Very Good knowledge in Microsoft Office Excel and computer skill is a must- With good Mathematics skills- Can Understand English (reading and writing)- Willing to learn and can work 11 hours a day (with 1 Rest day per week)- Adaptable in Shifting Schedules (rotation of night and noon time schedule)- Can start immediately and requirements are ready and available (school records, medical certificate (fit to work), national ID, Passport, 8 pcs 2x2"" and 1x1"" ID pictures in white background)- Willing to be relocated in Makati City, PhillippinesWe Offer a competitive compensation and benefit package with a promising career growth whilst working in a safe and dynamic environment for the successful candidate.  Compensation Package:Competitive SalaryAccommodationAnnual leave benefitMedical BenefitMeal ProvisionsThis position is URGENT We undergo Proper RECRUITMENT CHANNELS AND PROCEDURES. The company is not liable for any FAKE Job Placement and misrepresentations. We do not ask for any MONEY to be sent to us for any purpose of employment. Please feel free to email us for verification. Thank you.An authorized HR Recruitment Officer will be transacting the process with our OFFICIAL Company Email Address. You can verify from us by sending further inquiry on our official company contact number and website. "
52,Jr. data Analyst - JAKARTA,PT Home Credit Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Responsibilities :Cooperate and communicate the report needs with other function so it will give the targeted information which will be useful for the other function.Utilize systems to create routine reports to meet user needsMonitoring and optimizing customer experience SQL Job to ensure the standardized processManage database report, structure, report & presentation format standardizationDoing Ad Hoc any analysis if the data needed by the head functionProvide supporting data requested for research purposes Requirements :At least Diploma from Information Technology or related computer studyAt least 1 year working experience in position related to data analysis or data scientistFirst Graduate are welcome to applyStrong experience in SQL languageAdvance Microsoft Excel skillsAnalytical thinkingAble to work in dynamic and fast-paced environment  "
53,Data Analyst,PT Jaya Ekspress Transindo,"Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Jl. Biak No. 46A,  Cideng,  Central Jakarta",Below expected salary,Transportation/Logistics,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," Job Descriptions:
 
- Work closely with operations leader as a data-driven advisor and partner on strategic issues
- Execute quantitive analysis that translate data into actionable insight
- Provide analytical and data-driven decision making support for key projects
- Develop new insights and analysis that inform decisions aand help opertions team
- Provide reporting and performance monitoring using date drawn from diverse sources
 
Requirements:
 

Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree in Mathematics, Statistic or equivalent.
Experience to performing Quantitative/Statistical Analysis.
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience Data Analyst or in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): statistical analysis, quantitative methode, SQL, data analyst.
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Logistics/Supply Chain or equivalent.
Placement in Cideng, Central Jakarta
 "
54,DATA ANALYST,PT Oze Mitra Nusantara,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," 
DATA ANALYST
 
RESPONSIBILITIES :
 

Work with local product manager to support product operations. 
Work with regional product and dev teams to define data and metrics to be measured. 
Analyze data to derive business insights. 
Generate KPI reporting and operations reporting. 
Product testing across web and mobile platforms. 
Work closely with dev team to prioritize and address product fixes. 
Facilitate business requirements into product changes or features. 


QUALIFICATIONS :
 

Undergraduate in business, math, statistics, finance, or accounting. 
Minimum 2 years full-time career work experience. 
Strong with data analsis and SQL queries. 
Ability to manage multiple projects and initiatives under tight deadlines. 
Entrepreneurial drive and ability to excel in a startup environment. 
Excellent communication skills including speaking, presenting, writing. 
Excellent in English, both verbal and written skills. 
Proactive and high sense of responsibility, ambitious, willing to learn, hardworking. 
Comfortable in a small, intense and high-growth startup environment. 

 "
55,Data Analyst,PT Julo Teknologi Perdana,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Kota Kasablanka,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
About JULO:
 
JULO (www.julo.co.id) is a digital lending company that is revolutionizing access to financial products for millions of emerging consumers in Indonesia. The Company has developed the first digital data-driven credit underwriting and risk assessment platform to process consumer loan applications and determine their creditworthiness using its mobile app.
 
Established in late 2016, JULO deployed its lending platform in Jakarta and surrounding cities, and the Company is about to enter a hyper-growth period. Expansion to the rest of Indonesia is expected to complete within a year. JULO is based in Jakarta and is backed by leading venture capital firms in Indonesia and Singapore.
 
We are looking for a highly motivated, data analyst who loves statistics and technology with excellent problem solving skills and an eye for business matters. You are an effective communicator and problem solver who can drill down to the core issues quickly, develop alternative solutions and effectively communicate actionable insights.
 
Roles and Responsibilities:

Independently develop problem definitions and hypotheses, analyze and produce data-driven, actionable insights and present and communicate results in a clear and concise manner.
Gather and import data from different sources, write your own SQL queries, reshape, wrangle and cleanse data for quantitative analysis.
Help in developing machine learning applications and solutions.
Understand and able to explain the assumptions and (statistical) limitations of your analysis and data. Mindful and careful in interpreting results correctly.
Develop beautiful and concise presentations, reports and dashboards.
Work hand-in-hand with your fellow data scientists, data engineers, operators and the product team to design and deploy data-driven solutions with high business value.


You should have:

Exceptional CAN-DO ATTITUDE
Min 3yrs experience working in a data analyst, BI or equivalent position.
Min 2yr experience in data modelling scripting language such as SQL, R, or equivalent.
Solid understanding of SQL, independently able to query databases, perform and apply joins, aggregates, filters and search patterns.
Solid communication skills (Bahasa Indonesia and English)
You are curious, analytical, fast learning and have excellent problem-solving skills
Not afraid to get your hands dirty whilst working with messy data and unstructured problems
You must be results-oriented and willing to work in a fast and dynamic environment
Familiar with Quantitative Analysis, Statistical Analysis and Modelling Excellent data visualization and presentation skills
An interest and willingness to learn about AI / Machine Learning and Data Science.
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or similar advanced degree

 
Nice to have experience in any of the following:

Python data stack: Numpy, Pandas, Scipy, Scikit-learn or equivalent in R or Scala Experience in Quantitative Analysis, Statistical modelling / Machine Learning
Presentation/BI tools: Tableau, Jupyter, Kibana, Bimo, Superset, Excel, Powerpoint
Linear Algebra, (Multivariate) Calculus, Applied Mathematics and Statistics, Algorithms and complex optimization
Master’s Degree in Engineering or Computer Science

Contact:
E-mail your resume under the header Data Analyst to martijn(at)julofinance(dot)com. Due to the high volume of CVs received, we contact only those applicants whose qualifications best match the position requirements.
 
_________________________________________________________________
 

JULO in the News:
 
Reuters (http://www.reuters.com/brandfeatures/venture-capital/article?id=13214) Tech in Asia (https://www.techinasia.com/julo-seed-skystar-capital)
Daily Social (https://dailysocial.id/post/layanan-kta-online-julo-peroleh-pendanaan-awal/) Digital News Asia (https://www.digitalnewsasia.com/startups/julo-raises-seed-funding-led-
skystar)


 "
56,D&IM Analyst – Data Governance,HSBC,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," Some careers shine brighter than others. 
 
If you’re looking for a role that will help you stand out at HSBC, take a look at how you can fulfil your potential.
 
Retail Banking and Wealth Management serves more than 50 million customers worldwide with a complete range of banking and wealth management services to enable them to manage their finances and protect and build their financial futures. It is a global business that brings together management responsibility for Retail Banking, Wealth Management, Insurance and Asset Management with a focus on customer-centric propositions and innovative and efficient distribution channels.
 
We are currently seeking an experienced professional to join this team in the role D&IM Analyst – Data Governance.
 
Responsibilities:
 
The Information Management analyst role is an entry level position focused on supporting their direct management and client base in achieving the strategic and tactical information needs of the organization. 
 
Requirements:
 

A minimum of 0-2 years proven experience, marketing and/or database management experience or equivalent.
Bachelor’s degree, or equivalent, in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field.
Proficiency with personal computer and UNIX, as well as pertinent mainframe systems and software packages or equivalent, including experience in handling large databases and strong SQL (Structured Query Language) and/or SAS query writing and programming skills.
Communications, analytical, organizational, project management and planning skills.
A high degree of professional competence.

 
You’ll achieve more at HSBC
 
HSBC is committed to building a culture where all employees are valued, respected and opinions count. We take pride in providing a workplace that fosters continuous professional development, flexible working and opportunities to grow within an inclusive and diverse environment. "
57,Data Analyst,PT Ultra Prima Abadi (Orang Tua Group),Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Work closely with management to prioritize business and information needs

 
REQUIREMENTS :

Age between 24 - 30 years old
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Information System, Information Technology, Industrial Engineering, Mathematics, Statistic or equivalent with minimum GPA 3.00 from reputable university
Candidate must be in good health condition and free from drugs.
Fresh graduates are welcomed to apply.
1 Full Time position is available
 "
58,Senior Data Analyst,PT Daya Maha Berkarya ( IRIS WORLDWIDE),Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 5 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Responsible for working with clients of the company to provide customer level analytical and statistical modeling support. Play an important role in marketing measurement and decision-making processes.

Assist account service teams with effective direct mail, e-mail, advertising, telemarketing and web test/control design and performance measurement
Apply statistical techniques to develop and deploy predictive models in support of customer acquisition, cross-sell, retention and win-back strategies
Provide ongoing tracking, measurements and analytical support of standalone and fully integrated marketing campaign
Provide secondary support for account service on customer mining, analytics and insight
Work with internal technology teams to create or improve prospect database, data warehouse, marketing datamarts data and lead management systems
Provide robust campaign back-end analyses, along with recommendations for future campaign enhancements

Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in Business, Statistics, Engineering, Math, or other similar quantitative field required, Master's degree preferred
Strong communication and organizational skills
5+ years hands-on experience utilizing database systems and applied statistical analysis and programming in a business environment
Experience with a wide range of statistical techniques (i.e cluster analysis, regression analysis, linear programming, neural networks, etc)
Proficient with SPSS Programming and/or other statistical software. Familiarity with SQL/Enterprise Miner and SPSS
Experience working within multi sectors environment is a plus
Experience supporting customer relationship management strategies preferred
 "
59,Campaign Data Analyst,AIMIA,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," What is the focus of this role?
The focus of the role is to work primarily with our campaign management software, to build, design and deliver the campaign for key clients across all business units.
 
Responsibilities include:

Design support, build and delivery of campaigns including audience selection, segmentation and output of final targeting files for use in Campaign solutions tools
Ensure robust QC processes are in place and documented, act swiftly and escalate where errors are identified
Writing SQL codes to comply business requirement of clients to produce various list of targeted customer for campaign based on complex transactional, behavioural and personal data sources held by Aimia

Essential skills and experience:

University degree in numerate discipline (desirable)
Interest and awareness of the latest marketing trends and technology (desirable)
Excellent in writing complex SQL codes (procedure, function, etc.) to deliver data segmentation and extraction
Knowledge of the principles of direct and email marketing
Knowledge of the principles of RDBMS and data warehouses
Excellent written and verbal communication skills in English
Exposure to Silverpop, ExactTarget, or similar.
First experience with marketing campaign management software (i.e: Adobe, Salesforce, Marketo, IBM Unica) is a plus point

Useful characteristics include:

Desire to work with data, perform advanced campaign and market analysis, or to develop their career in the campaign arena.
Pro-active, collaborative and inquisitive attitude
Ability to produce desired results within strict deadlines
Strong work ethic, analytical thinking, detail oriented and process driven
Excellent interpersonal & team working skills

  "
60,Senior Data Analyst,PT Ewaysindo Makmur,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Jl. Proklamasi No. 47 Pegangsaan - Menteng,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," JOB DESC:

Doing Data Selection & Preparation and Data Analysis using different data mining methods such as descriptive statistics, clustering, classification, regression, association rules, etc.
Create analytics report based on findings.
Ensure compliance in related tasks with opportunity and regulatory policies and procedures and deliver on-call support for critical analytic applications as needed.

 
BASIC REQUIREMENT:

Bachelor degree or master degree majoring in Statistics/Mathematics/Computer Science/Engineering/Econometrics
Minimum 5 years’ experience with data analyst
Willing to learn new things especially related to CRM
Strong interest in data discovery, statistical analysis, and segmentation
Strong research capability in data analytics with research experience in CRM is preferred
Understanding and prior usage of Microsoft Excel Macro, R and other data mining tools.
Driven Attitude, a hard worker that is keen to take on new challenges, and is able to meet tight deadlines
High initiative, curious, creative and persistent. A person who always willing to learn and have great passion about data analysis, technology and agriculture industry
Possess high logical thinking, good attention to detail and able to work in a team
Excellent listening, writing, speaking skills in both Bahasa Indonesia and English
	 

 "
61,Data Analyst,NMS Recruitment,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 15,000,000 - IDR 20,000,000",Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," One of our clients, a leading international Mail Order Selling company, is currently expanding its ASEAN network in terms of digital channels. To support their development, they are looking for passionate certified Data Analysts. The successful candidate will be able to turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. They will conduct full lifecycle analysis, and monitor performance and quality control plans to identify potential improvements.
 
English is a must, as the job may be based in Vietnam or Indonesia. The ideal candidate will be an open-minded person who is able to work under pressure within tight schedules. We are looking for someone with rigor, pragmatism, and an analytical mindset.
 
Job responsibilities:



Interpret data provided by various outputs (Google Analytics, social networks, website,…), analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports




Implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality


Scores building


Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems


Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets


Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems


Work with management to prioritize business and information needs


Locate and define new process improvement opportunities


 
Job requirements:



Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst


Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques


Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc), databases (SQL), programming (XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)


Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc)


Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy


Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings


BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics


 


  "
62,Data Analyst (Kode: DA_SEP1),PT Exa Mitra Solusi,Jakarta Raya,,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Data AnalystKode : DA_SEP1Lokasi : JAKARTA BARATKualifikasi :Pria/Wanita, Max 30 tahun.Pendidkan minimal S1 Matematika/Statistika.Mampu mengoperasikan program microsoft Excel (Vlookup, Hlookup, Pivot Tabel, Chart) is a mustMampu mengoperasikan SPSS menjadi nilai TambahTerbiasa dengan pengolahan dan analisa dataBerpengalaman di bagian analisa data selama 1 tahun lebih diutamakanSehat jasmani dan rohani.Menyukai pekerjaan yang repetitif/berulang (pekerjaan yang monoton)Bukan pribadi yang pembosanBersedia lembur Bila dibutuhkanTugas dan Tanggung Jawab :Mengolah dan menganalisa data penjualan untuk mengetahui faktor yang mempengaruhi penjualanMembuat laporan dan presentasi hasil analisa data Kirimkan Surat lamaran, CV terbaru lengkap, Fotokopi : KTP, Ijazah & Transkrip Nilai, Kartu Keluarga (KK) Terbaru, Pas Foto 4x6 cm, Surat Referensi/Keterangan kerja sebelumnya (bila memiliki pengalaman kerja wajib menyertakan surat keterangan/referensi kerja), serta Surat Keterangan Catatan Kepolisian (SKCK) ke alamat berikut :PT.  EXA  MITRA  SOLUSIGraha Arteri Mas Kav. 62-63,Jl. Panjang No. 68  Kedoya, Kebon Jeruk, Jakarta (Barat) 11520www.examitrasolusi.co.id "
63,Information Technology Staff,PT Prospect Motor - Main Dealer Honda Outside Java,Cikarang (Jawa Barat) - PT. Prospect Motor Lippo Cikarang Bekasi,,Automobile/Automotive Ancillary/Vehicle,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Preferred experience in .net programming, experience in data and system analyst, strong working knowledge in .net/c#, MSSQL, Javascript, logical thinking with natural problem solving skill, Understand in trading company business process, selflearner (i.e. able to make good assumptions and search for solutions before asking for help), good communication skills, having knowledge about database concept. ERP concept and User Interface
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
64,Sales Administration Staff,PT Sukses Mantap Sejahtera,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Menara Thamrin,,Manufacturing/Production,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree in Business Studies/Administration/Management, Marketing, Mass Communications or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Sales Report, Distribution, Customer Service, Data Analyst, Purchase Request, Purchase Order, Tender
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Sales - Retail/General or equivalent.
 "
65,Head of IT Application & Operation,MNC Investama Tbk,Jakarta Raya,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),201 - 500 Employees," Requirements :

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication) or equivalent.
At least 5 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position with minimum 2 years in Management Level
Required Skill(s): Applications, Application Delivery, Application Development, Business Intelligence, Business Analyst, Coding, Database, Data Storage, Hardware, Helpdesk, Information System, Networks, Operation, Programming, Product Development, Project Management, Software
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
Strong Leadership and Management, Analytical and Problem Solving skills
Can interact effectively with People Across Different Department/Levels and Drive Progress Project/Initiative/Issues to Completion/Closure
Have knowledge in IT especially in Financial industry is preferable, especially in Leasing company
Excellent interpersonal and communication skill

 
Responsibilities :


Identify IT Area for improvement, develop improvement program and monitor the implementation to increase process efficiency, cost effectiveness, or increase productivity
Lead and Manage Internal/External Team on Application Solution Delivery, IT Project Management, System and Infrastructure Operations
Manage day-to-day system operations and ensure users support is responsive and efficient
Lead, coordinate and maintain the IT system procedures and standards to maximize efficiency and standardization of IT system throughout the company
Ensure projects meet established time, cost and technical objectives
Drive IT initiatives to support business efficiency, operation and growth
Identify and develop system application supporting company operation and ensure alignment between IT and Business.

 "
66,Head of Insight,PT Zanroo Tech Indonesia,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Jln. Jend. Sudirman Kav 3-4,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 10 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 10 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Market Research, Data Analyst
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
 "
67,Finance Analyst,PT Agro Boga Utama,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Bintaro,,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Finance/Accountancy/Banking or equivalent.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Data Analyst, Finance Analyst, Ms. Excel, Good Analitic, Consumer good
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Finance - General/Cost Accounting or equivalent.
 "
68,Technical Sales (Pre Sales),PT Cybertrend Intrabuana,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Please join us and being part of an awesome, fun and dynamic work environment team’s  as a Technical Sales with the  following qualifications:
 

Min. Bachelor Degree in Computer Science/ IT/ Software Engineering or related fields;
Familiar with Business Intelligence product such as: Tableau/ Qlikview/ Microstrategy is preferred;
Familiar with commonly ETL tools such as: Pentaho/ Informatica / Data Stage/ SSIS is preferred
Experienced with Data Warehouse concepts and principles
Experiences on developing the BI roadmap architecture deliverable, to include components such as current states, pros and cons, and recommendation reports;
Excellent  on Communication and presentation skill
Excellent on writing skill on technical proposal
Experience on  presenting technical concepts to executive-level business persons
Good presentation skill, especially experienced on presenting technical concepts to executive-level business persons
Familiar with Big Data platform such as: Cloudera/ MapR/ Hortonworks is preferred
Having knowledge in Business Process for Enterprise, Government and Commercial industry.


Role & Responsibiity:

Responsible for working closely with  Account Manager’s team  to develop a suitable project plan that meets the client’s needs;
Join teams as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) of that particular area or industry; 
Understand how business intelligence reporting solutions fit within an enterprise data model and within data architecture.
As part of The Solution Architect team  with the performance optimization of such solutions
As part of cross-functional, and work together with Sales and delivery team to design and build end-to-end business intelligence and data warehouse solutions.
Responsible to conduct assessments of clients’ requirements (technical and business) and document requirements and translated in to the technical proposal and solution roadmaps. 
Possess the ability to present of both technical and business process, to capture requirements and translate them into technical development specifications (i.e. data mapping documentation). 
Be able to define the BI solution architecture vision and ensure alignment with the business’ goals, any technical risks are clearly defined and understood  by clients Know how to apply applications and analytical reporting, aligned tools and techniques, and a service-oriented data delivery attitude for near real-time reporting.
Full-Time and Contract position(s) available.


  "
69,CREDIT ANALYST OFFICER,PT ZMG Telekomunikasi Servise Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Telecommunication,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
RESPONSIBILITIES:
 

To review and verify APP users’ information,
To audit the documents submitted by customers,
Collect other necessary documents and information to support credit decisions;
Actively propose more opinions and suggestions to optimize the work flow.

 
REQUIREMENTS:


Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in any field.
Candidate shall have experiences in tele-marketing, online customer service, or credit analysis officer.
Required language(s): Mandarin, English
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Microsoft Office, Tele-marketing, Customer Service, Call Center, Data Verification, Data Analysis, Computer, Communication
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Customer Service or equivalent.
Candidate lives in Jakarta Barat or Utara is preferred
Able to join immediately
Hard working, honest and able to work under-pressured
Good analytical thinking and communication skill
 "
70,Corporate  Strategy & Investor Relations Manager,PT DCI Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," Requirement:• Working experience in related job 3-5 years• Familiar with Financial Modeling• Experience in Transaction Service and Corporate Finance• Form the big four audit firms• Excellent in English• University Degree from reputable University, Overseas University more high value• Willing to learn, energetic and proactive• Must be able to develop relationship at all levels of organization• Good project management, problem solving, time-management, communication and presentation skills and able to work under pressure• Should possess computer knowledge, Familiar with MS Office applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook) Job description:• part of finance team, resporting directly to finance director and GM of finance and accounting.• Responsible for financial model, monthly reporting and work closely with senior management to put together business plan, market analytics and assess potential project and business opportunities in data center space. "
71,Digital Research Analyst,Kompas Gramedia Group of Magazine,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Kebon Jeruk,,Journalism,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Kualifikasi :
- Pendidikan min. S1 Riset/ Bisnis/ Marketing
- Memahami tentang metode riset, terutama terkait digital 
- Mampu melakukan pengumpulan data tentang trend dunia digital
- Mampu melakukan monitoring dan evaluasi atas performa website dan social media
- Mampu menggunakan berbagai analytic tools, antara lain google analytic, facebook insight, socialbaker, similiarweb,    buzzsumo, dll
- Mampu melakukan evaluasi SEO atas sebuah website
- Mampu membuat laporan presentasi
- Kemampuan Bahasa Inggris
 

 "
72,Database Analyst,PT Ramayana Lestari Sentosa Tbk,Jakarta Raya,,Retail/Merchandise,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Job Description

Maintain Database with Data Software like SQL, Oracle, Etc
Software Maintenance
Data Analysis

 
Qualification

Maximum 27 Years Old
At Least Completed Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Information Technology
Fresh Graduated are Welcomed to Apply
Understand and Know how to use Database Software like SQL
Have an Active English Language (Fluent)

 
 
 "
73,Risk Analyst Management,Nusantara Sakti Group,"Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Gd. Victoria lt. 5,  Jl. Tomang Raya 37,  Tomang",Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Job Description:

Perform data preparation activities from various internal and external sources
Conduct data analytics using various statistical methodologies to identify and assess risk factors
Develop appropriate data modelling, visualization and analytic reports

Requirements:

Bachelor Degree in Economic/ Statistics/ System Information/ Mathematics
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Have good knowladge in statistics for business
Have passion and curiosity in data with strong analytical skills and attention to detail and accuracy
Excelents skills in Microsoft Excel
Understand basic concepts and terms in economic and financial analysis/reporting
Have knowledge of various external data sources

 
  "
74,Business Analyst,PT Param Mitra Coal Movers,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Mega Kunigan,,Mining,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job description:
 

general fire fighting, including but not limited to
	
liasing with operational team at mine sites in East Kalimantan
giving business analysis support to group's new assets under development


assist GM in various tasks,
	
collecting and analyzing data
preparation of presentations
join in meetings and negotiations
drafting of contracts


This is a very wide role where responsibilities and tasks will grow naturally;  it will suit a numbers driven individual with previous big-4 consultancy experience who's looking to get their hands dirty.

 
 
Qualifications required:
 

S1 in economics or finance from reputable university, BBA is a plus
top tier consulting experience is a plus
previous exposure to M&A transactions
minimum 2 years working experience
should be able to draft presentations, business plans and shall need be, contracts
Willing to take on new tasks and responsibilities; this will suit a data driven generalist type

 
Setting:
 

work location is Mega Kuningan, travel to sites in East Kalimantan is required at least once a month.
 "
75,Customer Resolutions Analyst,PT Bank Commonwealth,Jakarta Raya,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," Job Summary: Mendukung dan memastikan visi PTBC yaitu “to excel at securing and enhancing the financial wellbeing of people, businesses and communities” melalui pemantauan harian penanganan keluhan dan proses resolusinya melalui pencatatan dan menindaklanjuti pengaduan serta pertanyaan secara keseluruhan untuk mencapapai kepuasan atas kebutuhan nasabah. Job Description:Mengirimkan semua masukan, pertanyaan, dan pengaduan yang diterima dari nasabah melalui semua saluran kepada seluruh unit terkait pada hari yang sama. Memantau seluruh masukan, pertanyaan, dan pengaduan diselesaikan dengan tanggap dan sesuai dengan peraturan Bank Indonesia dan OJK melalui CHS (Complaint Handling System) Membuat Laporan Penanganan Pengaduan pada waktu yang telah ditetapkan. Mengkoordinasikan data  pertanyaan nasabah melalui Customer Care, yang dilakukan setiap bulannya Memberikan sosialisasi rutin terkait penanganan pengaduan nasabah kepada unit terkait Memonitor semua pengaduan yang sedang oleh unit kerja terkait untuk diselesaikan sesuai dengan peraturan OJK dan Bank Indonesia Memperbaiki proses penyelesaian pengaduan dan menyelesaikan permasalah nasabah Sebagai level eskalasi untuk pengaduan yang tidak dapat di selesaikan oleh front liners dan contact center Job Requirements:Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Economics, Finance/Accountancy/Banking, Human Resource Management, Business Studies/Administration/Management, Mass Communications or equivalent.At least 2 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Banking/Financial Services or equivalent.Full-Time position(s) available. "
76,Chemical Analyst,Reckitt Benckiser Indonesia,Jawa Barat - Cileungsi,,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Job Description:


Prepare analysis schedule based on superior's instruction.
Pre-check of the room, equipments and instruments to ensure its satisfactory functioning should be conducted daily or prior to using its for performing analytical tests.
Chemical testing and physical inspection of water, bulk, finished product and raw material should follow the instructions given in the relevant test procedure for each material or product.
Take the measurement data analysis of bulk or finished products, recording and documenting as authentic proof and evidence of data analysis to draw the conclusion of analysis and report to the superiors.
Maintain and secure equipment, instrument and tools that necessary to perform analysis with good, careful and efficient.
Prepare Reference Standar of reagent, material or product as specified in the current procedure for testing and to store these standards under proper conditions.
Maintain chemical waste, disposal and record as per waste disposal procedure.Monitoring schedule for the analysis to be accomplished in accordance with a predetermined work instructions.
Monitoring function and condition of tools, instruments, equipments and reagents that necessary for the analysis process.
Coordinating with the production team, or other parties that related with the sample analysis in QC Laboratorium and/or in a third party.
Reported the result of analysis carried out in the form of report that have been provide and/or included with the authentic evidence and submit it to the superior.


Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least a SMK, Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Chemistry or equivalent.
At least 1 year(s) of working experience as analyst.
Have experience in working at Consumer Goods, Healthcare, Food & Beverage, Cosmetic, or Pharmaceutical Industries.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Chemistry or equivalent.
Contract position(s) available.
 "
77,System Analyst,PT Mandiri Utama Finance,Jakarta Raya,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Persyaratan Khusus:

Memahami konsep datawarehouse
Memiliki kemampuan dalam menggunakan Tools Analysis dan reporting data seperti SAS, QlikView, Tablue
Memiliki kemampuan dalam penggunaan ETL Jobs dan SSIS packages
Memiliki kemampuan develop  dashboard report dengan menggunakan Dimension Hierarchies, Level  based measures, aggregation rules.

Persyaratan Umum:

Pendidikan S-1 Komputer/ Informatika/Elektro/Elektronika/Fisika/Matematika/Telekomunikasi dari universitas dengan akreditasi A.
Pengalaman kerja 2-5 tahun sebagai Business Intelligence Analyst.
Dapat  bekerja di bawah tekanan, bekerjasama dalam tim, mempunyai inisiatif, dan
semangat kerja yang tinggi.
Memiliki kemampuan analisis dan logika yang baik.
Memiliki kemampuan programming yang baik.
Memiliki kemampuan design Report yang baik.

 "
78,Credit Analyst,PT Mandiri Utama Finance,"Jakarta Raya, Jawa Barat, Jawa Tengah, Jawa Timur, Kalimantan Timur, Sulawesi Selatan",,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Deskripsi Pekerjaan

Melakukan analisa kelayakan kredit konsumen
Melakukan pengecekan deduplikasi, Additional Order / Repeat Order / Black list calon nasabah.
Melakukan analisa kelayakan  kredit dan memberikan keputusan atas  aplikasi kredit dengan mengutamakan aspek kehati-hatian (prudensitas) pada menu approval level 1 dan/atau form SAP.
Melakukan survey on the spot atas aplikasi permohonan kredit baru bila diperlukan
Menerima, memeriksa, dan mengisi checklist Map PK beserta dokumen kelengkapannya.
Melakukan verifikasi seluruh informasi pendukung persyaratan kredit nasabah.
Membuat rekomendasi keputusan dan mendistribusikannya kepada Komite Kredit  diatasnya
Menjalankan kebijakan red area dan memberikan rekomendasi area-area yang tidak dapat diberikan kredit berdasarkan data historical serta membuat daftar black list area yang lengkap.
Melakukan aktivitas resurvey nasabah bila diperlukan
Membuat  dan memeriksa  Branch Credit Report dan laporan-laporan lainnya yang besifat tidak rutin (insidentil).
Bertanggung jawab atas tercapainya target KPI .
Menjalankan kebijakan kredit perusahaan sesuai dengan SOP yang berlaku.
Melakukan bedah kasus dari KPI bila diperlukan.

 
Persyaratan

Usia max 35 tahun
Pendidikan min. D3 semua jurusan
Minimal pengalaman 2 tahun  diposisi yang sama
Memiliki kemampuan analisa
Teliti, jujur, ulet
Integritas
Inisiatif
Leadership
Mampu mengoperasikan computer Ms. Office
Penempatan di seluruh cabang MUF Nasional

 
 "
79,Business Analyst,PT Samsung Electronics Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Electrical & Electronics,Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Samsung R&D Institute Indonesia – we are one of Samsung Research & Development centers among other global R&D hubs. We focuses on building global content, service, and technology solutions across diverse domains, projects, products, clients, people, and countries and also conduct research in new and emerging areas of technology. Our global R&D team of researchers and engineers include more than 50.000 employees across 42 global research facilities – each one collaborating on strategic technologies to forge new market trends and set new standards of excellence.
We always looking for outstanding global talents and our future leaders, who are welcome and vital for us as we grow and evolve into a truly global enterprise. We are on the cusp of the next chapter of our history. So join us as BUSINESS ANALYST  and make a real contribution to shaping our future, and bringing the next big thing to life

Business Analyst:

Job Summary:
The candidate support overall admin requirement and report to the SRIN coordinator (Korean), escalate to Head of SRIN (if any) and responsible for preparing any financial statements, compliance process administration and reporting. He/She must work within the Financial Management policies align with HQ and SEINS (local subs) procedures and compliances.
 
Qualifications:

At least 3 to 8 years of experience on Finance and Accounting with some supervisory skills
Min Bachelor degrees in Business Administration, MBA or any related Master degrees from reputable universities will be point plus
The candidate has experience of final responsibility for the quality and content of all related financial data, reporting and audit coordination for either a Group or significant project area, and has preferably overseen a human resources function previously (within a project)
Chartered Financial Analyst and the Certified Treasury Professional credentials or any related certification will be point plus
Strong English/Korean communication skill, in written and oral
Bahasa Indonesia as major communication with local people will be point plus.

 
Desired Skills and Experience:

Good team building and strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good in communication, effective verbal and written communications skills (incl with local people)
Good in computer skills including the ability to operate computerized accounting, spreadsheet and wordprocessing programs at a highly proficient level
A multi-tasker with the ability to wear many hats in a fast-paced environment - balanced and solid stress and time management skills
A successful track record in setting priorities; keen analytic, organization and problem solving skills which support and enable sound decision making
 "
80,Operational Administrasi Control,PT Mega Central Finance,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Slipi,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," 
Mengecek dan melakukan approval sistem pembayaran komisi perantara
Mengecek angsuran via tranfer dari konsumen  dan karyawan
Mengecek keuangan admin dealer

 
Requirements :
 

Pendidikan terakhir minimal S1 segala jurusan
Usia maksimal 28 tahun
Menguasai Ms.Office
Teliti dan tekun dalam bekerja
Mampu bekerja dalam tim
Bersedia ditempatkan di Slipi
Kuat dalam menganalisa data
 "
81,System Analyst,PT Inzpire Technology,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - jl. Johar no. 9,"IDR 3,000,000 - IDR 3,900,000",Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Less than 1 year experience),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Less than 1 year experience specialized in IT/Computer - Network/System/Database Admin or equivalent.

 
System Analyst Job Responsibilities:


Analyze and design functional specification products and produce SRS, SAD, and SDD.
 
System Analyst Job Duties:

Identify opportunities that can improve efficiency of business processes
Analyze data contained in the company’s product database and identify data integrity issues with existing and proposed systems and implement solutions
Provides reference by writing documentation
Dealing directly with clients about accessing system and products
Assist in the creation of the system design and functional specifications for all new development products
Responsible to create system requirements, business process, and needs for projects
Analyze current on-going system and its needs
Design and create database model
Modelling application design in structure diagram and behavior diagram using UML application
Develops solution by preparing and evaluating alternative workflow solutions
Works with tester/quality assurance to set up scenario test for software testing from system requirements
 "
82,Municipal Rating Analyst,PT Pemeringkat Efek Indonesia (PEFINDO),Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 4 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Responsibilities

Conduct the rating of local governments (provinces, districts, cities) in Indonesia
Approach with the local government, finance department and other financial institutions (eg. World Bank and Asian Development Bank)
Collect and manage data related to the analysis of the client's rating
Prepare a report analyzing the results of the rating and made a presentation to the rating committee members  
Monitoring the client's condition and conduct special monitoring if necessary
Establish and maintain a good relationships with all clients and municipal institutions

 
Requirements

Min. Bachelor Degree in Accounting/Finance Management, preferebly majoring from Government Accounting
Excellent academic result (min. GPA 3.00)
Min. 4 years of work experience as an Auditor of local governments or related fields
Required skills: government accounting, public finance and local government analysis
Excellent presentation and communication skill
Fluent in English both oral and written
Full-Time position available

 "
83,Trade Compliance Senior Analyst - Manufacturing,Energizer Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.,Jakarta Raya,Above expected salary,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 5 years (Senior Executive),51 - 200 Employees," This is Energizer Holdings, Inc.We’re leading the charge as the new Energizer, connecting our brands, our people and the products we offer the world. Together, we’re creating a game plan for the future – one that defines where and how we’ll play, and what it takes to win. Our 5,000 colleagues hail from all backgrounds, nationalities and walks of life, but our shared values and passion for winning make us one team. Whatever your specialty, you’ll find that excelling at Energizer Holdings provides opportunities to grow in ways you never expected. Position SummaryThe position will be responsible for ensuring compliance with Indonesia Customs regulations for Energizer Plant in Jakarta, Indonesia. This includes but is not limited to: HTS classifications, certificates of origin, record keeping, product marking compliance and import materials / equipment controls. The colleague will work closely with Customs Brokers in Indonesia, plant personnel and governmental agencies to provide 100% accurate declarations to Indonesia Customs. AccountabilitiesPerform import operational activities and resolve day-to-day issues that may result in border delaysConduct training and be focal contact to local affiliates on matters concerning import compliance requirementsPrepare PIB documents for Customs clearance via EDI systemManage SNI registration process for relevant finished products with the SNI coordinator before importationProvide and submit monthly importation of MITA report to Indonesia CustomsEnsure correct recordkeeping of all import documents in accordance to local recordkeeping requirementsAssist the local affiliates with applications for special trade programs, supply chain security programs, and customs schemesParticipate in special projects that focus on driving efficiencies and/or cost savings for the companyAssists in developing and driving solutions/strategies to Trade Compliance issues faced by the businesses and the necessary controls around any changeEnsure and validate valuation issues, Free Trade Agreement status and Certificates of Origin are accurately issued and are in line with Headquarters COE determination for qualificationMaintain regular communication with Indonesia Customs to keep up to date of Indonesia Customs related regulations and lawsManage and review import/export database, processes and procedures to ensure accuracy of critical trade data in accordance with Indonesia Customs regulations and company Headquarters/Regional Hub requirementsManage and ensure proper import declaration and documents are provided by 3rd party agent (importer) and ensure correct recordkeeping of all their import documents in accordance to the local regulations Required Skills and ExperienceExcellent computer skills. Proficiency with Word, Excel, e-mail and internet applications.Excellent verbal / written communication skills.Strong attention to detail.Good record-keeping skills.Excellent organizational and prioritization skills.Ability to handle multiple tasks and projects simultaneously.Good analytical and problem-solving skills.5 years of experience in Indonesia Customs clearance activitiesProficiency in both English and Bahasa Indonesia is a MUST An Offer to Grow OnEnergizer offers a competitive compensation package which includes medical and retirement savings coverage, paid holidays. Energizer is an equal opportunity employer, and we prohibit discrimination based on age, color, disability, marital or parental status, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other legally protected status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws. "
84,Business Analyst Manufacturing Development,Panarub Group,Tangerang (Banten),,Manufacturing/Production,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job Descriptions:

Define configuration specifications and business analysis requirements
Perform quality assurance
Define reporting and alerting requirements
Own and develop relationship with partners, working with them to optimize and enhance our integration
Help design, document and maintain system processes
Report on common sources of technical issues or questions and make recommendations to product team
Communicate key insights and findings to product team
Constantly be on the lookout for ways to improve monitoring, discover issues and deliver better value to the customer

 
Job Requirements :

Demonstrable experience in marketing data analytics and tools
Experience in analysing data to draw business-relevant conclusions and in data visualization techniques and tools
Solid experience in writing SQL queries
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong written and verbal communication skills including technical writing skills
Having experience in online marketing field
Required language(s): English, Bahasa Indonesia and Mandarin

 "
85,Accounts Payable Senior Analyst,PT RGE Indonesia,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - MH Thamrin,Below expected salary,Others,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees,"  
Job Descriptions:

Perform accounts payable invoice, payment and day-to-day transaction processing and ensuring delivery quality in terms of accuracy, completeness and timeliness on a daily basis.
Create and maintain vendor master data information
Liaise with Business Groups for payment authorization.
Mentor and guide Analyst on SAP Accounts Payable functions and query resolution.
Act as a back up for Team Lead on daily task and as when required.
Attend to Common Shared Centre (CSC) communication channels e.g. email and assigned Helpdesk tickets.
Resolve vendor and Business Groups queries related to statement of accounts, invoices and payments information on timely basis.
Coordinate and ensure that Analyst attends to Common Shared Centre (CSC) communication channels and assigned Helpdesk ticket promptly.
Identify queries and assign it to relevant analyst to respond. 

 

Qualifications:

Employment: Permanent
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Business Studies/Administration/Management, Economics, Finance/Accountancy/Banking or equivalent.
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
English is a must in communication (writing, reading and conversation). 
SAP system knowledge is a must.
Microsoft Office literate.

 "
86,IT Business Analyst,Panarub Group,Tangerang (Banten) - Tangerang,Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job Descriptions:

Gather intelligence from corporate executives and middle managers about needs and future growth
Partner with application division to ensure each project meets a specific need and resolves successfully
Assume responsibility for project tasks and ensure they are completed in a timely frame.
Evaluate, test and recommend new opportunities for enhancing software, hardware and IT processes
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Evaluate and draw conclusions from data related to customer behavior
Consult with the executive team and the IT department on the newest technology and its implications in the industry  

 
Job Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Software Development, Computer Engineering, Project Management or related field
3+ years’ experience in a position related to information technology and familiar in technology development and deployment
Experience with Programming Language and database SQL Server / Postgre SQL as advantage
Having good analytical, troubleshooting, problem solving dan fast learner
Good Communication Skills and Energic
Working Location: Tangerang

 "
87,Business Analyst,PT Anabatic Technologies Tbk,"Tangerang (Banten) - Graha Anabatic,  Jl. Scientia Boulevard Kav. U2",,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Responsibilities :

Able to capture business requirement of the client and give suggestion of best practice to client
Able to understand SQL and queries
Able to do ETL (Extract Transformation Loading)
Business Analyst of the OSL Product in Compliance and Reporting Solutions
Constructing workflow charts, diagrams, studying system capabilities, writing functional specifications
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed
Determines and analyzing user requirements, gathering information, evaluating output requirements and formats, data mapping analysis
Doing internal testing and quality assurance
Improves systems by studying current practices, designing modifications
Maintains user confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential
Prepare technical reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information
Provides references for users by writing and maintaining user documentation, providing hep desk support, and training users
Recommends controls by identifying problem, writing improved procedures
Support and assisting client during UAT (User Acceptance Test) and UVT (User Verification Test)

Requirements

Maximum 28 years old
Minimum Bachelor Degree in IT, information system, computer science, computer accounting, management information system or related field
Minimum GPA 3.00 (scale 4.00)
Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Minimum experience 1-2 years as business analyst from banking industry or consultant IT
Strong knowledge of Loan System and Banking Operation
Knowledge of financial products is required
Required skills : SQL and accounting
Excellent documentation skills to drive Gap analysis, FSD, Use Cases, Flowcharts, training materials etc
Excellence in Microsoft office, Visio
Have good knowledge and experience in business process analyst and software development life cycle
Good knowledge in banking domain industry is preferable
Good communication in English both oral & written
Have good self motivation, fast learner, can do attitude, able to work as a tema or able to work independently, good administration skill
Able to work under required time and pressure
Strong analytical skill and problem solving
Willing to work in mobile environment
Willing to be located in Gading Serpong, Tangerang, or occasionally visit clients in Jakarta area

 
 "
88,Auto Dialer Admin and Strategy Analyst,PT Digital Solutions Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology, Mathematics, Physics or equivalent.
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Banking/Financial Services or equivalent.
2 years and above relevant experience in data mining, analyzing the big volume of data
Experience in credit risks or collection portfolio analysis will be the advantage
Strong analytic skills, systematic mindset, good developed logic,
Good knowledges of SQL and MS Excel
Good presentation skills, able to prepare presentations
Fluent English communication orally and writing.
 "
89,Fraud Analyst,PT FinAccel Teknologi Indonesia,Jakarta Raya - Senayan - Jakarta,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees,"  
Job description & Specification 
The Fraud analyst analyzes high frequency transaction data and user behavior to identify fraudulent/ high risk transactions as well as improve business processes and systems to prevent such transactions from happening in future. The roles and responsibilities include the following (but not limited to):


Daily monitoring and review of suspicious transactions and user activity


Generate additional insights by analyzing transaction and user behavior patterns


Work closely with engineering and data science team to codify these insights into  the existing fraud monitoring systems and business processes


Create ad-hoc reports and dashboards to aid top management decision making

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology, Mathematics, Economics or equivalent.
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in [Specialization] or equivalent.

Strong analytical skills as well as good understanding of business processes.


Proficiency in SQL and other database management software will be a big plus.


Comfortable working in a dynamic and fast-paced environment.


Conversational ability in English required

 "
90,Credit Analyst (Lampung),PT Hino Finance Indonesia,Bandar Lampung (Lampung),Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
To check the validity, accuracy of customer data, as presented by Marketing Department
To analyze all data for a proposal lease application based on credit analysis procedure
To provide recommended terms and conditions for the lease application
Prepare monthly report to internal parties
To conduct proper analysis and on-site analysis when visit lessee's

 
Requirements:
 

Max age 30 Years Old
Minimum Bachelor Degree (S1)
Graduate from reputable University
Minimum 1 years experiences as Credit Analyst / Credit Reviewer in Multifinance Company / Bank
Good comprehension in analyzing financial report or financial statement
Good at writing report
Experience in handling large corporate and large portfolio
English is a must
Willing to be place at Lampung
 "
91,Credit Analyst Pos Tanah Grogot - Cabang Balikpapan,PT Finansia Multi Finance (Kredit Plus),Balikpapan (Kalimantan Timur) - Tanah Grogot,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Usia maks. 35 tahun
Pendidikan minimal D3
Pengalaman Supervisor Marketing / Surveyor / Credit Analyst di perusahaan Leasing / Bank / Kartu Kredit / Asuransi / Koperasi min 2 thn
Mampu melakukan analisis data kredit nasabah,
Pernah memimpin team,
Komunikatif
Memiliki SIM C, motor sendiri dan menyukai pekerjaan lapangan.
Domisili Balikpapan dan sekitarnya (DOMISILI TANAH GROGOT LEBIH DIUTAMAKAN)

 
Note :

Tuliskan alamat domisili secara lengkap
Hanya kandidat yang memenuhi kualifikasi yang akan kami proses
 "
92,IT Business Analyst,PT Atreus Global,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 4 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 4 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
DWH and Business Support System
Telco industry experience
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.

 
Job Description:
Understanding business logic and requirement.
-  Develop business requirement documentation.
-  Mapping logic business into the system.
-  Develop Design documentation.
-  Interact with IT and business user to get clear requirement.
- Understanding data model and architecture.
- Coordination with Architect , PM and development team.
- Able to do testing result.
 
cv send to maria.lestari(a)atreusg.com
  "
93,Credit Analyst Pos Sangatta - Cabang Samarinda,PT Finansia Multi Finance (Kredit Plus),Samarinda (Kalimantan Timur) - sangatta,"IDR 2,500,000 - IDR 3,500,000",Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 

Usia maks. 35 tahun
Pendidikan minimal D3
Pengalaman Supervisor Marketing / Surveyor / Credit Analyst di perusahaan Leasing / Bank / Kartu Kredit / Asuransi / Koperasi min 2 thn
Mampu melakukan analisis data kredit nasabah,
Pernah memimpin team,
Komunikatif
Memiliki SIM C, motor sendiri dan menyukai pekerjaan lapangan.
Domisili Samarinda dan sekitarnya (LEBIH DI SUKAI DOMISILI SANGATTA)

Note :

Tuliskan alamat domisili secara lengkap
Hanya kandidat yang memenuhi kualifikasi yang akan kami proses

 "
94,IT Business Analyst,PT Sinergi Daya Mitra,Jakarta Raya - Jakarta Selatan,Below expected salary,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 4-6 year(s) of working experience as Business Analyst
Required Skill(s): SQL, JavaScript, PHP, C++, .NET
Having experience in IT Project/SDLC
Have ability to create the documentation
Good capabilities of functional document review
Good understanding about concept of data migration from one system to any other system.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Have a good command in English (Active)
 "
95,Microsrategy Business Analyst,PT Pandawa Karya Citra Divisi IT,Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," 
Job Requirements :

Individual aged max.28 Years.
Bachelor Degree Graduate of Industrial Engineering, Accounting Information System, Computer / Informatics, or Statistics with GPA 3.00. (Fresh Graduated considered).
Have a wide knowledge of industry business processes (Banking, Automotive, Insurance, Oil & Gas, Retail).
Like to work with clients and familiar to data analysis.
Having experience of implementing Microstrategy is a plus.
Fresh Graduates are welcome.

Job Description/s :

Microstrategy Training will be provided
Collect Client's User Requirement from various cleints
Create Project Blue Print
Create Project Design
Project Development, able to configure the software
Unit Test and User Acceptance Test

 "
96,IT Business and System Analyst Mobile,PT Astra Sedaya finance (Astra Credit Companies),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," Responsibilities :
 


Solving organizational information problems and requirements by analyzing requirements
Designing computer programs
Recommending system controls and protocols. 

 
Requirements :
 


Bachelor Degree IT (GPA min 2.75)
Maximum 30 years old
Knowledge about Financing Business Process is advantage
Good understanding and experience with SQL language
From reputable university
Minimum 2 years work experience
Preferably has the ability of mobile application (Android / IOs) and data warehousing / BI
Have a good conceptual and negotiation skill


 "
97,Administrator and Analyst Team,PT Dunia Ide Optimalis,Jakarta Raya - Graha Aktiva,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Less than 1 year experience,1 - 50 Employees," 
Helping Research Team
Preparing research project by collecting data from the written news and videos
Others duties assigned
Ready to work at weekend (compensation : EDO = Extra Day Off) 

 
Requirements:

Fluent in English, both oral and written
Can read and speak in Korean is a plus
Well organized
Thorough in details
Communicative, self-initiative, fast learner and able to work under pressure
Computer literacy, especially for Ms. Word, Ms. Excel

For selection process need to submit CV with academic transcript or Gdrive / Dropbox link to those documents. "
98,Marketing Analyst,PT Central Santosa Finance,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - WTC Mangga Dua,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),2001 - 5000 Employees," As Marketing Analyst you are responsible to analyze Market Update of company and also competitors. You will analyze it through data and numbers to get the best strategy for Company's marketing steps.
 
Job Qualifications:
1. Maximum age 30 years old
2. Candidate must posses Bachelor Degree Certification in Mathematic major.
3. Having experience as Marketing Analyst for at least one year.
4. Having skill in operating SPSS Program. "
99,Analyst - (17071924),Citi,Jawa Barat - Jakarta Raya,,Banking/Financial Services,Manager/Assistant Manager,2001 - 5000 Employees," Manage and grow relationship of the assigned clientsProactively monitor exposure; undertake analysis / investigation where required to ensure exposures are properly reported and exceptions resolvedThis may include interacting with TTS, Sales and Trading as well as Credit Risk to understand the credit transactionServe as subject matter expert regarding credit risk reporting; develop and implement solutions as warrantedManage assigned projects in a timely manner, ensuring accuracy and that deliverables are metIdentify policy and procedure gaps within the department, and propose solutionsDemonstrate an ability to resolve internal and external audit issues and to interpret information requests from regulatorsDevelop an understanding of how financial and capital markets transactions, including derivative and foreign exchange trading, generate risk exposure, and how this affects extensions of credit to varied clientsDevelop a high degree of technical and policy understanding with respect to business credit processingDevelop and maintain effective working relationships with colleagues in other areas of riskCoordinate with other departments and various levels of management regarding transaction issues, credit risk reporting issues, including investigating data issues, and resolving reporting errors  Fluent EnglishBachelor's Degree from reputable UniversityFinance / Accountancy qualifications or equivalent experience are preferredOutstanding analytical skillsAt least 5 years of experience in bankingSpecific knowledge of risk and credit, and industry, including market, competitors and the main opportunities of the sectorExperience in Financial Services, specifically within Corporate and Investment BankingDeep knowledge of financial markets, capital market products, global treasury managementInterpersonal skills / networking and results orientedAble to create and sustain good personal contacts with clients, within the team and amongst Citi's product partnersStrong communication / presentation skills "
100,Data Scientist (Familiar with Consumer Marketing Analytics),P'nnacle Pte Ltd,Central (Singapore),,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 5 years (Manager),1 - 50 Employees," Building and automate of the data workflows such as extraction, transformation and load (ETL) to transform raw data for analytic purposeDefine analytical strategy to address identified opportunities, including analytical approaches, data and technology requirements.Develop models and perform statistical analysis to solve various strategic business problems, e.g. customer segmentation and targeting, propensity model, acquisition model, retention model and perform marketing campaign testing.Communicate and present key analytical findings to senior management and/or other stakeholders with actionable recommendations.Deploy analytical/optimization solutions to drive growthWork with other data scientists in the team to drive projects.Ad hoc duties Requirements: Phd/Master in Statistics, Computer Science, Operations ResearchProficient in the application of customer transaction data & analytics techniques to domain specific problems such as customer segmentation and targeting, cross- sell/up-sell propensity model, acquisition model, retention model and marketing campaign testing etc.Familiarity with consumer marketing and ideally have industry experience (e.g. consumer banking, insurance, ecommerce, telecoms, retail etc)Deep understanding of statistical analysis, data mining or machine learningExperience in working with large structured and unstructured data setsAbility to think analytically and deliver results that drive business decision makingHave competency in one or more of the following programming languages or tools: Python, R, Spark, Hive, Impala Pig or ScalaAbility to write production code will be an advantage Interested & qualified applicants, please forward your latest CV in MS word format to fion@pnnacle.com.sg  "
101,Data Scientist,Hitachi eBworx Sdn. Bhd.,Selangor (Malaysia) - Petaling Jaya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 5 years (Senior Executive),201 - 500 Employees," ResponsibilitiesEstablish a competent delivery team for data science research & implementationLead data science research to implement cutting edge data-driven solutionsProvide end-to-end delivery leadership to teamRun proof-of-concept engagement with clientsPrepare, execute, monitor and report delivery plansPrimary liaison for clients on data analytic deliveryProactively identify and mitigate delivery risksEnsure quality and efficiencies in deliveriesCollaborate with peers from custom solution team to introduce analytics solutionRequirementsAcademic degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science or relevant studiesAt least 5-year of proven experience in data analytics & data mining in commercial fieldExceptional knowledge of R or Python programming and data visualization toolsSolid understanding of relevant technologies (Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, etc.) and cloud utilitiesOutstanding leadership in team development and managementStrong business acumen and skillful in people engagementExposure in financial services industry is a strong plusExcellent written / verbal communication and interpersonal skillsAble to accept challenges and cope with demanding timelineWilling to travel for overseas assignment  "
102,Senior Data Scientist / Data Scientist,Fusionex,"Petaling Jaya (Selangor, Malaysia)",,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Senior Executive),201 - 500 Employees," Responsibilities: The individual should have a desire for data mining, scripting, problem solving and statistical analysis.The individual will be responsible for scripting data models, automating data feeds, using BI tools to help visualize data, and various ad hoc projects.The individual will also need to drive statistical analysis projects from beginning to end, and have working experience with regression, factor analysis, building models and predictive analytics.Strong communication skills to obtain stakeholder buy-in and convince audience on the quality of the delivered models are critical to this position.To work collaboratively with DBAs, data scientists, and analysts.Drive improvement in our methodologies, systems and processesHave a deep understanding of large data, our data structures, and how to manipulate our data in an efficient mannerHave working experience with statistical tools such as R and Python (SciPy and other relevant packages),SPSS, SAS, have the ability to create statistical models, analyze factors significant to driving user engagement and build predictive models based on historical dataHave working experience with Machine Learning (supervised learning, unsupervised learning, semi-supervised learning, graphical models, image processing, reinforcement learning, reproducing kernel hilbert space).Quick in formulating quality, feasible and practical solution fit to big data (usually) application .Knowledge sharing (of theoretical and practical). Requirements:Graduating students encouraged to apply (Masters/PHDs would be an advantage)The individual MUST have proven track record (or at least possessing such capability or knowledge) of industrial implementation of various categories of work inclusive of however not limited to building a large scale recommendation system, time-series predictions (Economics, Stock Markets, Machines, etc), optimization (Genetic Algorithms, Simulated Annealing, etc), statistical analysis and modeling. Knowing image processing is a plus. Experience with formulating or implementing algorithms that are capable of evolution (automated parameters updating) would be of a great advantage.Large data sets should excite this personA strong knowledge of statistics and data analysis with experience in machine learning techniques (supervised and unsupervised learning), time series analysis, and experiment designStrong analytical skills and facility with Excel (pivot tables, lookups, formulas, formatting)SQL knowledge a mustExperience with statistical software (R, Matlab, SPSS, SAS, R) and Hadoop a plus.Net, Java, HTML 5, Python, HiveQL knowledge a plusKnowledge in Machine Learning/ “R” programming / Python is an added advantage.A desire to learn new methods in data mining/manipulationBackground in statistics, software engineering, data mining, database administration, or other quantitative disciplines is highly valued Ideally an all-rounded person whose related knowledge is more profound than our in-house experts combined.Candidate will have to undergo screening test (theoretical and practical) during the interview which topics are Statistics, Machine Learning, Programming and Apache modules. "
103,Data Scientist / KXEN Predictive Analytics,"PT. Metrodata Electronics, Tbk",Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Grogol,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1001 - 2000 Employees," Responsibilty

Become the team leader for Predictive Analytics (mainly using KXEN tools) in project or in presales activity
Develop predictive analytics industry specific demo system to our customer
Share and Enable internal consultant team for predictive analytics skill
Develop proposal, project costing, project timeline.
This position will not 100% full time in project but will be responsible to manage, lead and make sure the quality of the project is the best.
Help to do business development to increase revenue and gp especially for predictive.
Help to do presentation or become speaker in various Analytics Event

Qualifications
 



 Minimum 4 years of deep technical experience in predictive analytics, machine learning, optimization, and fluent in a number of the following technologies: KXEN, R, Python, SQL. Or if you other predictive tools such as SAS, IBM, Rapidminer can also apply for this position.

Having deep knowledge in linking technical statistic algorithm to business needs. For example in retail industry, where does association rule can help them and how.
Having deep knowledge in algorithm such as regression linear, correlation, triple exponential smoothing, association and other related algorithm
Proven track record in doing Advance Analytics (Predictive) project internally or externally.
Strong problem-solving skills, ability to structure and solve problems and conduct and interpret analysis independently, with demonstrated analytic and quantitative skills
Skills to communicate complex ideas effectively

 "
104,DATA SCIENTIST,Nusantara Sakti Group,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Gd The Victoria lt 5-6 Jl Tomang Raya Kav 35-37,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," DATA SCIENTIST
 
Job Description:
Sebagai Data Scientist, Anda memiliki peranan penting untuk menyelesaikan masalah yang kompleks dengan data kami.
 
Responsibility:

Mengembangkan data Internal, menganalisa data, dan datasets yang kompleks sebagai wawasan/visualisasi yang dapat ditindaklanjuti
Menggunakan data untuk dapat menyelesaikan permasalahan kompleks yang penting bagi bisnis kami
Ekstrak data dalam jumlah besar dari beberapa sumber internal dan eksternal.
Bekerja dengan data analyst, software engineer, dan Product Owner untuk dapat memberikan wawasan yang berpengaruh pada produk dari NSS
Merancang arsitektur dan proses data mining.

 
Qualification:

Minimum S1 dari Matematika, Ilmu Komputer, Fisika,. 
Minimum 1 tahun pengalaman bekerja sebagai Data Analyst, Data Scientist, Data Engineer, atau posisi yang berhubungan
Memiliki passion dalam big data, data mining, dan machine learning.
Menguasai pemrograman, seperti: Phython, R, Scala, dll
Memiliki pengetahuan tentang big data tools seperti; Hadoop dan Spark adalah nilai tambah
Familiar dengan NoSQL database, SQL dan Proses ETL

  "
105,Data Scientist,PT Media Wave Interaktif,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Mampang,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology, Mathematics, Physics, Quantity Survey, Science & Technology or equivalent.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s):
Conduct non-directed research and frame open-ended industry questions. 
Extract huge volumes of data from multiple internal and external sources. 
Employ sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical methods to prepare data for use in predictive & prescriptive modeling. 
Thoroughly clean and prune data to discard irrelevant information. 
Explore and examine data from a variety of angles to determine hidden weaknesses, trends, and/or opportunities. 
Devise data-driven solutions to the most pressing challenges. 
Invent new algorithms to solve problems and build new tools to automate work. 
Communicate predictions and findings to management and IT departments through effective data visualizations and report. 
Recommend cost-effective changes to existing procedures and strategies. 
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Science & Technology/Laboratory or equivalent.
 "
106,Data Scientist / Data Analytics,Sinarmas Forestry,Jakarta Raya - Serpong,Below expected salary,Wood/Fibre/Paper,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree / Post Graduate Degree, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication) or equivalent.At least 2 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.(Re)design business processes for improving operational efficiency both in Ops and support functionsIdentify and remove redundancies, e.g. unnecessary paperwork in the process supported by IT systemFacilitate content harmonization across organization, e.g. standard design of housing infrastructure facilitiesManage HQ archive of Business Processes and SOPsDigital TransformationDesign standardized ways to capture operational and non-ops data by IT systems across organizationRefine data flow processes to ensure possibility of consolidation to management reports as per their needsBuild flexible data management platform to enable Precision forestry solutions, like advanced analyticsMake sure IT systems are configured to support designed data flow processes, produce specifications to ITEducate users and coordinate to improve data quality and avoid misuse or misleading dataApplicants must be willing to work in Serpong. "
107,Data Scientist,PT Xtremax Teknologi Indonesia,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - Jalan Pasir Kaliki No. 231 - Sukajadi,"IDR 6,500,000 - IDR 9,000,000",Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
As a Data Scientist, you are entrusted to make sense of the large amounts of data we have. You are responsible for collaborating with our engineers to analyze the data and implement the right data algorithms to optimize the performance of our system. Your predictions and recommendations can make or break the company.
 

Responsibility:

Apply different statistical/machine learning models or algorithms to the problem set. Synthesize data into actionable business insights for the company and our clients.
Provide insight based on mixed data such as visualisation, statistics, predictive modelling and presentation
Recommend systems feature improvements based on performance data
Research, design, implement and validate data-driven frameworks to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes.
Collaborate and Have Fun with Xtremax team.

Requirement:

Min Bachelor from Mathematics, Business Analytics, Statistics, Informatics, System Information or Computer Science
At least 2 years experiences working with data science or analysis
Experience with Google Analytics, Python, R, SPSS, Tableau and other tools
Have a solid analytical thinking skills
Good written and verbal communication skills


 "
108,Data Scientist or DBA or Data Warehouse,"PT. Metrodata Electronics, Tbk",Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Job Descriptions:

Responsible for designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Hadoop, understand and translate requirements into the Agile delivery process.
Loading from disparate data sets, Perform data migration and conversion activities, Deploy, Run, and Debug the ETL engine running the config scripts built by the ETL Engineering team.
Pre-processing using Hive, Impala, Pig, Spark, Yarn, etc.
Answer technical questions from customers regarding technology, features and solutions.
Articulate technology and product positioning to both business and technical users.
Provide regular support/guidance to project teams on complex coding, issue resolution and execution.
Collaborate with some of the best talent in the industry to create and implement innovative high quality solutions.
Be part of a learning culture, where teamwork and collaboration are encouraged, excellence is rewarded and diversity is respected and valued.

 
Job Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or equivalent work experience.
Hadoop development and implementation experience
Experience with designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Hadoop
Experience in database and data integration
Proficiency with scripting languages; Python and Shell Script
Hands on experience with Hadoop stack M/R, Hive, Pig, Hbase
Experience in real stream processing with Spark/Kafka/Kinesis
Self-driven and ability to lead complex projects
Ability to influence others and direction of projects
 "
109,Data Scientist,PT AXA LIFE INDONESIA,"Jakarta Raya - AXA Tower,  Kuningan,  Jakarta Selatan","IDR 4,000,000 - IDR 5,200,000",Insurance,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Job Desc : Mengelola seluruh data nasabah dan menyajikan-nya sebagai bahan pertimbangan pengambilan keputusan Job Requirement :Min. S1 (Sarjana), Jurusan Matematika dan IT StatistikaFamiliar dengan : Analisa Statistik, Microsoft Excel, Aplikasi R, Data Modeling, & Pivot Excel.Fresh Graduate atau Min.bekerja 1 tahunPenempatan AXA Tower, Jakarta SelatanMemiliki kemampuan Presentasi / Komunikasi yang baikBenefit :        - Gaji Pokok       - Tunjangan Makan       - Tunjangan Transport       - Tunjangan Parkir       - BPJS       - etc. Kirimkan CV atau Lamaran anda & Mari bergabung bersama AXA Life Indonesia "
110,Data Scientist,PT eBdesk Teknologi,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Requirements :
 

University graduate majoring in Mathematic/Statistic.
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply.
Have strong interest in data statistical and logical modelling.
Able to study formula and algorithm written in mathematical notation.
Strong foundation in Mathematic and Algorithm Logic.
Good communication skill.
Good team player, a great self-starter, and self motivator.
Highly motivated and able to work in team.
Able to work under pressure and meet tight deadlines.
Fast learner.
Good English both verbal and written.
Willing to travel domestic and overseas.
Willing to be stationed overseas for project implementation.

 
Send your application + CV + copies of certificates with subject “eBdesk Technology Vacancy” and position code (Data Scientist). Please note that only short-listed candidates will be notified.
​ "
111,Data Scientist,PT Bigjava,Jakarta Raya,"IDR 5,000,000 - IDR 10,000,000",Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Description
 
We're looking for a Data Scientist to join our fun and amazing team in Jakarta, Indonesia. You will be interpreting large and complex sets of data. Also you will do research, development and maintaining our existing product solution.
This is an awesome position who is passionate in working with data.
 
 
WE DEFINITELY WANT TO HEAR FROM YOU IF YOU ARE:


Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Physics or Computer Science from reputable university.
Min 2 year working experiences would be advantage but fresh graduate are welcome to apply.
Enjoy to analyze complex and large data set to get insight of data.
Great understanding in analytical, problem solving, conceptual and statistical skills.
Proficiency in scripting tools such as R or Python.
FLUENT IN ENGLISH IS A MUST.
Good communication and presentation skills.
Able to work as a team and tight schedule.


 
It Is Also an advantage If You are:


Have experience in Machine Learning Solution.
Knowledge in Text Mining such as Natural Language Processing.
Experienced in Data Visualization.

 

If this sounds like you, then we want to hear from you immediately. "
112,DATA SCIENTIST,PT Infomedia Solusi Humanika,Jakarta Raya,,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," DATA SCIENTIST Kualifikasi :Pria atau WanitaUsia minimal 25 tahunPendidikan D3 atau S1, dengan jurusan Matematika, Statistika dan Teknik KomputerMempunyai pengalaman kerja minimal 2 tahun, di bidang Data scientist, Customer analytic, Solution Development, ModellingMempunyai keterampilan yang cukup dalam RDBMS dan Non RDBMSMempunyai keterampilan dalam MySQL,PostgreSQL, MongoDB, Social Media analysis, Analysis tools: Excel,R,SPSS,Modeller,Phyton. Silahkan datang untuk wawancara ke kantor kami, setiap Senin - Jumat, 09.00-14.00, berlokasi di : PT. Infomedia Solusi Humanika Gedung bank Mandiri lantai 1Jln. RS. Fatmawati No.75Cipete, Kebayoran BaruJakarta Selatan Persis setelah Pasar Onderdil Cipete Bertemu dengan Bu Veronika "
113,Data Engineer,Hitachi eBworx Sdn. Bhd.,Selangor (Malaysia) - Petaling Jaya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 3 years (Senior Executive),201 - 500 Employees," ResponsibilitiesCollaborate closely with Data Scientist to develop data-driven solutionsDesign, install, test & maintain data architecture & infrastructure for data science projectsPrepare data to the optimal state for use by Data ScientistEstablish processes and policies to improve quality, efficiency and integrity of dataDesign and implement data collection with IT solution teamsWork with clients on data processing in proof-of-concept and commercial projectsRequirementsAcademic degree in Software Engineering or relevant studiesAt least 3 years of working experience in data engineering role for data science projectsExcellent knowledge of operating systems, database technologies and ETL solutionsProven competency in working with structured & unstructured dataGood understanding of server and storage technologiesSkillful in coding with SQL, Python, Perl, etc.Solid understanding of relevant technologies (Hadoop, Redshift, etc.) and cloud utilitiesExposure in financial services industry is a strong plusGood written / verbal communication and interpersonal skillsAble to accept challenges and cope with demanding timelineWilling to travel for overseas assignment  "
114,Data Warehouse Engineer,PT Gramedia Digital Nusantara,Jakarta Raya - Palmerah,"IDR 8,000,000 - IDR 11,000,000",Retail/Merchandise,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree / Post Graduate Diploma / Professional Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.

2-3 years of working experience in the related field is required for this position.

Preferably Junior Executive specialized in IT/Computer - Network / System / Database Admin or equivalent.
 
Experiences:

Relational databases including SQL queries, database definition, and schema design
Designing data models and data warehouses
Developing and maintaining extract, transform, and load tools (ETLs) which operate on a variety of structured and unstructured sources (Pentaho Data Integration, Talend, etc.)


Preferred qualifications:

Strong oral and written communication skills, including the ability to communicate complex findings in a structured and clear manner to a non-technical audience.
Experience working with and developing for non-technical users (defining requirements, explaining technical concepts to non-technical business users, etc.)
Good teamwork
Experience with Unix or GNU/Linux systems including shell scripting
Experience with one or more programming languages (Python, Java, C++, etc.)

 
Job Role:

Design, develop and support data warehouses, dashboards and reporting tools for operational and business impact data.
Write extract, transform and loads (ETL) to automate routine data collection and reporting processes using a variety of traditional as well as large-scale distributed data systems.
Work with Business Analysts and other non-technical business users to understand their analytical needs, document and prioritize requirements, and help them effectively use the data and analytical tools that the team has developed.
 "
115,Data Engineer (Code: DE),PT Multipolar Technology Tbk,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Jl. HR. Rasuna Said Kav. B12 Jakarta Selatan,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Less than 1 year experience,201 - 500 Employees," Scope of Works:

Responsible for data ingestion, data processing (ETL), And data operation
Identify databases within application areas
Coordinate database development individual

Requirements:

Diploma/Bachelor Degree from Informatics Engineering, Computer Science or any related discipline
Fresh graduates are welcome with GPA min. 3.00
Good knowledge of SQL, Linux, ETL (Informatica), Java, Phyton, and Spark.
Have data passionate.
 "
116,Big Data Engineer,PT Prima Integrasi Network,Jakarta Raya - Jakarta Barat,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Big Data, Machine Learning, Python, Go, HTML, Javascript, CSS , HTML, Web Server, PHP, Linux, Database (mysql, oracle, etc)
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
Good analytical and logical skills
Good decision maker
Creative
Good Attitude
Willing to work under pressure and work with team mate to achieve specific objectives.
 "
117,DATA ENGINEER,PT eBdesk Teknologi,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Requirement:
 


University graduate majoring in Information Technology/Mathematic/Statistic/Computer Science.
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply.
Have strong interest in data structure and model, both SQL and NO SQL based.
Have strong passion in enterprise paralel data processing framework, experiences in Java framework is preferable.
Strong foundation in Data Operation Algorithm such as Mapping, Searching, Sorting and Aggregation.
Good communication skill.
Good team player, a great self-starter, and self motivator.
Highly motivated and able to work in team.
Able to work under pressure and meet tight deadlines.
Fast learner.
Good English both verbal and written.
Willing to travel domestic and overseas.
Willing to be stationed overseas for project implementationion

Send your application, CV, Portfolio and copies of certificates to career(at)ebdesk(dot)com with subject “eBdesk Technology Vacancy” and position code (Data Engineer). Please note that only short-listed candidates will be notified. 
 "
118,Data Center Engineer,PT Kelly Services Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 10 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1001 - 2000 Employees," Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Engineering (Electrical/Electronic) or equivalent.Required skill(s): Project Management.At least 3 year(s) of working experience related to data center facilities engineering. Must have data center project management experience (construction/renovation).Contract position for 1 year.  "
119,Sales Executive Notebook Surabaya,PT Tera Data Indonusa,Surabaya (Jawa Timur) - Surabaya dan Semarang,,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Kualifikasi :
 


Umur maksimal 40 tahun
Minimal Pendidikan D1
sudah memiliki pengalaman di penjualan Notebook/handphone dan kerjasama dengan toko/dealer Notebook/Handphone
Memiliki kemampuan komunikatif dan analisa yang baik 
Memiliki kemampuan komputer yang baik
terbiasa dengan tekanan dalam pencapaian target
Memiliki SIM C dan kendaraan bermotor
Penempatan di area Surabaya

 
Job Description :
 

mencari dan melakukan kerjasama dengan toko/dealer notebook/handphone untuk menjual produk
mencapai target penjualan yang sudah ditentukan perusahaan 
Menjaga hubungan kerjasama dengan dealer/pihak toko
Membuat laporan penjualan 
Memberikan informasi product knowledge kepada toko dan promotor mengenai produk perusahaan
mengontrol promotor dalam pencapaian target penjualan
melakukan coaching kepada promotor yang belum mencapai target


  "
120,Innovation Manager or Assistant Manager,PT Samsung SDS Global SCL Indonesia,Tangerang (Banten),,Transportation/Logistics,Min 10 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," Requirement:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Industrial) or equivalent.
Required language(s): English
At least 10 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): - able to used CAD, - able to use MS Access or DBMS, - able to use WMS/TMS logistics system, - data (excel) analysis, advanced level
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in Sales - Engineering/Technical/IT or equivalent.
Min degree - University Graduate from reputable university

 
 
Roles & Responsibility:

Improve Slaes Logistics Operation Process ( for Warehouse/ Local domestic distribution ) 
System Improvement ( For Stock management/ Cycyle Counting/ Picking / Packing/ Put-Away strategy etc)
Plan/Set-Up/Conduct Innovation Task 
Support for Client's Sales Logistics Innovation Task 

  "
121,Sales Executive,PT Arisma Data Setia,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Srengseng,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Less than 1 year experience),51 - 200 Employees," 
Merencanakan dan melaksanakan aktifitas penjualan dan melakukan kunjungan ke pelanggan yang berpotensial
Mencari customer baru yang dapat bekerjasama dengan perusahaan
Mengembangkan strategi yang ada untuk mencapai target penjualan yang ditetapkan oleh perusahaan
Mengembangkan dan membuat sales plans

 
Job Requirement : 

Pendidikan Min D3 (Disukai jurusan IT)
Pengalaman di bidangnya minimal 1 tahun (terbuka untuk Fresh Graduate)
Mampu bekerja secara mandiri
Memiliki network yang luas
Memiliki kepribadian yang aktif, tangguh dan pantang menyerah
Memiliki kemampuan komunikasi yang baik
Mampu mengoperasikan Ms. Office
Memiliki Sim A dan C
Memiliki ketertarikan dalam bidang IT
 "
122,Technical Consultant,PT Tech Data Advanced Solutions Indonesia,"Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Wisma BSG,  Jl. Abdul Muis No. 40",,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 
Responsibilities :
 

Gathering information from customer to identify customers need
To understand, analyze, identy and proposing technical solutions
Develop product playbook for Business Unit
Involvement in POC to drive product revenue
Coordinating with other department to provide required information before the project begin
Provide and find the answer to the prospective client’s question on technical aspects of the product and services

 
 
Requirement :
 

28-35 years old
S1 graduate from IT, Electrical Engineering, Telecommunication Engineering or Computer Engineering
At least 2 years experience as presales within the IT related industry
Have knowledge in various IT technology (security, software, big data, various operating system and, etc.)
Strong communication / interpersonal and presentation skills
High integrity, committed and responsible person
Fast learner and have attention to detail
Proficient in English 

 "
123,Inside Sales Representative,PT Tech Data Advanced Solutions Indonesia,"Jakarta Raya - Wisma BSG,  Jl. Abdul Muis No. 40",,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Requirment : 
 

Max. 30 years old
Minimum Diploma Degree (D3) any field
Experience 1 years as sales in IT Product 
Good communication skill
Hard working and able to work under pressure, motivated and independent
Proficient in computer skill (MS Office)
Strong drive and target oriented 
Can join immediately
Full-Time position(s) available

  "
124,Account Manager,PT Modern Data Solusi,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Candidate must possess at least a SMU, Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, any field.Required skill(s): sales, communication, computer, relationship, Negotiable.Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English, Japanese.At least 1 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.Preferably Non Management - Non Supervisor specialized in sales - Engineering/Technical/IT or equivalent.Fresh Graduate are Welcome to Apply.Have a Strong Passion in Sales.Proactive, Energetic, Smart and Have a Good Analytical Thinking.8 Full-Time position(s) available. "
125,Product Manager,PT Tech Data Advanced Solutions Indonesia,"Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya) - Wisma BSG,  Jl. Abdul Muis No. 40",Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),201 - 500 Employees," 
Responsibilities :


To develop assigned product for spesific market in order to achive the sales target
Collaborate with cross functional team  such as sales to delivery product
To create a good relations with business partners and also principle 

Requirement : 

Max age of 40 years 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, any field
Minimum 3 years working experience in IT industry as Product Manager
Deep passion for pruduct and tract record to define market winning product and product strategy
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in Sales - Engineering/Technical/IT or equivalent
Good personality, outgoing, passionate and active in communication
Responsible, honest and proactive in working
Hard working and able to work under pressure, motivated, independent 
Fluent in English
 "
126,Technical Sales (Pre Sales),PT Cybertrend Intrabuana,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Please join us and being part of an awesome, fun and dynamic work environment team’s  as a Technical Sales with the  following qualifications:
 

Min. Bachelor Degree in Computer Science/ IT/ Software Engineering or related fields;
Familiar with Business Intelligence product such as: Tableau/ Qlikview/ Microstrategy is preferred;
Familiar with commonly ETL tools such as: Pentaho/ Informatica / Data Stage/ SSIS is preferred
Experienced with Data Warehouse concepts and principles
Experiences on developing the BI roadmap architecture deliverable, to include components such as current states, pros and cons, and recommendation reports;
Excellent  on Communication and presentation skill
Excellent on writing skill on technical proposal
Experience on  presenting technical concepts to executive-level business persons
Good presentation skill, especially experienced on presenting technical concepts to executive-level business persons
Familiar with Big Data platform such as: Cloudera/ MapR/ Hortonworks is preferred
Having knowledge in Business Process for Enterprise, Government and Commercial industry.


Role & Responsibiity:

Responsible for working closely with  Account Manager’s team  to develop a suitable project plan that meets the client’s needs;
Join teams as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) of that particular area or industry; 
Understand how business intelligence reporting solutions fit within an enterprise data model and within data architecture.
As part of The Solution Architect team  with the performance optimization of such solutions
As part of cross-functional, and work together with Sales and delivery team to design and build end-to-end business intelligence and data warehouse solutions.
Responsible to conduct assessments of clients’ requirements (technical and business) and document requirements and translated in to the technical proposal and solution roadmaps. 
Possess the ability to present of both technical and business process, to capture requirements and translate them into technical development specifications (i.e. data mapping documentation). 
Be able to define the BI solution architecture vision and ensure alignment with the business’ goals, any technical risks are clearly defined and understood  by clients Know how to apply applications and analytical reporting, aligned tools and techniques, and a service-oriented data delivery attitude for near real-time reporting.
Full-Time and Contract position(s) available.


  "
127,Sales & Marketing Coordinator,PT Palmco Indonesia,"Jakarta Raya - KBN Marunda,  Jakarta Utara","IDR 7,500,000 - IDR 15,000,000",Utilities/Power,Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," We are currently seeking for the best candidates for the position of Sales & Marketing Manager to serve our domestic coal market under a dynamic leadership, commited with high dedication to drive Palmco Indonesia forward.
 
Job Responsibilities:


Achieves marketing and sales operational objectives by contributing marketing and sales information and recommendations to strategic plans and reviews; preparing and completing action plans; implementing production, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; completing audits; identifying trends; determining system improvements; implementing change.
Meets marketing and sales financial objectives by forecasting requirements; preparing an annual budget; scheduling expenditures; analyzing variances; initiating corrective actions.
Projecting expected sales volume and profit for existing and new products; analyzing trends and results; establishing pricing strategies; recommending selling prices; monitoring costs, competition, supply, and demand.
Accomplishes marketing and sales objectives by planning, developing, implementing, and evaluating advertising, merchandising, and trade promotion programs; developing field sales action plans.
Identifies marketing opportunities by identifying consumer requirements; defining market, competitor's share, and competitor's strengths and weaknesses; forecasting projected business; establishing targeted market share.
Improves product marketability and profitability by researching, identifying, and capitalizing on market opportunities; improving product packaging; coordinating new product development.
Sustains rapport with key accounts by making periodic visits; exploring specific needs; anticipating new opportunities.
Provides information by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing data and trends.
Protects organization's value by keeping information confidential.
Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.
Accomplishes marketing and organization mission by completing related results as needed.


 
Job Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Industrial), Engineering (Mechanical), Engineering (Mining/Mineral), Business Studies/Administration/Management, Marketing or equivalent.
Required language(s): English, Chinese, Korean, Japanese
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Marketing Concepts, Positioning, People Management, Territory Management, Sales Planning, Competitive Analysis, Financial Planning and Strategy, Understanding the Customer, Product Development, Client Relationships, Creative Services
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in Sales - Engineering/Technical or equivalent.
 "
128,Technical Sales Engineer,PT Fusion Dinamika,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," Primery Responsible :

Conducts sales presentations; Obtains favorable specifications for our products.
Manages sales with and through distribution and developing quotes & orders.
Provides sales support for multiple projects. Consistently follow up on projects.
Develops and maintains statistical data on competitors' products, quality, sales, pricing, production facilities, limitations and marketing procedures.
Other duties as assigned.

Basic Qualification :

Bachelor's/Master's Degree (preferable mechanical engineering)
2+ years of experience in sales.
Strong negotiation skills.
English skills (written and verbal)
Computer proficiency (Microsoft Office, CRM software, basic CAD (preferable BricsCAD/AutoCAD))
Ability to work independently and as part of a team.
Valid driver’s license.

  "
129,Structural Design Engineer,PT Teamworx Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Cilandak,,Construction/Building/Engineering,Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," Responsible : 


To prepare, develop and realize the design and analysis for projects based on the client requirements and coordinate works with other disciplines in the project team to ensure compatibility
To work in a project team and under the direction of the engineering project manager
To prepare, develop and maintain the drawing lists, engineering data and/or roombook for projects listing function, material, equipment, as well as brand, product, type, specs, size, shape and finish
To motivate, oversee, support and direct the project teams’ juniors and drafters assigned to prepare, develop and maintain scaled project drawings and other relevant documents as part of the project deliverables
To report to the engineering project manager project-specific related issues, to the engineering manager civil technical and general issues
To support the engineering project manager as relates to the design and engineering scope and provide positive input and expertise to the project team both internal as well as external
To adhere, and ensure the company and department quality, engineering and procedural standards are followed and are met and promote to others and assist them to do so
To promote and maintain a positive spirit as part of the project team and support initiatives to further strengthen the team and assist and support others in the open and friendly TeamworX way


Requirements : 

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Civil) or equivalent.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 5 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): AutoCAD, Revit, naviswork, designreview
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in Engineering - Civil/Construction/Structural or equivalent.
 "
130,Supervisor / Sales Penjualan Industri CCTV Penempatan Tangerang,PT. Coolpad Electronic Indonesia,"Tangerang (Banten) - Coolpad Service Center Tangerang,  Ruko Paramount G",,Telecommunication,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," Supervisor Sales Penjualan Industri CCTV
Penempatan
Tangerang
Kualifikasi sebagai berikut:
1. Usia 22 sampai 35 tahun
2. Memiliki pengalaman dalam bidang CCTV
3. Memiliki pengalaman mengatur proyek bidang CCTV
4. Memiliki sumber data customer B2B dan dealer di bidang CCTV
5. Diutamakan bisa berbahasa mandarin
6. Mengerti persoalan pemasangan CCTV
7. Memiliki interpersonal yang baik
8. Memiliki kemauan untuk bekerja keras
Bagi yang berminat dapat mengirimkan CV ke PT Oracle Electronical International
Coolpad Service Center Tangerang Ruko Paramount Green Dot Com blok G nomor 10 Gading Serpong Tangerang 15810  "
131,IT Engineer,PT Metra-Net,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Pancoran,,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Responsibilities:

Assist in overseeing trouble ticket queues and resolve issues that our Tier1 support team is unable to resolve. Create and maintain necessary tools to monitor our network and ensure 100% Network uptime and delivery.
Responsible for troubleshooting and maintenance of wide array of servers and network related services such as physical & hardware layer, web /mail / dns / database services, routing / switching / load balancing / firewall devices
Be the Primary point of contact (POC) for various customer critical infrastructures. This includes working closely with customers to achieve their needs with various technology and tools that they prefer to use. Ability to establish good communication with customers and team is a must.
Responsible for monitoring and troubleshooting data flow from various data log system.

Qualifications:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent. At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Network/System/Database Admin or equivalent.
Strong knowledge of Linux based operating system such as Ubuntu, CentOS, RHEL, and Debian.
Knowledge of Windows such as Windows Server 2008 - 2012 is big plus.
Have knowledge with various web server technologies such as IIS, Apache, NGINX, Ruby on Rails, Tomcat, lighthttpd.
Experience with setting up highly scalable and highly available open source database infrastructure such as Mysql master/slave or clustering,  Hbase (Hadoop), NoSQL (Cassandra/Riak), MongoD
Working experience with Network appliances and networking devices such as Cisco ASA, Cisco Catalyst, Force10 Switches, F5 Load Balancer, Coyotepoint load balancer, Sonicwall/Watchguard/Juniper appliances. Comfort with Virtualization technologies such as KVM, XEN (CentOS), VMWare and Linux Container.
Experience with cloud technologies is big plus such as Openstack, Cloudstack, Eucalyptus
 "
132,Senior Sales Engineer,PT KSB Indonesia,Jakarta Raya - Halim Perdanakusuma,,Manufacturing/Production,Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," 
Searching for new clients who could benefit from our products in a designated region
Establishing new, and maintaining existing, relationships with customers
Managing and interpreting customer requirements
Persuading clients with a product or service will best satisfy their needs
Negotiating tender and contract terms
Negotiating and closing sales by agreeing terms and conditions
Offering after-sales support services
Administering client accounts
Analysing costs and sales
Recording and maintaining client contact data
Co-ordinating sales projects
Supporting marketing by attending trade shows, conferences and other marketing events
Making technical presentations and demonstrating how a product will meet client needs
Providing pre-sales technical assistance and product education
Liaising with other members of the sales team and other technical experts
Solving client problems
Helping in the design of custom-made products

 
Requirements :

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Engineering (Mechanical), Engineering (Marine), Engineering (Petroleum/Oil/Gas), Engineering (Industrial), Engineering (Chemical) or equivalent.
Required skill(s): Microsoft Office.
Required language(s): English (Writen and Verbal)
At least 4 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Having knowledge about Pumps and Valve
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in Sales - Engineering/Technical or equivalent.
1 Full-Time position(s) available.

 
Benefits :

Sales incentive package
Health Insurance for employee and family
Overseas training to KSB Group worldwide
 "
133,Business Process Analyst,PT Trimitra Trans Persada,Tangerang (Banten),,Transportation/Logistics,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1 - 50 Employees," 
Responsibilities:

Creates, monitors, and evaluate business process, departmental policies and procedures in accurate manner.
Assist business owners on implementing new Business Process or Business Process Re-engineering.
Assess problem identification in business process implementation, and suggest a corrective action including any possible improvement to be implemented.
Engage in development and improvement project for company business continuous growth.
Performs other related duties as assigned.

Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering (Industrial/Computer Science), Business Administration or equivalent.
At least 2 years of working experience in Business Process, or related field.
Fast learner in industrial analysis regarding process flow mapping, and capturing improvement possibilities.
Excellence Analytical thinking.
Familiar with workflow Process, Procedures & Policies.
Have computer skills (Ms. Word, Excel, Power Point & Visio).
Good in interpersonal communication skills.

 "
134,Business Analyst,PT Param Mitra Coal Movers,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Mega Kunigan,,Mining,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job description:
 

general fire fighting, including but not limited to
	
liasing with operational team at mine sites in East Kalimantan
giving business analysis support to group's new assets under development


assist GM in various tasks,
	
collecting and analyzing data
preparation of presentations
join in meetings and negotiations
drafting of contracts


This is a very wide role where responsibilities and tasks will grow naturally;  it will suit a numbers driven individual with previous big-4 consultancy experience who's looking to get their hands dirty.

 
 
Qualifications required:
 

S1 in economics or finance from reputable university, BBA is a plus
top tier consulting experience is a plus
previous exposure to M&A transactions
minimum 2 years working experience
should be able to draft presentations, business plans and shall need be, contracts
Willing to take on new tasks and responsibilities; this will suit a data driven generalist type

 
Setting:
 

work location is Mega Kuningan, travel to sites in East Kalimantan is required at least once a month.
 "
135,IT Business Analyst,PT Fan Integrasi Teknologi,"Bekasi (Jawa Barat), Jakarta Raya",,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Job Description:

Conduct business and user requirement analysis.
Able to capture business requirement of the client and give suggestion of best practice to client
Able to define functional specification for the application to fulfill the business requirement
Gather requirement, analyze, and generate documentation
Designs new computer programs by analyzing requirements; constructing workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications.
Gain / maintain an in-depth knowledge of business functions.
Investigate, evaluate and report alternative solutions to business needs and recommend the preferred solution
Creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business process, application, and testing scenario
Coordinate with business user and programmer team in software development project
To communicate with user departments, explaining the impact of any change and training them in the use of new applications

 
Selected candidates should meet the following requirements:

Minimum Bachelor Degree in any field with minimum GPA of 3.2
Minimum 1 year of experience, preferable in banking industry or retail industry
Having knowledge about System Development Life Cycle
Having knowledge to identifies, evaluates, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements
Excellent in creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business process, application, and testing
Good leadership skill, initiative, team work, integrity, and detail-oriented person
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including the ability to write reports and business correspondence
Analytical, good communication, and can do attitude is a must.



Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.

  "
136,IT Business Analyst / Business Partner - Assistant Manager,PT Prudential Life Assurance,Jakarta Raya,,Insurance,Min 4 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1001 - 2000 Employees," 

Procedure & Compliance
	
Effectively communicate with users and application developer to achieve : user needs and requirements, Create Business Specification
Table Maintenance and Product Set Up
Effectively utilize the Life Asia and non Life Asia system to meet the business needs


Quality Assurance and Control
	
Understand the overall of insurance business
Doing testing for all system from the developers
Signoff the requirements with users
Coordinate with users for the testing
Escalate problems to direct supervisor


User Support
	
As a help desk
Analyses user’s problems and needs
Assist the users


Documentation
	
Develop the users manualand map with current business
Document the requirement with the business specification and technical specification



Manage Projects


Actively involve in project assigned


Understanding user’s needs


Monitoring project




Training


Provide training for users about systems and procedure





Job Requirements:


Degree in Computer Science or engineering


3 years experience in IT development or 4 years experience in Policy Service Life insurance or Actuarial department


Experience in using Life Asia system as an advantage.


Experience of query


Knowledge in Cobol or SMART or others language is an added advantage


Knowledge of insurance business and procedures is an added advantage


Strong analytical skill


Able to write reports

 "
137,IT – Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Bekasi (Jawa Barat),"IDR 4,500,000 - IDR 6,500,000",Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Qualification :

Max 27 years old
Candidate must prosses a least a D3 or S1 / Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Graduated from University
Komputerisasi Akuntansi , Information System , Engineering would be a advantage

Requirements :

Excellent skills business analyst job
Understanding of SDLC
Able to read Coding
Good analytical thinking
Familiar with Microsoft Project
Familiar with Databse Query
Familiar with idempiere application
Proactive with excellent communication and multi tasking skills
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Understanding of systems engineering concepts
The ability to conduct cost/benefit analysis, business case development, modelling techniques and methods.
Strong in documentation

 "
138,IT Business Analyst,PT So Good Food,Jakarta Raya - Daan Mogot - Jakarta Barat,,Consumer Products/FMCG,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),2001 - 5000 Employees," Job Description :Melakukan Manajemen proyek IT yang telah ditugaskanMenjalin komunikasi dengan departemen terkait untuk menjadi problem solver atas masalah yang dihadapiMengkomunkasikan hal-hal terkait project kepada atasan, Steering Committee & Team MemberRequirement :Pendidikan min. S1 Jurusan Information Technology / Information System / Computer SciencePengalaman min. 3 tahun sebagai Business Analyst / Management Information System, Diutamakan dari perusahaan Consumer GoodsMenguasai bisnis proses dari perusahaan terutama di bidang Supply Chain & Sales DistributionMenguasai atau pengalaman dalam implementasi suatu project Memiliki Skill Komunikasi & Leadership yang baikPenempatan : Head Office (Daan Mogot KM 12 - Jakarta Barat)  "
139,Business Analyst,PT Conext  Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 1 year (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," Responsibilities:

Help identify and implement new opportunities to grow Company’s business
Work with product managers to prioritize and launch products most important to company’s segment
Analyze and build reports and dashboards for tracking and growth development
Work with marketing to establish customer acquisition metrics, and build new customer channels
Conduct in depth analysis and develop deep understanding of key value drivers to identify improvement areas and opportunities.
Deliver strategic projects that provide key business insights for high-priority initiatives.

 
Qualifications:

At least have 1 year of experience in a highly analytical and operational role within a rapidly growing company
Enjoy doing whatever it takes to execute on complex projects.
Have experience in operations or project management, taking projects from conception to launch.
Have a process-oriented mindset and ability to execute. Excel in analytics and problem-solving.
Graduate from top Indonesian University
 "
140,Business Analyst,PT Samsung Electronics Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Electrical & Electronics,Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Samsung R&D Institute Indonesia – we are one of Samsung Research & Development centers among other global R&D hubs. We focuses on building global content, service, and technology solutions across diverse domains, projects, products, clients, people, and countries and also conduct research in new and emerging areas of technology. Our global R&D team of researchers and engineers include more than 50.000 employees across 42 global research facilities – each one collaborating on strategic technologies to forge new market trends and set new standards of excellence.
We always looking for outstanding global talents and our future leaders, who are welcome and vital for us as we grow and evolve into a truly global enterprise. We are on the cusp of the next chapter of our history. So join us as BUSINESS ANALYST  and make a real contribution to shaping our future, and bringing the next big thing to life

Business Analyst:

Job Summary:
The candidate support overall admin requirement and report to the SRIN coordinator (Korean), escalate to Head of SRIN (if any) and responsible for preparing any financial statements, compliance process administration and reporting. He/She must work within the Financial Management policies align with HQ and SEINS (local subs) procedures and compliances.
 
Qualifications:

At least 3 to 8 years of experience on Finance and Accounting with some supervisory skills
Min Bachelor degrees in Business Administration, MBA or any related Master degrees from reputable universities will be point plus
The candidate has experience of final responsibility for the quality and content of all related financial data, reporting and audit coordination for either a Group or significant project area, and has preferably overseen a human resources function previously (within a project)
Chartered Financial Analyst and the Certified Treasury Professional credentials or any related certification will be point plus
Strong English/Korean communication skill, in written and oral
Bahasa Indonesia as major communication with local people will be point plus.

 
Desired Skills and Experience:

Good team building and strong analytical and problem solving skills
Good in communication, effective verbal and written communications skills (incl with local people)
Good in computer skills including the ability to operate computerized accounting, spreadsheet and wordprocessing programs at a highly proficient level
A multi-tasker with the ability to wear many hats in a fast-paced environment - balanced and solid stress and time management skills
A successful track record in setting priorities; keen analytic, organization and problem solving skills which support and enable sound decision making
 "
141,IT – Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Bekasi (Jawa Barat),,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Qualification :

Max 27 years old
Candidate must prosses a least a D3 or S1 / Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Graduated from University
Komputerisasi Akuntansi , Information System , Engineering would be a advantage

Requirements :

Excellent skills business analyst job
Understanding of SDLC
Able to read Coding
Good analytical thinking
Familiar with Microsoft Project
Familiar with Databse Query
Familiar with idempiere application
Proactive with excellent communication and multi tasking skills
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Understanding of systems engineering concepts
The ability to conduct cost/benefit analysis, business case development, modelling techniques and methods.
Strong in documentation
 "
142,Business Analyst Manufacturing Development,Panarub Group,Tangerang (Banten),Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job Descriptions:

Define configuration specifications and business analysis requirements
Perform quality assurance
Define reporting and alerting requirements
Own and develop relationship with partners, working with them to optimize and enhance our integration
Help design, document and maintain system processes
Report on common sources of technical issues or questions and make recommendations to product team
Communicate key insights and findings to product team
Constantly be on the lookout for ways to improve monitoring, discover issues and deliver better value to the customer

 
Job Requirements :

Demonstrable experience in marketing data analytics and tools
Experience in analysing data to draw business-relevant conclusions and in data visualization techniques and tools
Solid experience in writing SQL queries
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong written and verbal communication skills including technical writing skills
Having experience in online marketing field
Required language(s): English, Bahasa Indonesia and Mandarin

 "
143,IT Business Analyst,Panarub Group,Tangerang (Banten) - Tangerang,Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job Descriptions:

Gather intelligence from corporate executives and middle managers about needs and future growth
Partner with application division to ensure each project meets a specific need and resolves successfully
Assume responsibility for project tasks and ensure they are completed in a timely frame.
Evaluate, test and recommend new opportunities for enhancing software, hardware and IT processes
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Evaluate and draw conclusions from data related to customer behavior
Consult with the executive team and the IT department on the newest technology and its implications in the industry  

 
Job Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Software Development, Computer Engineering, Project Management or related field
3+ years’ experience in a position related to information technology and familiar in technology development and deployment
Experience with Programming Language and database SQL Server / Postgre SQL as advantage
Having good analytical, troubleshooting, problem solving dan fast learner
Good Communication Skills and Energic
Working Location: Tangerang

 "
144,Business Analyst,PT Anabatic Technologies Tbk,"Tangerang (Banten) - Graha Anabatic,  Jl. Scientia Boulevard Kav. U2",Below expected salary,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," 
Responsibilities :

Able to capture business requirement of the client and give suggestion of best practice to client
Able to understand SQL and queries
Able to do ETL (Extract Transformation Loading)
Business Analyst of the OSL Product in Compliance and Reporting Solutions
Constructing workflow charts, diagrams, studying system capabilities, writing functional specifications
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed
Determines and analyzing user requirements, gathering information, evaluating output requirements and formats, data mapping analysis
Doing internal testing and quality assurance
Improves systems by studying current practices, designing modifications
Maintains user confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential
Prepare technical reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information
Provides references for users by writing and maintaining user documentation, providing hep desk support, and training users
Recommends controls by identifying problem, writing improved procedures
Support and assisting client during UAT (User Acceptance Test) and UVT (User Verification Test)

Requirements

Maximum 28 years old
Minimum Bachelor Degree in IT, information system, computer science, computer accounting, management information system or related field
Minimum GPA 3.00 (scale 4.00)
Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Minimum experience 1-2 years as business analyst from banking industry or consultant IT
Strong knowledge of Loan System and Banking Operation
Knowledge of financial products is required
Required skills : SQL and accounting
Excellent documentation skills to drive Gap analysis, FSD, Use Cases, Flowcharts, training materials etc
Excellence in Microsoft office, Visio
Have good knowledge and experience in business process analyst and software development life cycle
Good knowledge in banking domain industry is preferable
Good communication in English both oral & written
Have good self motivation, fast learner, can do attitude, able to work as a tema or able to work independently, good administration skill
Able to work under required time and pressure
Strong analytical skill and problem solving
Willing to work in mobile environment
Willing to be located in Gading Serpong, Tangerang, or occasionally visit clients in Jakarta area

 
 "
145,Jr. Business Analyst,PT Emerio Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Requirements : 

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Minimum 1 year experience as Business Analyst in Banking industry
Able to write SQL queries / command.
Able to work in team.
Able to work under pressure.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.

Responsibility : 


Translate business user requirement into functional and/or technical requirement.
Create high quality functional documentation including requirements and test documentation.
Create simulation to describe high level calculation & classification process that will be automatized in the project and present it to Business users and teams.
Bridging the Gap Between Business user and Tech Teams.
Liaise with technical team in the project implementation to meet functional requirements.

 "
146,IT Business Analyst,PT Atreus Global,Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 4 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 4 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
DWH and Business Support System
Telco industry experience
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.

 
Job Description:
Understanding business logic and requirement.
-  Develop business requirement documentation.
-  Mapping logic business into the system.
-  Develop Design documentation.
-  Interact with IT and business user to get clear requirement.
- Understanding data model and architecture.
- Coordination with Architect , PM and development team.
- Able to do testing result.
 
cv send to maria.lestari(a)atreusg.com
  "
147,IT Business Analyst,PT Sinergi Daya Mitra,Jakarta Raya - Jakarta Selatan,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Electrical/Electronic), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 4-6 year(s) of working experience as Business Analyst
Required Skill(s): SQL, JavaScript, PHP, C++, .NET
Having experience in IT Project/SDLC
Have ability to create the documentation
Good capabilities of functional document review
Good understanding about concept of data migration from one system to any other system.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Have a good command in English (Active)
 "
148,Microsrategy Business Analyst,PT Pandawa Karya Citra Divisi IT,Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," 
Job Requirements :

Individual aged max.28 Years.
Bachelor Degree Graduate of Industrial Engineering, Accounting Information System, Computer / Informatics, or Statistics with GPA 3.00. (Fresh Graduated considered).
Have a wide knowledge of industry business processes (Banking, Automotive, Insurance, Oil & Gas, Retail).
Like to work with clients and familiar to data analysis.
Having experience of implementing Microstrategy is a plus.
Fresh Graduates are welcome.

Job Description/s :

Microstrategy Training will be provided
Collect Client's User Requirement from various cleints
Create Project Blue Print
Create Project Design
Project Development, able to configure the software
Unit Test and User Acceptance Test

 "
149,IT Business and System Analyst Mobile,PT Astra Sedaya finance (Astra Credit Companies),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," Responsibilities :
 


Solving organizational information problems and requirements by analyzing requirements
Designing computer programs
Recommending system controls and protocols. 

 
Requirements :
 


Bachelor Degree IT (GPA min 2.75)
Maximum 30 years old
Knowledge about Financing Business Process is advantage
Good understanding and experience with SQL language
From reputable university
Minimum 2 years work experience
Preferably has the ability of mobile application (Android / IOs) and data warehousing / BI
Have a good conceptual and negotiation skill


 "
150,Business Analyst,PT Fujitsu Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 5 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 6 months contract
Able to join immediately
 
Job Responsibilities:


Have an active role in the monthly reporting and analysis, ad hoc reporting, budgeting and forecasting
Prepare, review and distribute monthly financial reports to stakeholders
Track expenses and revenues vs. budget and forecast and analyze fluctuations
Assist in the budget & forecast process
Evaluate profit and cost efficiencies
Develop, maintain and distribute as-hoc reports as needed
Perform revenue and cost recognition
Assist all stakeholder to have visibility on the forecast and actual result
Recognize revenue and cost in compliance to governance and IFRS


Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Finance/Accountancy/Banking or equivalent.
Excellent Communication skills
Strong initiative and ability to manage multiple tasks
Ability to complete timely and accurately
Must be detail oriented with strong organizational and analytical skills
Ability to work well with others in fast paced, dynamic environment
Minimum of 5 years experiences in reporting, consolidation and financial analysis. Experience in IT industry.
Required Skill(s): SAP R3, FICO Module
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Finance - General/Cost Accounting or equivalent.
 "
151,IT Business Analyst,PT Ezeelink Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1 - 50 Employees," PT Ezeelink Indonesia is hiring...
 
IT Business Analyst
(Stationed in Jakarta)
 
Requirements :

Degree in IT Majoring, Project Management or related field
Minimum 2 (two) years experience in the same position
Having analytical and logical thinking
Having experiences in application programming skill is an added value
Can work as a team work, as well as an individual

 
Job Description:

Gather intelligence from internal & external users about needs and future growth
Work together with application Team Leader and creators to ensure each project meets a specific need and resolves successfully
Responsible for project tasks and ensure they are completed in a timely fashion
Evaluate, test and recommend new opportunities for enhancing our software, hardware and IT processes
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Design and execute A/B testing procedures to extract data from test runs
Evaluate and draw conclusions from data related to customer behavior
Consult with the executive team and the IT department on the latest technology and its implications in the industry

If you think you are the right person for us, please send your application immediately, and join our success team at PT Ezeelink Indonesia. "
152,Business Analyst (E-Commerce - Beauty & Healthcare),PT. Aurora Group,Jakarta Raya - South Jakarta,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1 - 50 Employees," Responsibilities: Collaborate with project/program managers and project sponsors to understand/determine project scope and vision.Clearly identify project stakeholders and establish user classes, as well as their characteristics.Conduct interviews to gather user requirements via workshops, questionnaires, surveys, site visits, workflow storyboards, use cases, scenarios, and other methods.Research, review, and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing requirements gathering processes and develop strategies for enhancing or further leveraging these processes.Input to production of test cases to ensure features and functions have been delivered to requirement.Analyze and verify requirements for completeness, consistency, comprehensibility, feasibility, and conformity to the overall business model.Drive and challenge business units on their assumptions around how they will successfully execute their plans. Distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.Utilize standard templates to accurately and concisely write requirements specifications and to document swim lane based process flows.Translate conceptual user requirements into functional requirements in a clear manner that is comprehensible to developers/project team.Develop and conduct reviews of the business requirements with the customer community to ensure that requirement specifications are correctly interpreted.Assist project/program managers with sponsor sign off of requirement.Assist with the interpretation of user requirements into feasible options, and communicating these back to the business stakeholders.Communicate requested changes, enhancements, and modifications of business requirements– verbally or through written documentation – to project managers, sponsors, and other stakeholders so that issues and solutions are understood and a change control process can be managed.Requirement: Bachelor’s degree in Business / Marketing / Management or any field that equivalent.At least 3 years of experience as Business analyst, in retail or e-commerce would be an excellent experience.Experience with fast moving and growing organizations, and/or that you have experience working in retail organizations understanding the priorities and nature of the services provided.Experience with multiple E-Commerce implementations/operations, and preferably from that having experience with more than one E-Commerce  platformA Subject Matter Expert in other E-Commerce  platform areas like payment, product data, order management, web analytics, content management, promotions, search etcExperienced with the lifecycle in an agile / scrum environment, desirably with experience also of traditional structured programKnowledgeable about the latest in E-Commerce  solutions and who’s doing what, and full of ideas about how the best in E-Commerce  can be achievedExcellent analytical, mathematical, and creative problem-solving skills.Excellent listening, interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills, at multiple levels and across multiple disciplinesLogical and efficient, with keen attention to detail.Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.People Development.Highly self-motivated and directed, pro-actively reporting on status and tasks. Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks while under pressure.Adaptable. The role requires a willingness to take on tasks outside of a narrowly defined role, and ideally a desire to be multi-skilledCapable of working to both tactical and strategic timescales "
153,Business Analyst System,Webtocrat Motion,Surabaya (Jawa Timur) - Jalan Lontar 226 Surabaya Barat,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Menganalisa system dengan user
Membuat design system dengan user
Berkoordinasi dengan tim development terkait design system yang akan di buat
Bertanggung jawab terhadap system perusahaan
Bonus Per Project

 
Qualification:
 

Pendidikan minimal D3 / S1
Berusia Maksimal 28 Tahun
Memiliki pengalaman sebagai analis system minimal 1 tahun
Menguasai database design, PHP programming
Terbiasa menganalisa system
Mampu melakukan pengembangan system
Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): DFD, flowchart, waterfall analyst, SRS, software requirement specification
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
154,Junior Business Analyst - Functional,PT. Jati Piranti Solusindo (Jatis Solutions),Jakarta Raya - Central Jakarta,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," Responsibilities :

Collecting business requirements from clients
Identify business requirements and translate them to system requirements
Analyze system specifications
Conducting functional documentation for project
Perform user requirements from the client

 
Requirements:

Bachelor degree from reputable university majoring Computer Science/Informatics Engineering with minimun GPA 3.00 out of 4.00
Minimum 3 year(s) work experience as Business Analyst or System Analyst
Understanding of System Development Life-Cycle (SDLC)
Strong analytical thinking, fast learner, team player and result oriented
Good communication skills and fluent in English both Oral and Written
Ready to be placed on customer site in Asia Pacific Region (if needed)
 "
155,Supervisor Business Analyst,PT Lativi Mediakarya (tvOne),Jakarta Timur (Jakarta Raya) - Pulogadung,Below expected salary,Entertainment/Media,Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1001 - 2000 Employees," Job Description :

Melakukan analisa dan studi kelayakan terhadap bisnis-bisnis yang berpotensi untuk dijalankan di tvOne sebagai alternative revenue generator
Berfokus kepada bisnis yang sudah ada di tvOne (existing atau established business) dari setiap unit kerja di tvOne

 
Requirements :

Lulusan minimal S1 Ekonomi / MIPA / Teknik
Usia maksimal 35 tahun
Memiliki pengalaman di bagian teknologi / finance / di bagian yang sama minimal 5 tahun
Memiliki kemampuan Ms. Office (terutama Ms. Excel : pivot dan makro) yang baik
Memiliki keterampilan statistik dan business process yang baik

 

Human Capital tvOne : 
Jl. Rawa Terate II No. 2
Kawasan Industri Pulo Gadung, Jakarta Timur, 13260
 
www.tvOnenews.tv
 "
156,Accounting Business Analyst,Nurosoft Consulting (PT. Nuroho Software Consulting),Surabaya (Jawa Timur) - Margorejo,"IDR 3,000,000 - IDR 4,000,000","Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in or equivalent and between the age of 15-30
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Finance - General/Cost Accounting or equivalent.
 "
157,VP IT Business Analyst,PT Aprisma Wirecard,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 5 years (CEO/GM/Director/Senior Manager),201 - 500 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree/Post Graduate Diploma/Professional Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology, Business Studies/Administration/Management or equivalent.
At least 5 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): banking environment; Selenium; Leadership;negotiation
Preferably Senior Manager specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
158,IT Business Analyst,PT Murni Solusindo Nusantara,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Meruya Utara,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," JOB DESCRIPTIONS:

Doing task as a Business Analyst or as a Pre Sales
Preparing technical proposals and present the products to the customer

 
QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor Degree in Information System (SI), Information Technology (IT), or Informatics Engineering.
Have work experience as Pre-Sales Consultant or Business Analyst, minimum 2-3 years
High presentation skills and level of confidence
Excellent interpersonal skill is a must
Sales-oriented business driving force
Experience in presenting IT solutions
English proficiency
 "
159,Business Program Analyst,PT Putra Mulia Telecommunication,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Telecommunication,Min 4 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in any field.
At least 4 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
Experience in system implementation projects is a plus.

COMPETENCIES NEEDED

Excellent communicaation skills (oral & written)
Demonstrated ability to prepare and deliver presentation
Mastery of Microsoft Office Programs (Word, Excel, Powerpoint)
Self-starter and highly motivated
Able to work in a highly fast-paced environment
Attention to detail

JOB SUMMARY

Analyzes, reviews and documents the deliverables of a program throughout its lifecycle
Helps the entire program team complete the program within its planned scope, schedule, and budget, while serving as a liaison to individual projects technical, functional and non-functional teams.
 "
160,Business Analyst Coordinator,PT Cipta Krida Bahari,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Transportation/Logistics,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1001 - 2000 Employees," Requirements :Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree / Post Graduate Degree, Engineering (Industrial) or equivalent.At least 2 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.Preferably Supervisor / Coordinators specializing in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.Full-Time and Contract position(s) available.Technical Skills : Strategic Management System, Balanced Scorecard, Feasibility Studies, Sig Sigma, DMAIC, QCC, Project Management, Etc.Non-Technical Skills : Presentation, Communication, Negotiation, Analytical, Problem Solving, Managerial Skills, Etc.Job ResponsibilitiesAlign Business Process and Organization of SBU to gain Competitive Advantage, Economy of Scale and Scope.To identify significant improvements through standardization and automation of the Order To Cash and Procure to Pay process for better financial controls, lower costs of products, reduced overhead and better relationships with operations staff and vendorsAssists Business Process Improvement Manager in developing tactical, services and/or programs to support the business unit’s goals (financial, quality, services, operational efficiency, etc). Analyzes the business unit’s activities and trends and compares analyses against the services standards and best practices.Produce and documented manuals, checklist, project report as the end result of projectimprovement "
161,Business Program Analyst,PT Smart Tbk (Upstream),Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Agricultural/Plantation/Poultry/Fisheries,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Industrial), Computer Science/Information Technology, Business Studies/Administration/Management, Economics, Finance/Accountancy/Banking or equivalent.
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Fresh graduated and highy driven candidates are encouraged to apply.
Graduated either from local or overseas Ivy League.
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
Experience in system implementation projects is a plus
Strong preference for those with 1-2 years of Consulting background from major international consulting firm

COMPETENCIES NEEDED


Excellent communication skills (oral & written)
Demonstrated ability to prepare and deliver presentation
Mastery of Microsoft Office programs (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
Self-starter and highly motivated
Able to work in a highly fast-paced environment
Attention to detail
Comfortable with ambiguity and shifting priorities


JOB SUMMARY

Analyzes, reviews and documents the deliverables of a program throughout its lifecycle.
Helps the entire program team complete the program within its planned scope, schedule and budget, while serving as a liaison to individual project's technical, functional and non-functional teams.

MAIN DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Performing, analyzing and providing program / projects analysis
Support to the entire program team.




 
PERSONAL DEVELOPMENT ADVANTAGES 

Gain a broad understanding of GAR businesses and the processes behind it
Attain an in-depth understanding of GAR’s ERP, system landscape and solution
Program and project management skills
SAP knowledge


  "
162,BUSINESS ANALYST,HTC Software Singapore PTE. LTD,Jakarta Raya - Jakarta,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," ​Job Description :

Understanding business logic and requirement.
Develop business requirement documentation.
Mapping logic business into the system.
Interact with IT and business user to get clear requirement.
Develop Design documentation.
Understanding data model and architecture.
Coordination with Architect , PM and development team
Able to do testing result.


Job Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 3 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Telco experience on DWH & BSS (Business Support System)
Have a good communication, team work and hardwork
Good time management and able to work under tight dateline
Has a good attitude, discipline  & able to  work as team
Required language(s) : English

 
If Interested please send your updated word format resume with following details to nur.yanti at htcinc.com 
Current Salary
Expected Salary
Notice Period
Date of Birth
Marital Status (with Dependant Details)
 
 
 
 
 

 "
163,IT Business Analyst (Banking),PT Moonlay Technologies,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Gandaria 8 Office Tower,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Responsibilities
• You will act as IT Functional Consultant which required to analyze business and operations then create business requirements and other necessary documents.
• You will also required to create preliminary system analysis for software development process to help providing the best solution to user.
• Do testing for project assigned.
• Willing to be placed in Gandaria 8 Office Tower.

Academic Qualification
• Undergraduate degree (S1/B.Sc./B.A.) with GPA 3.0 from reputable universities
• Majoring in Industrial Engineering, System Information and Information Technology
• Experience as Teaching Assistant, Lab. Assistant or Relevant Academic Organization is an advantage
 

Attitude Qualification
• Attractive personality
• Discipline, Hardworking, able to work under pressure
• Result Oriented with good process justification
• Excellent English both in verbal and written is a must
• Communicative & social awareness
• Good individual and team player
 
 
Aptitude Qualification
• Excellent Business Process understanding and technical area (coding and database)
• High analytical, problem solving skill, and solution driven
• High attention to detail and high responsibility towards the success of the project
• Good experience on analyzing business process
• Calm and exact decision maker
• Skills in documenting user needs, UML, imagination of interface design, and user experience awareness

• Have experience in AS400 and Bank Indonesia reporting/Banking area will be advantage "
164,Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Jakarta Raya,,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Description:

Memahami kebutuhan para pemangku kepentingan
Mengidentifikasi proses bisnis saat ini dan yang akan datang
Membantu bisnis stakeholder, merencanakan visi kedepan dan mendukung mereka melakukan semua perubahan pada waktu yang akan datang
Menetapkan dan mendokumentasikan proses bisnis serta fungsi bisnis
Melakukan konsultasi dengan unit manajemen fungsional serta pihak-pihak yang bersangkutan untuk mengidentifikasi, menetapkan, serta mendokumentasikan keperluan dan tujuan bisnis, permasalahan prosedur operasional saat ini, kebutuhan input dan output, serta level dari akses sistem
Bertugas sebagai penghubung antara end-user, analis teknis, analis teknologi informasi, konsultan, dan organisasi lain dalam hal analisa, desain, uji konfigurasi, serta pemeliharaan system untuk memastikan operasional tetap optimal
Menganalisa kelayakan dan pengembangan kebutuhan untuk sistem baru serta perangkat tambahan untuk sistem yang ada, dan memastikan desain sistem sesuai dengan kebutuhan user
Melacak serta mendokumentasikan perubahan untuk spesifikasi fungsional dan bisnis; mencatat keseluruhan detail prosedur secara universal untuk pencatatan permanen dan untuk digunakan dalam pelatihan
Mengidentifikasi peluang untuk meningkatkan proses bisnis melalui sistem informasi dan / atau perubahan non-driver sistem; membantu dalam penyusunan proposal untuk mengembangkan sistem baru dan/ atau perubahan operasional
Membantu dalam mengembangkan strategi manajemen perubahan secara keseluruhan
Melakukan analisis dampak perubahan untuk menilai implikasi perubahan yang berpotensi serta mendokumentasikan fungsi serta persyaratan bisnis
Berpartisipasi dalam uji integrasi sistem (STI) & uji penerimaan pengguna (UAT) dari fungsi sistem baru
Membantu kinerja & keamanan pengujian fungsi sistem baru
Memberikan bantuan fungsional dalam pelatihan, mentoring, serta pembinaan staf profesional dan teknis
Mengembangkan materi pelatihan dan melakukan sesi pelatihan formal yang meliputi modul sistem yang ditugaskan
Membantu staf teknis atau staf administrasi atau bertindak sebagai ketua tim pada proyek yang ditunjuk atau ditugaskan

 
Persyaratan:

Usia minimal 28 tahun
Pendidikan S1 Ekonomi, Manajemen, Bisnis Ekonomi, Marketing, Pengembangan Bisnis
Pengalaman minimal  3 tahun di bidang pengembangan bisnis
Menguasai Ms. Office
Bahasa Inggris aktif
Memiliki jiwa kepemimpinan, jujur dan teliti
Mampu membuat budget, Financial projection
Project management
Memiliki kemampuan analisa, presentasi dan kemampuan mempengaruhi
Memiliki keahlian Negosiasi secara aktif
 "
165,IT Business Analyst,PT Informasi Teknologi Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Information System or IT related discipline.
Minimum 3 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Knowledge of Software Development Life Cycle.
Understanding and experience with SQL language (for query purpose).
Knowledge about Life Insurance products and business processes are advantages.
Experience in using Agile as system development methodology is also an advantage.
Flowchart (act. diagram)
Knowledge of Functiona Spec. Doc (FSD)
SIT (System Integration Testing)
Good analytical and problem solving skills
Good communication (written & verbal) and interpersonal skills
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in IT/Computer - Network/System/Database Admin or equivalent.
 "
166,Business Analyst,PT. Salam Pacific Indonesia Lines,Surabaya (Jawa Timur),Below expected salary,Transportation/Logistics,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),2001 - 5000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Required language(s): English, Bahasa Indonesia
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Business Analyst, Software Development & Database, Communications, Documentation & Analysis
Fresh Garduate are welcome to apply
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
167,Business Analyst,PT Kuliner Digital Sejahtera (Subsidiary by ISMAYA GROUP),Tangerang (Banten) - BSD,,Food & Beverage/Catering/Restaurant,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," The Business Analyst is responsible to execute business analytics to support the company's business goals and strategy through data.
 

Role Duties & Responsibilities:

Responsible for collecting, manipulating and ensuring data quality across multiple data sources and platforms, ensuring data-backed decision making across the company;
Setup and manage daily, weekly and monthly business & KPIs reporting, and provide key business insights;
Gather data requirements and provide business & data analysis support for the whole company;
Keep up-to-date with the latest food industry, data science, technology, mobile and digital trends;
Manage and support cross-functional projects that are assigned;
Work closely with all departments, such as finance, sales, marketing, business development, operations, product and engineering.


 
Role Requirements:

Bachelor's or Master’s degree in Finance, Math/Statistics, Engineering, IT, Business and/or relevant discipline from a top institution;
Fresh graduates are welcome to apply;
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Excel and data manipulation;
Experience in programming/analytical languages (VBA, R, Python), statistical analysis and modelling, data warehousing, database management (MySQL) and Business Intelligence software a huge plus;
Experience in working with data Google Analytics, ERP, ecommerce platforms and/or digital marketing tools a huge plus;
Previous experience in a high-paced start-up environment a big plus;
Great attention to details, numbers-driven, problem-solving skills and entrepreneurial mindset is a must;
Great presentation and storytelling skills;
Curious, open-minded & always willing-to-learn;
Ability to work independently with minimum level of supervision;
Fluent in both English and Bahasa Indonesia (spoken and written)
Be willing to work in BSD City, Tangerang Selatan.


 "
168,Junior Solutions Analyst (Business Analyst),PT Intersoft Solutions,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Kelapa gading,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Involve as an analyst project divisions, until the project is finish successfully.
Work closely with client to define project scope, requirements and other documents.
Make sure software developed is accepted and accordance with specifications.
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation.
Design test scenario and do test to ensure software and system quality.
Report on a regular basis to supervisor.

 
Requirements
 

Fresh graduates with good GPA is encouraged to apply. Otherwise minimum 1 year of experience as an analyst is preffered.
Have experience working in IT companies, preferably strong understanding in ERP/POS/e-commerce system would be a plus.
Good logical and analysis skills in both system and in business, especially in business.
Posses and display ""ownership"" attittude to the work tasks.
Self-motivated, fast learner and able to work under minimum supervision.
Able to work under pressure and tight deadline.
No problem with working overtime if necessary.
Good interpersonal and communications skills.
Involved until the project is finish successfully.

 "
169,Business Analyst,Mega Insurance,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Insurance,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," Responsibilities:

Analyzing  billing data to ensure it’s accuracy and compliance with related regulations and policies
Finding solutions for any problem  arised related to customer billing 
Developing and executing improvement plans related to billing process.

Requirements:


Minimum Bachelor degree majoring Management/Business/Statistic/Accounting
Minimum 2 (two) years of working experience as billing analyst, preferably in general insurance/banking/telecommunication/FMCG/multifinance company
Strong analytical skills with exceptional attention to detail
Good interpersonal, communication and presentation skill
Self-motivated, fast learner and able to work under minimum supervision
Proficient in Ms. Office


     "
170,Business Analyst,Marketing Sentratama Indonesia (Frontier Consulting Group),Jakarta Raya,,Consulting (Business & Management),Less than 1 year experience,51 - 200 Employees," 
Tanggung Jawab :
Menerima, mengumpulkan, dan mengolah permintaan data
 

Tugas :
 


Menerima permintaan data
Memeriksa ketersediaan data yang diminta
Merakapitulasi permintaan data
Memperbaharui (update) data sekunder
Mengolah data sekunder
Melakukan validasi terhadap data sekunder
Mengirimkan data sekunder kepada user setelah divalidasi
Mempersiapkan data untuk project
Mengolah data project
Mempersiapkan laporan project
Report progress ke Associate Busines Analyst
Melakukan filing terhadap data sekunder berdasarkan kelompok industri
Membuat laporan mingguan, bulanan, tahunan

 
Kualifikasi :
 


Usia 22 – 27 tahun
Pendidikan minimal S-1 jurusan pemasaran
Fresh Graduate
Mengerti teori pemasaran dan analisis pasar dengan baik
Mampu mengoperasikan MS-Office (Word, Excell, dll)
Outgoing dan selfmotivated
Fast learner
Berkepribadian baik
Pekerja keras dan dapat bekerja dalam tim




 "
171,Business Analyst,PT Pelita Abadi Sejahtera,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - Bandung kota,,General & Wholesale Trading,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Lulusan Sarjana (Strata 1) Teknik Industri, Lebih diutamakan
Minimal IPK 3.00 (Standar 4.00)
Usia Minimal 25 tahun
Memiliki pengalaman 2 tahun, Lebih diutamakan
Kualifikasi: Memiliki ketelitian, memiliki kemampuan analisa berpikir, Mampu mengelola sumberdaya manusia, Mampu mengolah data, Mampu Melakukan Evaluasi dan Kontrol, Mahir Menggunakan Microsoft Office, Mampu Berkomunikasi Persuasif, Memiliki Kemampuan Presentasi, dan Memiliki Jiwa Kepemimpinan
Tugas Utama: Melakukan evaluasi, perencanaan, dan kontrol untuk perkembangan Bisnis Perusahaan. Mulai dari Analisa Stok Barang, Analisa Sistem Operasional, sampai dengan Analisa Sistem Kontrol
Bersedia ditempatkan di Bandung
Bersedia bekerja dengan Target
 "
172,Business Analyst,PT Ecomindo Sarana Cipta,Jakarta Raya,"IDR 6,000,000 - IDR 12,000,000",Consulting (Business & Management),Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Job Description

Analyze and synthesize information provided by a large number of people who interact with the business, such as customers, staff, IT professionals, and executives. 
Eliciting the actual needs of stakeholders, not simply their expressed desires
Facilitate communication between organizational units
Play a central role in aligning the needs of business units with the capabilities delivered by information technology and may serve as a """"translator"""" between those groups
Investigating goals and issues to understand the project and possible solutions
Documenting findings -spend a fair amount of time documenting what they learn and observe, and the results of their analyses
Identifying options for solving specific problems, then help select the best one. The chosen solution is then evaluated throughout design and construction to ensure that it continues to meet the business needs
Support the implementation, if issues come up during implementation that cause some new requirements to be addressed, BA have to facilitate a problem-solving meeting to discover how a particular business need can be met given newly discovered technology constraints
To liaise proactively with internal & external clients
To assess existing systems as per the guidance of supervisor and application team
To understand business requirements and provide write-ups in a form of proposed solution design in response to the requirements
To identify options for potential solutions and assessing for both technical and business suitability
To create Functional Specification Document (FSD) to be reviewed by supervisor
To present Functional Specification Document (FSD)
To working closely with developers and users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction

 
Job Qualification

Strong communication skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Super teamwork with minimum supervision
Good interpersonal skills
Ability to generate well-structured documents
Good understanding of banking knowledge and processes are preferred
Deep knowledge and experiences in the project which include designing, building , testing and implementing the solution in different area of the Bank""
Minimum 3 – 4 years experience as Business/System Analyst
Minimum 1 – 2 years experience in banking industry
 Excellent communication and interpersonal skills to gather and collaborate requirements, both oral and written
Fast learner, self-motivated and attention to details
Fluent in English is a must
 Full Time

 "
173,Junior Solutions Analyst (Business Analyst),PT Intersoft Solutions,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Kelapa gading,"IDR 4,100,000 - IDR 5,330,000",Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Involve as an analyst project divisions, until the project is finish successfully.
Work closely with client to define project scope, requirements and other documents.
Make sure software developed is accepted and accordance with specifications.
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation.
Design test scenario and do test to ensure software and system quality.
Report on a regular basis to supervisor.

 
Requirements
 

Fresh graduates with good GPA is encouraged to apply. Otherwise minimum 1 year of experience as an analyst is preffered.
Have experience working in IT companies, preferably strong understanding in ERP/POS/e-commerce system would be a plus.
Good logical and analysis skills in both system and in business, especially in business.
Posses and display ""ownership"" attittude to the work tasks.
Self-motivated, fast learner and able to work under minimum supervision.
Able to work under pressure and tight deadline.
No problem with working overtime if necessary.
Good interpersonal and communications skills.
Involved until the project is finish successfully.

 "
174,IT Business Analyst,PT Adicipta Carsani Ekakarya,Jakarta Raya,"IDR 9,000,000 - IDR 13,000,000",Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Description : Proactively identify, clarify and prioritize business ideas, needs, and problems that require technology enablement through a mobile application.Define detailed business requirements by gathering input from different stakeholders within the client organization.Understand target audiences needs, tasks, and goals and translate them into creative concepts and functional components.Prepare presentations for project teams and stakeholders.Communicate challenges and issues as appropriate.Provide input to IT project plans in areas of highParticipate and assist Test Teams in quality assurance reviews to ensure that all the business requirements have been satisfied. Requirement : Strong analytical skills in system analysis, testing, user documentation throughout the implementation of business process and IT solutions.Candidate must possess a degree (or equivalent qualification)Minimum 2 years of experience in term of SDLC and the role of Business Analyst in this life cycleHaving experience in Banking/Finance project is a plus Benefits:Medical InsuranceAllowance  "
175,Business Analyst - Functional Consultant,PT Pradipta Jatis Indonesia (MS),Jakarta Raya - Jakarta Area,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Descriptions:
 

Creating, analyzing, and validating detailed functional specifications.
Identifying the current- and future-state business processes.
Facilitating design sessions with the implementation team to define the solution.
Delivering elements of systems design, including data migration rules, business rules, wireframes, or other detailed deliverables.

Qualifications:
 

Candidate must possess at least Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Others), Computer Science/Information Technology, Business Studies/Administration/Management or equivalent.
Required language(s): English
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Having knowlegde in Java Programming Language
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to prioritise tasks and meet deadlines
Ability to anticipate issues and respond to unforeseen changes
Have experienced in Manufacturing Industry
Willingness to travel
 "
176,Business Analyst (Code: BA),PT Multipolar Technology Tbk,Banten,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 
Develop data collection checklist including business process, existing software and application, and other requirements as well as ensure that all required data and information have been completely collected.
Evaluate and analyze the collected data and information included the captured business requirements.
Develop detailed business requirements document, present to and get approval from clients then  translate into functional design / specification document
Manage any change requests related to the working project plans daily to meet the agreed deadlines.
Learn to present and perform demonstration (with low to medium complexity) of the application or software to client.

 
Requirements:
 

Bachelor degree from Information System, Computer Science, or Technic Informatics
Fresh graduates are welcome
Have strong coordination and project management (able to manage multiple priorities effectively)
Placement at Lippo Karawaci – Tangerang
 "
177,Business Analyst,PT LinkIT360,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Description• Conduct business and user requirement analysis.• Create technical design based on user requirement & partners.• Communicate technical design to programmer & system administrator.• Create testing scenario & UAT report.• Regular update to Project Manager & Directors• Managing partner relationship.• Creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business process, aplication, and testing scenarioRequirements• Bachelor Degree of IT• Understanding & experience in SQL language & PHP• Minimum 2 years experienced in the same field• Preferable having experienced in IT VAS Telecommunication Industry• Good leadership skill, initiative, team work, integrity, and detail - oriented person• Have a good conceptual, logical, analytical negotiation skills• Fluent in English, both written & oral  "
178,IT Business Analyst (Telecommunication Industry),PT Jasa Teknologi Informasi IBM,Jakarta Raya,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 

Responsible for the design, analysis (customer, financial, operational) and presentation of data.
Applying knowledge of consulting methodologies, key technologies, engagement support tools and demonstrate strong knowledge in the area and/or industry.
Develop leadership skills through ownership of specific tasks or projects within an engagement.
Establish relationships within client organizations and deliver timely, high quality service to the client.
Participate actively in knowledge sharing activities like communities of practice, forums, conferences and/or other knowledge exchanges


 
Job Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication) or equivalent.
Required language(s): English, Bahasa Indonesia
Candidate must have 2 – 3 years experiences as Business Analyst in Telecommunication Industry
Having experiences handling ETL Process and Data Warehouse
Full-Time and Contract position(s) available.
 "
179,Business Analyst Officer,PT Asuransi Jiwa Sequis Life,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - SCBD Area,,Insurance,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),501 - 1000 Employees," Job Summary:


Conduct requirement gathering, solution analysis, testing, and production system support/troubleshooting.
Provide support for project planning and execution.
Develop training materials and conduct system usage training for business users.

Job Requirements:


Diploma/Bachelor Degree in Information Technology, Life Insurance major, Mathematics or Finance/Accounting.


Good knowledge in business analysis and IT documentation writing skills.


Fresh graduates are welcome to apply or minimum 1 years work experience as Business Analyst, specifically handling unit link insurance product.


 "
180,Business Analyst Regulatory Banking,PT Emerio Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Gandaria,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 4 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," Requirements : 


Graduate Degree in any discipline, GPA 3.0/4
Has a minimum of 4 years of experience as Functional Consultant / Business Analyst /Quality. Assurance/System Analyst in Banking Industry or IT Consulting with experience in Regulatory Banking projects (LBU, LHBU, SID, PSAK).
Good data modeling and mapping concept.
Knowledge in DB Query, Web application or AS400 is preferred.
Knowledge in Central Bank Regulatory Reporting is advantage.
Good knowledge of SDLC (System Development Life Cycle) documentations.
Experienced in technical background as technical analyst would be a strong benefit.
Extensive knowledge of Requirement gathering and Analysis.
Able to write SQL queries / command.
Having experience in programming is an advantage.
Having experience in leading a team & project is an advantage.
English proficiency is a must, both in oral and written.
Strong analytical thinking, has good verbal and communication skill as well as presentation skill.

 
Responsibilities : 


Elicitation of detail requirement with business stakeholder.
Validate and verify business requirement.
Create project deliverable document such as Business Requirement document and Functional Design document.
Work closely with all IT application owner team to syntesize the solution that needs to be build.
Deliver test strategy, test planning, and test cases for User Acceptance Test (UAT).
Support the implementation process including the preparation of user manual or training material.
Assist Business Owner in preparing and conducting UAT.
Monitor closely the post implementation.
Lead the Software Development Life Cycle, including analysis, design, development and testing of Microsoft SharePoint / .NET applications.
Create high quality functional documentation including requirements and test documentation.
Liaise with technical team in the project implementation to meet functional requirements.
Leading & mentoring project team.
Develop and implement master pages, views, forms, templates, external lists, external content types, custom lists, web parts, master pages and other custom components.
Estimate work content and achieving planned timelines.
Provides recommendation and solution including workaround solution to solve problem.
Database scripting (SP, View, etc).
 "
181,IT Business System Analyst,PT Nawa Data Solutions,"Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya), Tangerang (Banten)",,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma in any field.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Good Analysis, Communication and Problem Solving, Relationship Database Management System, Flow Chart, Use Case, User Interface & User Experience, Understand Oject Oriented Programming Concept, SQL / MySQL, Visio, Word, Excel, Power Point
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
182,Business Analyst Assisstant Manager,PT Heksa Solution Insurance,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Gatot Subroto,,Insurance,Min 2 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," Kompetensi:

Mengerti siklus perancangan sistem (SDLC)
Kemampuan menulis spesifikasi teknis
Kemampuan analisa dan memberi alternatif solusi
Memiliki pengetahuan asuransi jiwa
Menguasai proses bisnis asuransi jiwa

Jobdesc:

Merancang solusi sistem yang efektif
Merumuskan kebutuhan user
Melaksanakan UAT
Membuat spesifikasi sistem
Membuat sign off UAT
 "
183,Business Process Analyst,ASIA PULP AND PAPER,Jakarta Raya,,Manufacturing/Production,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Job Requirements:Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Finance/Accountancy/Banking or equivalent.At least 1 year experience as business analyst in FMCG industryhave strong knowledge on FMCG business processHave strong analytical thinking and very detail oriented personMust be familiar with SAP system Job Description:Creates, monitors, and evaluates business process flow in accurate mannerAssist business users on implementing new business processResponsible on delivering document process information trough visual diagrams "
184,Business Analyst,PT Matrica Consulting Service,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Gatot Subroto,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1 - 50 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Required language(s): English
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Fluent in English, Create document requirement & software design based on client business process • Create database design • Develop a framework in software development by programmers
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
185,Business Analyst,PT DAnS Multi Pro,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 10,000,000 - IDR 17,500,000",Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Having experiences as IT Business Analyst/System Analys/Business Solution/Programmer
Having  experiences for 2-3 years.
Having experiences in inventory and warehouse.
Conduct business and user requirement analysis.
Gain / maintain an in-depth knowledge of business functions.
Investigate, evaluate and report alternative solutions to business needs and recommend the preferred solution.
Creating system, documentation, database, flowchart, business process, application, and testing scenario.
Coordinate with business user and programmer team in software development project.
To communicate with user departments, explaining the impact of any change and training them in the use of new applications.
Having negotiation and presentation skill
Have Ms Office and Ms Visio Skill
Fluent in English both verbal and written

 "
186,IT – Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Bekasi (Jawa Barat),,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Qualification :

Max 27 years old
Candidate must prosses a least a D3 or S1 / Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Graduated from University
Komputerisasi Akuntansi , Information System , Engineering would be a advantage

Requirements :

Excellent skills business analyst job
Understanding of SDLC
Able to read Coding
Good analytical thinking
Familiar with Microsoft Project
Familiar with Databse Query
Familiar with idempiere application
Proactive with excellent communication and multi tasking skills
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Understanding of systems engineering concepts
The ability to conduct cost/benefit analysis, business case development, modelling techniques and methods.
Strong in documentation

 "
187,Business Intelligence / Product Analyst,Halodoc (PT Polinasi Iddea Investama),"Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Setiabudi,  Kuningan",,Healthcare/Medical,Min 4 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," 
Bachelor degree in IT, IS, or Computer Science or Master
Minimum  2  year experience in a related position.. 
Analytical thinking which is able to process information logically
Proficiency in SQL query
Experience with common data visualization tools
Experience in app analytics platform/ tool is a plus
Have fast learning capability and natural curiosity about data
Have good sense of ownership
Able to work under pressure
Fluent in English, written and spoken
 "
188,Business Analyst & Project Management,PT Reycom Document Solusi,"Jakarta Raya - Tanah Abang,  Jakarta Pusat",,Printing/Publishing,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Responsibilities:

Understanding business process management and business requirements of the customers and translating them to specific software requirements.
Making sure that the recommended solution is commercial yet competitive.
Documenting and analyzing the required information and data.
Understanding the technical designs as well as the specifications.Evaluating the information gathered through workshops and surveys, business process description and task analysis.
Effectively communicating with internal teams and external clients to deliver functional requirements like GUI, screen and interface designs.
Very strong technical skills coupled with business intelligence and a deep understanding of customer's needs so that they can be transformed into application and operational requirements.
Acting as an interface between business units, technology teams and support teams.

Requirements:


Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree or Master's Degree / Post Graduate
Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Preferably have certification in FileNet CM & Data Capture with 1-2 year-experience in implementation
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)s specializing in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
Job role in Software Engineer/Programmer or Project Management.
1 Full-Time position(s) available.

 "
189,User Representative Information Technology - Business Analyst,PT Finansia Multi Finance (Kredit Plus),Jakarta Raya,,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Tugas & Tanggung Jawab;

Sebagai penghubung antara user dengan Departemen Information Technology dalam menerjemahkan dari bahasa user ke dalam bahasa information Technology sehingga program yang telah selesai sesuai dengan keinginan User

 
Kualifikasi ;

Usia maksimal 30 tahun
Pendidikan D3/ S1 Teknik Informatika
Memahami  programming
Mengerti Business Process
Memiliki pengalaman dibidang multifinance/ perbankan/ IT Solution
Memiliki kompetensi komunikasi yang baik
 "
190,IT Business Analyst,PT Lawencon Internasional,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," Job Descriptions:

Define application problem conferring with clients; evaluation procedures,  and processes
Controls solution by establishing specifications; coordinating production with programmers
Ensure operation by training client personnel; providing support
Provide reference by writing documentation

 
Job Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least a Diploma, Bachelor's Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Engineering (Others), Mathematics or equivalent.
Required skill(s):  SDLC, analytical analysis, Banking business process,.NET/Java, BI, Good communication skill, English and attractive personality
At least 3 years experience as Business Analyst is required.
Experienced in banking industry is preferable.
Full-Time and Contract position(s) available.
 "
191,Business Analyst,PT Asuransi Jiwa Kresna,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Sudirman,,Insurance,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 
Collecting requirements for the project business, analyzing them and guiding the developmental team in optimizing their work.
Documenting the projects by preparing functional specification documents and user interface guides for the reference of the end users.
Assisting at various levels of project and helping in task analysis.
Executing test scenarios and test scripts and making necessary changes in the projects to meet client requirements
Monitoring deliverables and ensuring timely completion of projects.
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): HTML5, CSS, PHP, ASP.net, Ajax
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Network/System/Database Admin or equivalent.
Solid experience in writing MsSQL queries.
Ability to interpret and collate relevant data.
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation.
Strong written and verbal communication skills including technical writing skills.
 "
192,IT Business Analyst - IT System Analyst,PT Kamoro Maxima Integra,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Conduct business and user requirement analysis.Gain / maintain an in-depth knowledge of business functions.Investigate, evaluate and report alternative solutions to business needs and recommend the preferred solution.Creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business process, application, and testing scenario.Coordinate with business user and programmer team in software development project.To communicate with user departments, explaining the impact of any change and training them in the use of new applications. Selected candidates should meet the following requirements: Minimum Bachelor Degree with minimum GPA of 3.2.Minimum 1 year of experience, preferable in banking industry.Having knowledge to identifies, evaluates, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.Excellent in creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business process, application, and testing.Good leadership skill, initiative, team work, integrity, and detail-oriented person.Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including the ability to write reports and business correspondence.Analytical, good communication, and can do attitude is a mustVisit our website (www.kamoro.com) for more details information about our company.We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be contacted. Why join Us ?We offer very attractive salary and outstanding benefits.Most of our clients are multinational company which you will be exposed to a large IT environment and valuable experience in international scale projects.You will always learn new things as our projects always adopt latest technology and best practice available in the market.Last but not least, we offer a supportive and encouraging environment that puts the emphasis on teamwork. Here, your soft skill (professional relationships, character, attitude) will grow as fast as your technical skill. "
193,IT – Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Bekasi (Jawa Barat),,Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Qualification :

Max 27 years old
Candidate must prosses a least a D3 or S1 / Fresh Graduate are welcome to apply
Graduated from University
Komputerisasi Akuntansi , Information System , Engineering would be a advantage

Requirements :

Excellent skills business analyst job
Understanding of SDLC
Able to read Coding
Good analytical thinking
Familiar with Microsoft Project
Familiar with Databse Query
Familiar with idempiere application
Proactive with excellent communication and multi tasking skills
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Understanding of systems engineering concepts
The ability to conduct cost/benefit analysis, business case development, modelling techniques and methods.
Strong in documentation
 "
194,System / Business Analyst,PT Jasamedika Saranatama,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - Cikutra,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
System/Business Analyst
 
Description :         

Conduct business and user requirements analysis.
Gain/maintain an in-depth knowledge of business function.
Investigate,Evaluate and report alternative solutions to business needs and recommend the preferred solution.
Creating system documentation, database, flowchart, business prosess, application, and testing scenario.
Coordinate with business user and programmer team in software development project.
To communicate with user departments, explaining the impact of any change and training them in the use of new applications.
Design solutions by analyzing requirements, contruct workflow chart & diagrams, studying system spesification & capabilities and documenting the design into Design Document (DD) or Change Request Document (CRD).
Design & prepare test scenario & script for System Integration Test (SIT) and User Acceptance Test (UAT).
Design & prepare the strategy for data migration.

Requirements:

Min Bachelor degree with GPA min 3,25.
Min 2 years of experience as System / Business Analyst.
Strong knowledge in Object Oriented Design Analysis (OODA).
Having knowledge to identifies, evaluate, operational processes and procedures, problem and requirements.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including the ability to write reports and business corespondence.
Having basic programming ability is preferable.
Excellent in business process modelling, data modelling, aplication design, aplication testing, and system documentation.

 "
195,IT Trainee (Business Analyst Oracle),PT Bintang Toedjoe,Jakarta Timur (Jakarta Raya) - Pulomas,"IDR 6,000,000 - IDR 7,000,000",Consumer Products/FMCG,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," Tanggung Jawab:


Menganalisa flow system dan program yang dibutuhkan setiap departemen
Memodifikasi dan memelihara program-program yang berjalan dengan mengimplementasi perkembangan teknologi baru
Melaksanakan tugas incidental lain yang diberikan atasan dan corporate dengan menjaga kerahasiaan data perusahaan

Kualifikasi:


Usia maks. 28 tahun
Pendidikan S1 Teknik Informatika /Ilmu Komputer /Sistem Informasi, IPK min 3,00
Terbuka untuk fresh graduate
Lebih disukai berpengalaman min 1 tahun sebagai programmer atau berpengalaman dengan Oracle
Memiliki pemahaman & logika yang kuat dalam pemograman
Memiliki pengetahuan dasar bahasa pemograman (query: SQL)
Bersedia ditempatkan di Pulomas, Jakarta Timur
 "
196,Business Process Development Analyst (Operation Excellent),PT Mandiri Tunas Finance,Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 5,500,000 - IDR 7,150,000",Banking/Financial Services,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),2001 - 5000 Employees," Kualifikasi

Pendidikan minimal S1, diutamakan jurusan Manajemen Bisnis
Usia maksimal 35 tahun
Minima 2 tahun berpengalaman di bidang business development
Memiliki pengalaman kerja di perusahaan multifinance
Memiliki keahlian di bidang Microsoft Windows, analyze, presentation, communication.
Berwawasan tentang pemasaran, manajemen proyek, pengembangan bisnis.
Proaktif, kreatif, dan mampu bekerja dalam tim

 
Tanggung Jawab

Menyiapkan dan menganalisa data internal dan eksternal terkait bisnis atau project baru
Membuat usulan atau draft project yang akan dijalankan
Mengkoordinasikan & mengimplementasikan pelaksanaan inisiatif project dengan bagian terkait/pihak ketiga.
Membuat project charter dan project timeline
Melakukan  sosialisasi project
Melakukan evaluasi/PICA (Problem Identification & Corrective Action) dan continues improvement untuk  meningkatkan performansi inisiatif/project.
 "
197,Business Analyst,PT Administrasi Medika,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Healthcare/Medical,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1001 - 2000 Employees," Kualifikasi :

Pendidikan Min D3/ S1 T.Informatika/Sistem Informatika
Pengalaman Min 2 tahun
Memiliki pengetahuan Asuransi lebih diutamakan
Menguasai SQL, Oracle, Ms.Access,Ms.Visio,Ms.Project, VB.NET, etc
Bahasa Inggris Aktif
 "
198,Business Analyst Manager,Company Confidential,Jakarta Raya,,,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree / Post Graduate Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, Economics, Business Studies/Administration/Management, Marketing, Commerce or equivalent.
At least 5 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Manager / Assistant Managers specializing in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
Full-Time position(s) available.
 "
199,Junior Solutions Analyst (Business Analyst),PT Intersoft Solutions,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Kelapa gading,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Involve as an analyst project divisions, until the project is finish successfully.
Work closely with client to define project scope, requirements and other documents.
Make sure software developed is accepted and accordance with specifications.
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation.
Design test scenario and do test to ensure software and system quality.
Report on a regular basis to supervisor.

 
Requirements
 

Fresh graduates with good GPA is encouraged to apply. Otherwise minimum 1 year of experience as an analyst is preffered.
Have experience working in IT companies, preferably strong understanding in ERP/POS/e-commerce system would be a plus.
Good logical and analysis skills in both system and in business, especially in business.
Posses and display ""ownership"" attittude to the work tasks.
Self-motivated, fast learner and able to work under minimum supervision.
Able to work under pressure and tight deadline.
No problem with working overtime if necessary.
Good interpersonal and communications skills.
Involved until the project is finish successfully.

 "
200,Business Analyst,PT Global Loyal Sejahtera,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),"IDR 10,000,000 - IDR 15,000,000",Consulting (Business & Management),Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1 - 50 Employees," 
Identifies and recommends operational improvement opportunities utilizing reporting data.
 
Primary responsibilities

Completes process and trend analysis
Interacts with management recommending next-step and operational strategies
Manages data analysis for the business’ portfolios in various sectors (transportation, hotels, lifestyle and retail)
Prepare reports (detail and summary level)
Present report results to management, including data-driven recommendations for business alternatives.
Evaluates the financial effect of existing and new implemented initiatives
Assist in the design of new systems and procedures to meet key business objectives
Work with various team members internally and externally to define solutions across all project components

Qualifications

Minimum 2 years of professional working experience as an analyst
Proficient in Microsoft PowerPoint and Excel
Demonstrated interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills (in English and Bahasa Indonesia)
Capable of analyzing and interpreting market and financial data
Ability to work independently and as part of a tea

Benefits

Young, vibrant and entrepreneurial work environment
Open-space office
Chance to make a difference in the loyalty landscape in Indonesia
Working with clients from various exciting industries
Health Insurance
Competitive salary

 "
201,Business Analyst Manager,Trans Ritel Properti,Jakarta Raya,,Property/Real Estate,Min 8 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in any field.
At least 8 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in Marketing/Business Development or equivalent.
 "
202,Business Analyst and Quality Assurance Department Head,PT Central Santosa Finance,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Gedung WTC Mangga Dua,Below expected salary,Banking/Financial Services,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),2001 - 5000 Employees," 
Pendidikan minimal S1 Teknik Informatika atau Sistem Informasi
IPK min 3.00
Usia maksimal 35 tahun
Memiliki pengalaman minimal 5 tahun sebagai team leader dalam bidang Business Analyst maupun Quality Assurance
Memiliki kemampuan yang sangat baik tentang RDBMS
Memiliki keinginan belajar yang tinggi
Memiliki kemampuan untuk mendapatkan kebutuhan user, pembuatan dokumen, kebutuhan bisnis, hingga mengaplikasikannya kedalam sistem 
Kritis, detail, analitis, dan proaktif 
Mampu bekerja di bawah tekanan
Mampu memimpin tim dengan baik
 "
203,Junior Solutions Analyst (Business Analyst),PT Intersoft Solutions,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Kelapa gading,,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 

Involve as an analyst project divisions, until the project is finish successfully.
Work closely with client to define project scope, requirements and other documents.
Make sure software developed is accepted and accordance with specifications.
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation.
Design test scenario and do test to ensure software and system quality.
Report on a regular basis to supervisor.

 
Requirements
 

Fresh graduates with good GPA is encouraged to apply. Otherwise minimum 1 year of experience as an analyst is preffered.
Have experience working in IT companies, preferably strong understanding in ERP/POS/e-commerce system would be a plus.
Good logical and analysis skills in both system and in business, especially in business.
Posses and display ""ownership"" attittude to the work tasks.
Self-motivated, fast learner and able to work under minimum supervision.
Able to work under pressure and tight deadline.
No problem with working overtime if necessary.
Good interpersonal and communications skills.
Involved until the project is finish successfully.

 "
204,Corporate Business Analyst,Nusantara Sakti Group,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Banking/Financial Services,Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," JOB DESCRIPTION :

Membuat rekomendasi dan analisa data terkait sistem yang digunakan oleh manajemen.
Membuat usulan dan perbaikan sistem yang digunakan oleh manajemen.
Monitoring progres setiap project yang telah diproses oleh divisi IT.

 
JOB QUALIFICATION :

Usia maksimal 27 tahun.
Pendidikan minimal S1 Akuntansi, Statistika, Teknik Industri, Teknik Informatika, atau Matematika dengan IPK minimal 3,00 (skala 4,00).
Memiliki kemampuan mengoperasikan Ms. Office dengan baik, terutama Ms. Excel.
Memiliki kemampuan untuk menganalisa.
Berjiwa kepemimpinan dan memiliki komunikasi yang baik.
 "
205,Business Analyst,PT Hariff Daya Tunggal Engineering,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - Kota Bandung,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Hardware),Min 1 year (Supervisor/Coordinator),51 - 200 Employees," JOB DESCRIPTION

This position demand constant learning for new trends and technologies to promote business growth.
Analyzing market trends and make plans to propose new product or market after collaborate with RnD  and Marketing Department
Make weekly report, analysis, and forecasting
Make and propose business plan

 
JOB SPECIFICATION

Candidate must possess at least Master's Degree from any field, with Bachelor Degree's in Electro / Engineering / Telecommuncation / IT is a must
Fresh graduate from Master Degree are very welcomed
Have great interest in learning new trends and technologies
Self-starter and highly motivated
Have English proficiency in both verbal and written
Love to travel
Willing to work in Bandung or domicile in Bandung area
 "
206,BUSINESS PROCESS ANALYST,PT Inter Aneka Lestari Kimia,"Tangerang (Banten) - Daan Mogot,  Tangerang",,Construction/Building/Engineering,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," Position Summary
 
Under limited supervision, the Senior Systems Analyst provides leadership and coordination of project teams consisting of management. users, IS staff, and vendors. Performs systems analyst activities and makes recommendations in areas that require a high level of technical competency
 
Nature and Scope

Position is one of several based in the Information Systems department. Incumbent is responsible for project organization and execution and will participate in design, vendor evaluation, implementation, and management of: multiple projects. This individual provides technical direction and supervision to analyst staff in the development and implementation of systems or in problem solving. Incumbent reports to the Manager, Financial Applications, Logistik Applications, Manufacture Applications

Essential Areas of Responsibility

All areas of responsibility listed below are essential to the satisfactory performance of this position by any/all incumbents, with reasonable accommodation, if necessary. Any non-essential functions are assumed to be included in ""Other related duties as assigned""

Performs Systems Analysis/Database Design/Programming and Training:

Performs analysis and makes recommendations in areas that require a high level of technical competency
Designs data bases and data dictionary criteria
Performs a variety of complex programming tasks, such as designing, documenting, and coding program logic
Provides technical training, guidance, and resource support for end users and Departmental staff
Provides application support and enhancements to existing applications. Defines system requirements, priorities, and viable alternatives. Coordinates the efforts of staff to locate, assess, install, test, and maintain computer software systems. Coordinates conversions and upgrades to vendor systems
Performs as a project lead and directs systems analysts. Provides leadership and coordination on projects assigned to systems analysts
In addition to all accountabilities of the Systems Analyst position, assumes greater leadership role, utilizing broader knowledge and high level technical skills
Assists in developing user documentation and departmental policies and procedures that impact the use of application systems
Continues to develop professional skills in the information systems and health care fields through trade magazines, manuals, seminars, and courses. Assist sin training analyst staff
Performs complex Senior Systems Analyst duties on a regular and continuous basis
Performs other related duties as assigned

 
Minimum Qualifications:
 

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Systems/ Industrial Engineering, Business Administration or related field, and one to two years of post graduate studies
Minimum of two years experience in systems analysis and/or programming required with project management or leadership responsibilities
Must have ability to exercise independent judgment in planning, organizing, and performing systems analyst tasks. Some independent judgment required in setting priorities of tasks among multiple assigned projects
Must have ability to communicate, motivate, and organize projects among a broad spectrum of personnel throughout the network, frequently under deadline pressure
Knowledge of information systems, including some familiarity with financial /business applications, clinical applications, managed care applications, or al, sufficient to use and support on-line, interactive applications based on equipment ranging from large-scale minicomputers to microcomputers, and to plan and perform medium- to large-scale computer projects

  "
207,SAP Analyst (Business Process Analyst) - Based in Medan,PT Wilmar Consultancy Services,Medan (Sumatera Utara) - B&G Tower 5th floor suite 501-504,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," The SAP Analyst is primarily responsible to provide consultancy services and conduct system implementation / support  of SAP projects as assigned
 
JOB DESCRIPTION
 

Identify and translate system requirements into software design documentation
Assist in development of internal and external presentations, client reports and proposals
Configure, test and deploy solutions based on business blueprints
Participate in SAP implementation and rollout/ upgrade project
Assist in the development of solutions, effort estimates and project execution plan

 
REQUIREMENTS
 

ENGLISH is a MUST
Bachelor's Degree in Economic, Engineering (Industrial), Information System
FRESH GRADUATE are encouraged to apply
Fast learner, able to work independently under minimum supervision & deliver effectively as a team
Has strong analytical skills and problem solving skills
Understand business process in plantation area / industry is preffered
Able to think creatively and solve complex technical problems
Able to work in multi-national team under pressure and within tight deadline
Excellent interpersonal and customer relation skills, ability to communication effectively with people from all levels and culture
 "
208,Business System Analyst,PT Javan Cipta Solusi,Bandung (Jawa Barat) - Antapani,Below expected salary,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," Experience:

Memiliki keahlian atau pernah membuat dokumen teknis pengembangan sistem/aplikasi
Memiliki kemampuan analisis yg tinggi dan mempunyai problem solving skill yang baik
Memahami dan mengikuti perkembangan bisnis IT
Bersedia melakukan perjalanan dinas ke luar kota

Responsibilities:

Membuat proposal teknis sesuai dengan kebutuhan klien
Mengidentifikasi kebutuhan klien dan memberikan solusi teknologi bagi setiap problem pada klien.
Melakukan presentasi solusi IT kepada client
Mendukung aktifitas penjualan (sales & marketing) pada perusahaan
Membuat materi teknis marketing dari layanan/product perusahaan
Menyusun portofolio produk dan pengalaman perusahaan
Mempromosikan portofolio produk dan pengalaman perusahaan kepada klien
Menjalin hubungan baik dengan klien
Melakukan update informasi-informasi yang terkait dengan teknologi IT terbaru


Requirements:

Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree in Engineering (Computer/Telecommunication), Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 1 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Komunikasi, Presentasi, Interpersonal Skill
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
Usia maks 35 tahun


 "
209,Business Analyst,PT Cipta Dinamika Unggul,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),1 - 50 Employees," 
Gather data through reports and data mining
Understand past and current trends and the key drivers
Pro-actively analyze data to figure out business trends to give insghts to management and business functions
Track company performance againts target (track KPI)Communicate trends and insight to management and related business functions

 
Requirements:
 

Age between 22-28 years old.
Candidate must possess at least a Bachelors Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology, FinancelAccountancy/Banking, Business Studies/Administration/Management, Mathematics or equivalent.

 
Required skill:
 

MS Excel, MYSQL.
Have 1 year working experience as Business Analyst would be preferred.
High motivation and high responsibility.
Excellent communication skill (Flucn in English).
Hard worker and adaptable.
Having strong analytical skill and problem solving.
 "
210,Senior Business Analyst - Software Solutions,PT. Jati Piranti Solusindo (Jatis Solutions),Jakarta Pusat (Jakarta Raya),,Computer/Information Technology (Software),Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),201 - 500 Employees," Responsibilities:

Leading the research and analysis of competitive landsacape, customers, product metrics, and latest internet trends to identify and fill product gaps and generate new ideas that grow market shares, improve customers experience and drive growth and conversion
Define Continuous Enhancements
Translate product strategy into detailed requirements and application experiences
Scope and prioritize activities based on businesses and customer impact
Act as a product evangelist to build awareness and understanding
Identify key factors to retain customers, increase return rate of visitors/users, increase current customer spending's/leads, and retain customers - increase repurchase rate or repeat customers
Customer Centric in designing processess and application experiences
Bring user needs to meet with their business needs and translate them into product (feature) concepts

Requirements:

Bachelor's Degree in Informatics Engineering, Computer Science related.
Min. 5 yeas of work experience as IT Business Analyst or Functional Consultant in Payment, Banking, Investment Industry
Proven track record of working in project basis complying in quality, budget, and timescale
Preferably experience domain Wealth Management/Human Capital/eCommerce
Excellent verbal and writing communication in Bahasa and English
Strong analytical thinking and problem solving skill
Love Math and Data, capability to perform data analysis
Required Skill(s): Project Management skill, Basic SQL Query, Documentation Skill (Use Case, Activity Diagram, UI Wireframe)
Able to work with tight deadline
Team player and also able to work independently
Able to mentor the team
Maintain high level of honesty and integrity
 "
211,BUSINESS ANALYST,PT Infomedia Solusi Humanika,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),More than 5000 Employees," BUSINESS ANALYST Kualifikasi : 1. Pendidikan S1 jurusan Sistem Informasi / Teknik Informatika like Accounting, Economics or Information Systems.2. Usia maximal 30 tahun3. Expert Microsoft Office, terutama Microsoft Excel.4. Mengerti SPSS dan software statistic lainnya.5. Berbahasa Inggris cukup aktif. Deskripsi Pekerjaan : 1. Memonitor, mengontrol dan mengkoordinasikan program pengembangan produk dan jasa dalam rangka meningkatkan jumlah pendapatan.2. Menganalisa dan menghitung kebutuhan biaya seluruh pembiayaan pengembangan bisnis.3. Memonitor, mengontrol dan mengoptimalkan strategi kemitraan dan model pengembangan bisnis agar dapat menambah jumlah cabang baru4. Mengupdate, mereview, menganalisa dan mengevaluasi perbaikan model pengembangan bisnis yang jelas dan dimengerti oleh seluruh pihak terkait.5. Menyiapkan, menganalisa, dan menghitung kebutuhan biaya seluruh pembiayaan pengembangan bisnis.6. Mereview, memonitor, dan mengendalikan seluruh pihak terkait dalam rangka pengembangan bisnis perusahaan sehingga dapat dibuatkan analisa investasi dan resiko pengembangan bisnis.7. Menganalisa dan mengkoordinasikan laporan kerja secara periodic dan tepat waktu. Bila anda siap dan memenuhi syarat, silahkan datang, berpakaian rapi, membawa cv lengkap. Untuk wawancara di kantor kami setiap Senin - Jumat, jam 09.00 - 15.00, beralamat di bawah ini. PT. Infomedia Solusi HumanikaGedung Bank Mandiri (gedung chaseworth) lantai 1Jl.RS.Fatmawati no.75Cipete, Kebayoran BaruJakarta Selatan021-7237928 Persis sebelah Pasar onderdil CipetePIC : Mr. Dendy / Mr. Irvan  "
212,Business System Analyst,PT Flextronics Technology Indonesia,Kepulauan Riau,Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Less than 1 year experience,51 - 200 Employees," Support Baan V ERP in Sales, Purchase, Warehousing, Service, etc.Conduct “As-Is” and “To-Be” Business Process StudiesDevelop DEM modelsProvide user training and documentationProvide full LN functional trainingCreate Conference Room Pilot (CRP) presentations and support usersProvide full functional scenario testingParticipate in business process re-design and gap resolutionProvide data validation and assist with data migrationPrepare functional specifications and requirements for customizationsTrain key / end users on-site and remotely over WebExCandidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.Required skill(s): structured query language (sql), visual basic.net (vb.net), Erp Baan, ASP.NET.No work experience required.Full-Time position(s) available. "
213,Business Analyst,PT. FORTUNA PRIMA INDONESIA,Bandung (Jawa Barat),"IDR 5,000,000 - IDR 8,000,000",Advertising/Marketing/Promotion/PR,Min 3 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Responsibility

Articulate needs and the rationale for change, design  and describe solutions that deliver value to stakeholder

Job Description

Understanding enterprise problems and  goals, ex. create Business Requirement Document (BRD)
Analyzing needs and solutions
Devising strategies, ex. create Business Plan
Driving Change

Requirements

Bachelor/ master degree of management, information technology information systems and related fields
At least 3 years working experience in business analyst, systems analyst, product manager or related roles
Have excellent communication skill
Understanding Business Analyst Body of Knowledge (BABOK) will be advantage
Understanding F & B business will be advantage
Have CCBA, CBAP ( from IIBA ) or PMI-PBA  (from PMI) title will be advantage 
 "
214,IT Business Analyst,Erajaya Group,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya) - Jalan Bandegan Selatan - Pekojan,Below expected salary,Retail/Merchandise,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 

Support System Analyst from Business Side

Understand business requirements
Application design
Testing, Training to users, support & maintanance
Project Management

Requirement : 

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree / Post Graduate Degree, Engineering (Computer Science/IT) or equivalent .
Required skill(s): ERP implementation / application experience
Required language(s): English, Bahasa Indonesia
At least 2 year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
 "
215,Business Process Standardization Analyst,PT Alam Sutera Realty Tbk,Tangerang (Banten) - Alam Sutera,,Property/Real Estate,Min 2 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1001 - 2000 Employees," Requirements:
 

Candidate must possess at least a Bachelor's Degree, Engineering (Information Technology/Industrial) or equivalent.
At least 2 years of working experience in business process/improvement, preferable from property development company.
Excellence analytical thinking
Willing to work in Alam Sutera, Tangerang area.
 "
216,IT Business Analyst,Panarub Group,Tangerang (Banten) - Tangerang,,Manufacturing/Production,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," 
Job Descriptions:

Gather intelligence from corporate executives and middle managers about needs and future growth
Partner with application division to ensure each project meets a specific need and resolves successfully
Assume responsibility for project tasks and ensure they are completed in a timely frame.
Evaluate, test and recommend new opportunities for enhancing software, hardware and IT processes
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Evaluate and draw conclusions from data related to customer behavior
Consult with the executive team and the IT department on the newest technology and its implications in the industry  

 
Job Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Software Development, Computer Engineering, Project Management or related field
3+ years’ experience in a position related to information technology and familiar in technology development and deployment
Experience with Programming Language and database SQL Server / Postgre SQL as advantage
Having good analytical, troubleshooting, problem solving dan fast learner
Good Communication Skills and Energic
Working Location: Tangerang

 "
217,SAP Business Analyst PM / PS Module,Kencana Agri Ltd,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,Agricultural/Plantation/Poultry/Fisheries,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),More than 5000 Employees," Kualifikasi:
- Usia maksimal 30 tahun
- Pendidikan minimal S1 jurusan Teknik/Teknik Komputer/Teknik Elektro/ Ilmu Komputer/Teknik Informatika
- Memiliki pengalaman sebagai internal consultant SAP atau support minimal 3-5 tahun (pengalaman dalam ERP Perkebunan Kelapa Sawit lebih diutamakan)
- Memiliki pengalaman sebagai functional consultant dalam implementasi project SAP minimal 2 project cycle, atau minimal 1-3 roll-out SAP Project
- Memiliki pengetahuan dan analisa yang kuat tentang modul SAP (PM/PS) dan dapat menerjemahkan kebutuhan proses bisnis ke dalam SAP, juga memvalidasi SAP guna kebutuhan bisnis dan mendukung perubahan kerja dalam proses bisnis
- Bersedia untuk melakukan perjalanan dinas apabila dibutuhkan (di luar Jawa)
- Memiliki kemampuan komunikasi dan presentasi yang baik serta dapat bekerja secara team maupun individu
- Menguasai bahasa Inggris minimal tulisan
 
Tugas dan Tanggung Jawab:
- Menjadi internal konsultan untuk spesifik modul SAP (PM/PS)
- Berpartisipasi dan berkontribusi dalam setiap project serta memastikan bahwa project berjalan dengan baik
- Melakukan trouble-shooting terhadap setiap permasalahan mengenai SAP, melakukan perbaikan atau improvisasi secara berkala dalam upaya untuk mendukung perubahan kerja dalam proses bisnis
- Mengembangkan materi pelatihan dan rencana uji serta bertanggung jawab terhadap setiap proses bisnis yang ada di SAP "
218,Business Analyst,PT Akses Cipta Solusi,Bandung (Jawa Barat),Below expected salary,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 1 year (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," 
Business Analyst bertugas memahami struktur, kebijakan, dan operasi dari suatu organisasi, dan untuk merekomendasikan solusi dari sisi teknologi yang memungkinkan organisasi untuk mencapai tujuannya.
 


Requirement Management :
 


Mengumpulkan dan mempelajari Requirement dari user
Memberi saran kepada user dalam membuat Business Requirement Document (BRD) sesuai kompetensi ACS selaku IT Consultant
Membuat Functional Spesification Document (FSD)
Mentukan in scope dan out of scope project
Membuat Mockup tampilan User Interface (UI)
Membuat Diagram Flow Transaksi dan penjelasannya
Membuat Entity Relationship Diagram (ERD)
Menjelaskan dan mengkonfirmasi FSD ke pihak-pihak terkait
Memastikan solusi dari project yang akan dibuat bermanfaat dan memberi nilai tambah bagi user

 

Project Management Documentation :
 



Mempersiapkan dokumen SDLC yang terkait dengan inisiasi project
Membuat Proposal dan mengkomunikasikannya dengan pihak klien & stake holder ACS
Memastikan kelengkapan dokumentasi project

 

Project Integration dan Test :
 



Mengawasi dan menjaga proses pengetesan internal maupun external sesuai dengan requirement yang telah dibuat
Membantu proses integrasi project
Membuat skenario test
Membantu pelatihan user
Membantu proses bug fixing dan error trouble shooting pada saat soft launch atau LIVE

R & D :


Mengeksplorasi dan mempelajari tren IT terbaru
Mempelajari produk lain sebagai referensi existing project atau new project
Memberi saran dan masukan terkait perbaikan/pengembangan solusi IT di internal

 
 

Mandatory Requirement :
 


Minimal S1 Jurusan Teknik Informatika, Sistem Informatikan, atau ilmu Komputer dengan IPK minimal 3.00
Mahir membaca dan menulis dalam bahasa Inggris
Mengerti pembuatan ERD, Flow Diagram
Mahir menggunakan Visio

 

Advantage Requirement :
 


Mahir menggunakan tools untuk membuat mockup/modeling
Memiliki pengalaman kerja sebagai Business Analyst atau System Analyst
Menguasai bahasa pemrograman
Mahir berbicara dalam bahasa Inggris





 




 "
219,Operation & Business Analyst,PT Sungai Budi ( Sungai Budi Group ),Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - Kuningan,,,,51 - 200 Employees,
220,Junior Solutions Analyst (Business Analyst),PT Intersoft Solutions,Jakarta Utara (Jakarta Raya) - Kelapa gading,,,,51 - 200 Employees,
221,Business Analyst,PT Asuransi Jiwa Sequis Life,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya) - SCBD Area,,Insurance,Min 5 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),501 - 1000 Employees," Job Summary:

Manage coordination and conduct requirement gathering, solution analysis, and testing during the project assignment and production system support/troubleshooting.
Provide required support for project planning and execution. 
Develop training material and conduct system usage training for business users.

Job Requirements:

Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology.
Proficient in Bahasa Indonesia and English
Proficient in Business Analysis, Requirement Gathering, Documentation Writing Skill, Software Development & Database
Proficient in MS Office.
Minimum 5 Year(s) of working experience as Business Analyst in life insurance or other financial institution.
 "
222,Business Analyst Assistant – HSB Business,DuPont Indonesia,Jakarta Selatan (Jakarta Raya),,,,501 - 1000 Employees,
223,Business Analyst (Code: BA),PT Dynapack Indonesia,Tangerang (Banten) - Lippo Karawaci,,Manufacturing/Production,Less than 1 year experience,1001 - 2000 Employees," 

To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management) in developing 5 year strategy for the group
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management) in cascading and align the group 5 year strategy to the subsidiaries/companies
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management)  in developing operational plan and budgeting (in coordination with finance team) to ensure the alignment with the group and subsidiaries/companies strategy and direction
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management)  in analyzing business performance and provide insights by identifying key high impact area for improvement at the group and subsidiaries/companies level. This conducted at monthly, quarterly, and annually
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management) in taking the lead in key group-wide strategic initiatives to continuously improve the operations and synergy across the group, such as standardizing the customer satisfaction survey across the group and subsidiaries/companies level
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management)  in leading the monthly business performance review and produce reports for the group and subsidiaries/companies
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management)  in leading the quarterly business performance review and produce reports for the group and subsidiaries/companies
To support Head of OSM (Office Strategy Management) in leading and host the group Annual Strategy Review Meeting, providing a summary of group and subsidiaries/companies performance and producing reports. Review and revise the current strategy to maintain its relevancies and competitiveness for the next 5 years at the group and subsidiaries/companies level  


 

Qualifications :
 

Bachelor Degree (S1) with min. GPA 3.50 (Finance/Economic Management/Accounting/ Business Finance)
For Fresh Graduate
Fluent in English
Computer literate
Eager to learn, independent, and good analytical skill
Good interpersonal skill and attitude
Willing to mobile but mainly located in Lippo Karawaci, Tangerang

 
Please submit your application letter, comprehensive resume, with a recent photograph (size of 3x4) and quote the position code on the top left envelope to:
Corporate HR 
PT Dynapack Indonesia
Dynaplast Tower 9-10th Floor
Jl. MH Thamrin No. 1
Lippo Karawaci, Tangerang 15811
not later than September 29, 2017
 "
224,Business Analyst (E-Commerce - Retail),PT. Aurora Group,Jakarta Raya - South Jakarta,,Consulting (Business & Management),Min 4 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1 - 50 Employees," Responsibilities: Collaborate with project/program managers and project sponsors to understand/determine project scope and vision.Clearly identify project stakeholders and establish user classes, as well as their characteristics.Conduct interviews to gather user requirements via workshops, questionnaires, surveys, site visits, workflow storyboards, use cases, scenarios, and other methods.Research, review, and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing requirements gathering processes and develop strategies for enhancing or further leveraging these processes.Input to production of test cases to ensure features and functions have been delivered to requirement.Analyze and verify requirements for completeness, consistency, comprehensibility, feasibility, and conformity to the overall business model.Drive and challenge business units on their assumptions around how they will successfully execute their plans. Distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.Utilize standard templates to accurately and concisely write requirements specifications and to document swim lane based process flows.Translate conceptual user requirements into functional requirements in a clear manner that is comprehensible to developers/project team.Develop and conduct reviews of the business requirements with the customer community to ensure that requirement specifications are correctly interpreted.Assist project/program managers with sponsor sign off of requirement.Assist with the interpretation of user requirements into feasible options, and communicating these back to the business stakeholders.Communicate requested changes, enhancements, and modifications of business requirements– verbally or through written documentation – to project managers, sponsors, and other stakeholders so that issues and solutions are understood and a change control process can be managed.Requirement: Bachelor’s degree in Business / Marketing / Management or any field that equivalent.At least 3 years of experience as Business analyst, in retail or e-commerce would be an excellent experience.Experience with fast moving and growing organizations, and/or that you have experience working in retail organizations understanding the priorities and nature of the services provided.Experience with multiple E-Commerce implementations/operations, and preferably from that having experience with more than one E-Commerce  platformA Subject Matter Expert in other E-Commerce  platform areas like payment, product data, order management, web analytics, content management, promotions, search etcExperienced with the lifecycle in an agile / scrum environment, desirably with experience also of traditional structured programKnowledgeable about the latest in E-Commerce  solutions and who’s doing what, and full of ideas about how the best in E-Commerce  can be achievedExcellent analytical, mathematical, and creative problem-solving skills.Excellent listening, interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills, at multiple levels and across multiple disciplinesLogical and efficient, with keen attention to detail.Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.People Development.Highly self-motivated and directed, pro-actively reporting on status and tasks. Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks while under pressure.Adaptable. The role requires a willingness to take on tasks outside of a narrowly defined role, and ideally a desire to be multi-skilledCapable of working to both tactical and strategic timescales "
225,Business Analyst - Ellipse (Based in Bali),PT ABB Sakti Industri,Bali,,Utilities/Power,Min 3 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),501 - 1000 Employees," This is a chance to work in a highly energised, passionate team on one of our key products in Enterprise Asset Management Solution – Ellipse.  You will be working with a team that is enthusiastic and understands the value of developing solutions of the highest quality. You will be valued for your contribution to the team and encouraged to be innovative and forward thinking. ABB Enterprise Software adopts the Agile methodology in software development to achieve excellence in timely deliveries and quality. Your ability to communicate and work well collaboratively with others will set you in good stead in working with other experienced developers and SME to develop exceptional software.The Business Analyst in agile development teams, works closely with Product Owners and the Product Manager to write and prioritise User Stories, create acceptance test criteria for the stories, and conduct the acceptance testing to ensure they have been correctly implemented.  The Business Analyst acts as the voice of the customer inside the development group.This is a key role within the project team, requiring the ability to quickly assimilate content knowledge and be able to communicate that to the rest of the development group, as well as understand the customer priorities and be able to balance those against organizational needs and constraints.   Strong communication skills and collaborative abilities are essential.The role of the Ellipse Business Analyst is to be involved in a highly Agile environment that uses Scrum to manage development projects so you will be working within a cross functional team to rapidly deliver new functionality and improvements to the software. The Business Analyst will develop an understanding of how our customers do business and what role our products play in that business. This position requires the ability to convey that understanding to a team of expert software professionals. You’ll be expected to work under minimal supervision on complex projects and may assist less experienced peers. Typically requires six to nine years of experience in Supply Chain Management business area. Reporting to Software Development Manager, your key responsibilities will include:• Ownership and specialist in the Supply Chain Management functional knowledge.• Acceptance / rejection of developed user stories / defects based on quality acceptance criteria.• Ensuring development decisions remain aligned with business needs.• Facilitating solution knowledge transfer within ABB Enterprise Software including field consulting and support.• Design functional and integration test plans/scripts and perform unit testing activities.• Understand, educate and demonstrate Ellipse application processing to staff.• Troubleshoot software deficiencies and identifies and locate possible bugs that are occurring by either analyzing the way client has configured their installation of the software, researching program deficiencies in the documentation, or other investigative or analytical methods.• Direct and coordinate work of others to test programs.• Track and document changes to functional and business specifications.• Create or assist others in the writing of user documentation, instructions, and procedures.• Understand ""best business"" practices and standards and relate them to Ellipse software.Requirements:• Past work experience in one of the following is essential:o Operational Supply Chain role within the Inventory/Warehouse Management or Procurement functions, oro An IT role with responsibility for solutions that support the Inventory/Warehouse Management and/or Procurement functions.• Knowledge or the ability to rapidly obtain knowledge in Agile Scrum development methodology• Awareness of the industries in which the product operates (specifically transits, transport and public infrastructure, water and utilities, defence, mining) and emerging technologies.• Strong problem solving and troubleshooting experience.Well-developed communication skills, including:• Strong ability to impart business application information both verbally and in writing.• Ability to communicate effectively and professionally with staff, customers and other third party companies’.• Well-developed listening and comprehension skills, together with the ability to elicit information from parties for discussion.• Ability to run effective meetings and the confidence to present to large groups e.g. Customer Design Workshops.The following skills are mandatory for the position:• Mentoring• Customer CommunicationWorking in our office in Bali, you will be joining an elite team of developers across the APAC region and some of the best technical and commercial talent in ABB.  You will have a real opportunity to develop an outstanding career with ABB and you will have the opportunity to truly lead your own career both locally and through our global network.ABB is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, marital status, age or disability.If you feel this is the opportunity you have been looking for we look forward to speaking with you.Additional Information:Our application selection process consists of a phone interview and assessment center consist of a face-to-face interview and a pre-employment medical test.  "
226,Business Analyst,Tata Consultancy Services,Jakarta Raya,,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 5 years (Senior Executive),More than 5000 Employees," Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree/Post Graduate Diploma/Professional Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.At least 5 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.Required Skill(s): Business Analyst, gathering requirement, UAT, SDLCPreferably Senior Executive specialized in Banking/Financial Services or equivalent.Candidate should have experience in Business Analyst at least 5 yearsHas project experience in banking or insurance company Preferably candidate who has experience as System Analyst, IT Business Analyst in banking or financial industry Good communication skills (must be able to work in a team and able to communicate thoughts and ideas to other team membersJob responsibilities:Gather, elaborate, and analyze system development requirements from different stakeholders, including : end user, Head Office or regulator (Bank Indonesia)Carry out system demonstration and User Acceptance Test (UAT) "
227,IT Business Analyst,PT Adicipta Carsani Ekakarya,Jakarta Raya,"IDR 9,000,000 - IDR 13,000,000",Human Resources Management/Consulting,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),51 - 200 Employees," Job Description : Proactively identify, clarify and prioritize business ideas, needs, and problems that require technology enablement through a mobile application.Define detailed business requirements by gathering input from different stakeholders within the client organization.Understand target audiences needs, tasks, and goals and translate them into creative concepts and functional components.Prepare presentations for project teams and stakeholders.Communicate challenges and issues as appropriate.Provide input to IT project plans in areas of highParticipate and assist Test Teams in quality assurance reviews to ensure that all the business requirements have been satisfied. Requirement : Strong analytical skills in system analysis, testing, user documentation throughout the implementation of business process and IT solutions.Candidate must possess a degree (or equivalent qualification)Minimum 2 years of experience in term of SDLC and the role of Business Analyst in this life cycleHaving experience in Banking/Finance project is a plus Benefits:Medical InsuranceAllowance  "
228,Business Analyst (Code: BA_SEP1),PT Exa Mitra Solusi,Jakarta Barat (Jakarta Raya),,,,51 - 200 Employees,
229,Information Technology Staff,PT Prospect Motor - Main Dealer Honda Outside Java,Cikarang (Jawa Barat) - PT. Prospect Motor Lippo Cikarang Bekasi,"IDR 4,000,000 - IDR 5,200,000",Automobile/Automotive Ancillary/Vehicle,Min 2 years (Staff (non-management & non-supervisor)),201 - 500 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Bachelor's Degree, Master's Degree/Post Graduate Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
Required language(s): Bahasa Indonesia, English
At least 2 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Preferred experience in .net programming, experience in data and system analyst, strong working knowledge in .net/c#, MSSQL, Javascript, logical thinking with natural problem solving skill, Understand in trading company business process, selflearner (i.e. able to make good assumptions and search for solutions before asking for help), good communication skills, having knowledge about database concept. ERP concept and User Interface
Preferably Staff (non-management & non-supervisor) specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
230,Corporate  Strategy & Investor Relations Manager,PT DCI Indonesia,Jakarta Raya,Below expected salary,"Consulting (IT, Science, Engineering & Technical)",Min 3 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),51 - 200 Employees," Requirement:• Working experience in related job 3-5 years• Familiar with Financial Modeling• Experience in Transaction Service and Corporate Finance• Form the big four audit firms• Excellent in English• University Degree from reputable University, Overseas University more high value• Willing to learn, energetic and proactive• Must be able to develop relationship at all levels of organization• Good project management, problem solving, time-management, communication and presentation skills and able to work under pressure• Should possess computer knowledge, Familiar with MS Office applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook) Job description:• part of finance team, resporting directly to finance director and GM of finance and accounting.• Responsible for financial model, monthly reporting and work closely with senior management to put together business plan, market analytics and assess potential project and business opportunities in data center space. "
231,Application Support Unit Head,PT Tanjung Enim Lestari Pulp and Paper,Muara Enim (Sumatera Selatan) - Niru Village,Below expected salary,Manufacturing/Production,Min 5 years (Supervisor/Coordinator),1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 5 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Business Analyst of IFS System, IFS Application, Good knowledge & capabilities in IFS Application, SQL Language (MS SQL or Oracle), Report Development (Crystal Report, Visual Dot Net & other programming language), Having experience in ERP (Procurement Module, Inventory Module & Plant Maintenance), Communication Skills, Good writing & speak in English, Interested to work in remote area.
Preferably Supervisor/Coordinator specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
232,Application Support Section Head,PT Tanjung Enim Lestari Pulp and Paper,Muara Enim (Sumatera Selatan) - Niru Village,,Manufacturing/Production,Min 7 years (Manager/Assistant Manager),1001 - 2000 Employees," 
Candidate must possess at least Diploma in Computer Science/Information Technology or equivalent.
At least 7 Year(s) of working experience in the related field is required for this position.
Required Skill(s): Business Analyst of IFS system, ERP Application, Experience all module ERP and having minimum 3 cycle of ERP implementation, Experience developed business applications, Having experience in Programming tools (X++, PHP, VB6, VB.net, Java & others), Understanding DBMS system (MS.SQL, Mysql, Oracle others), Good attitude, Communication skills, Quick learner & high responsibility, Good writing & speak in English, Interested to work in remote area.
Preferably Manager/Assistant Manager specialized in IT/Computer - Software or equivalent.
 "
